add: (verb) to join (something) to something else to increase its size, number, or amount.
age: (noun) the length of time that a person or thing has existed; (verb) to grow old or cause to grow old.
ago: (adverb) before the present time; in the past.
air: (noun) the invisible gaseous substance surrounding the earth, a mixture mainly of oxygen and nitrogen.
ant: (noun) a social insect, typically having a sting.
arm: (noun) either of the two upper limbs of a person; (verb) to provide (oneself or something else) with weapons.
art: (noun) the expression or application of human creative skill and imagination, typically in a visual form such as painting or sculpture.
ate: (verb) past tense of eat.
bad: (adjective) of poor quality or a low standard.
bag: (noun) a flexible container with an opening at the top, typically made of fabric, paper, or plastic.
ban: (verb) officially forbid (something); (noun) an official prohibition.
bat: (noun) a nocturnal flying mammal; (noun) a piece of sporting equipment used to hit a ball.
bed: (noun) a piece of furniture for sleeping on.
box: (noun) a container typically made of wood, cardboard, or metal.
boy: (noun) a male child or young man.
bus: (noun) a large motor vehicle carrying passengers.
but: (conjunction) except for the fact that.
buy: (verb) obtain in exchange for payment.
cap: (noun) a covering for the head, usually having a crown and visor.
car: (noun) a road motor vehicle with four wheels.
cat: (noun) a small domesticated carnivorous mammal with soft fur, a short snout, and retractable claws.
cow: (noun) a fully grown female bovine animal.
cry: (verb) to produce tears, usually as an expression of unhappiness, pain, or anger; (noun) a period of crying.
cup: (noun) a small, typically cylindrical container with a handle, used for drinking.
dad: (noun) father.
dam: (noun) a barrier constructed to hold back water.
day: (noun) a period of twenty-four hours.
did: (verb) past tense of do.
die: (verb) to stop living.
dig: (verb) to break up and move earth with a tool or the hands or paws.
dog: (noun) a domesticated carnivorous mammal.
dry: (adjective) free from moisture.
due: (adjective) owed or expected.
ear: (noun) either of a pair of organs of hearing.
eat: (verb) to consume food.
eel: (noun) a long, slender, snakelike fish.
egg: (noun) an oval-shaped reproductive body produced by a female bird or other animal.
eye: (noun) each of a pair of globular organs of sight.
far: (adverb/adjective) at, to, or from a great distance.
few: (adjective/pronoun) a small number of.
fly: (verb) to move through the air using wings; (noun) a flying insect.
fox: (noun) a small, sly mammal of the dog family.
fur: (noun) the short, fine, soft hair of certain animals.
god: (noun) the creator and supreme being of the universe.
got: (verb) past tense of get.
gun: (noun) a weapon that shoots bullets or projectiles.
gym: (noun) a gymnasium; a place equipped for physical exercise.
had: (verb) past tense of have.
ham: (noun) meat from a pig’s leg or shoulder.
has: (verb) third-person singular present tense of have.
hat: (noun) a covering for the head.
hey: (interjection) used to attract attention.
him: (pronoun) objective form of he.
hot: (adjective) having a high temperature.
hug: (verb) to clasp (someone) closely in one's arms.
ice: (noun) water frozen into a solid state.
ill: (adjective) unwell; sick.
ink: (noun) a coloured substance used for writing or drawing.
its: (pronoun) possessive form of it.
job: (noun) paid work or employment.
joy: (noun) great happiness and pleasure.
kit: (noun) a set of tools or equipment.
law: (noun) a system of rules that a particular country or community recognizes as regulating the actions of its members and may enforce by the imposition of penalties.
lay: (verb) to put or place (something) down gently or carefully.
leg: (noun) each of the limbs on which a person or animal stands or walks.
lie: (verb) to speak falsely.
log: (noun) a length of a tree trunk or branch, especially one that has been cut or fallen.
man: (noun) an adult human male.
map: (noun) a representation of an area of land or sea showing physical features, cities, etc.
men: (noun) plural of man.
met: (verb) past tense of meet.
mix: (verb) to combine or blend ingredients.
mom: (noun) mother.
mop: (noun) a tool for cleaning floors.
mug: (noun) a large cup with a handle, typically used for hot drinks.
net: (noun) a material made of threads interwoven at regular intervals, used typically for catching fish.
new: (adjective) recently made, discovered, or experienced.
nod: (verb) to briefly lower and raise one’s head.
not: (adverb) used to make a negative statement.
oil: (noun) a viscous liquid, typically unctuous, combustible, and relatively insoluble in water.
our: (pronoun) possessive form of we.
own: (verb/adjective) have (something) as one's own property or possession.
pan: (noun) a flat, shallow container typically made of metal.
pay: (verb) to give (someone) money for work done or goods received; (noun) money given for work done.
pen: (noun) an instrument for writing or drawing with ink.
per: (preposition) for each.
pet: (noun) a domesticated animal kept as a companion.
pie: (noun) a baked dish of fruit, meat, or savoury filling.
pot: (noun) a container, typically round, made of earthenware or metal, used for cooking or storing food.
ran: (verb) past tense of run.
raw: (adjective) in an uncooked or unprepared state.
red: (adjective) of the colour of blood.
sad: (adjective) feeling or showing sorrow.
saw: (verb) past tense of see; (noun) a tool with a toothed blade.
sea: (noun) a large expanse of salt water.
she: (pronoun) used to refer to a female person or animal.
shy: (adjective) being reserved or having or showing nervousness.
sit: (verb) to rest one's weight on one's buttocks, supported by the lower part of the body.
six: (number) equivalent to 6.
ski: (verb/noun) to glide over snow on skis.
sky: (noun) the region of the atmosphere and outer space seen from the earth.
son: (noun) a male offspring.
sun: (noun) the star around which the earth orbits.
tag: (verb/noun) to touch (someone) lightly while running, to indicate that they are “it.”
tap: (verb) to strike lightly.
tax: (noun) a compulsory financial charge or some other type of levy imposed on a taxpayer (an individual or legal entity) by a governmental organization in order to fund government spending and various public expenditures.
tea: (noun) an aromatic beverage prepared by pouring hot or boiling water over cured or fresh leaves of Camellia sinensis, an evergreen shrub native to East Asia.
ten: (number) equivalent to 10.
tie: (verb/noun) to fasten with a knot or bow; a necktie.
toe: (noun) each of the digits at the end of a foot.
ton: (noun) a unit of weight.
top: (noun) the highest or uppermost part of something.
toy: (noun) an object for a child to play with.
try: (verb) to attempt to do something.
two: (number) equivalent to 2.
vet: (noun) a veterinarian; (verb) to examine or check thoroughly.
via: (preposition) by way of.
war: (noun) a state of armed conflict between different countries or groups.
was: (verb) past tense of be.
wet: (adjective) covered or saturated with liquid, especially water.
why: (adverb) for what reason or purpose.
won: (verb) past tense of win.
wow: (interjection) expressing wonder or amazement.
zoo: (noun) a place where animals are kept for display to the public.
ABBA: (noun) a Swedish pop group.
ABBE: (noun) an abbot.
ABLE: (adjective) having the power, skill, means, or opportunity to do something.
ABLY: (adverb) skillfully; efficiently; capably.
ACES: (noun) plural of ace; experts.
ACHE: (noun/verb) a continuous or prolonged dull pain in a part of one's body.
ACID: (noun) a chemical substance that neutralizes alkalis, dissolves some metals, and turns litmus red; typically, a corrosive or sour-tasting liquid.
ACME: (noun) the point at which someone or something is best, perfect, or most successful.
ACNE: (noun) a common skin condition that causes pimples.
ACRE: (noun) a unit of land area.
ACTA: (noun) plural of actum (Latin); proceedings.
ACTS: (noun) plural of act; actions or deeds.
ACYL: (noun) a group of atoms consisting of a carbon atom double-bonded to an oxygen atom, and single-bonded to a hydrocarbon group.
ADDS: (verb) third person singular present tense of add.
AERO: (prefix) relating to or denoting air or aircraft.
AFAR: (adverb) from a great distance.
AFRO: (noun) a hairstyle with the hair styled into a full, rounded shape.
AGAR: (noun) a gelatinous substance obtained from various kinds of red seaweed and used in biological culture media.
AGED: (adjective) having lived for a specified number of years.
AGER: (noun) a person who cultivates land or grows crops.
AGES: (noun) plural of age; long periods of time.
AIDA: (noun) a title, often referring to the opera by Verdi.
AIDE: (noun) an assistant or helper.
AIDS: (noun) Acquired immunodeficiency syndrome; a disease.
AIMS: (noun) plural of aim; goals; objectives.
AIRS: (noun) plural of air; the atmosphere.
AIRY: (adjective) light and graceful; spacious and well-ventilated.
AJAR: (adjective) slightly open.
AKIN: (adjective) of similar character.
ALAN: (noun) a masculine given name.
ALAS: (interjection) expressing grief, pity, or concern.
ALBA: (noun) a type of white or light-coloured robe.
ALEC: (noun) a masculine given name.
ALFA: (noun) a make of car (Alfa Romeo).
ALGA: (noun) a simple nonflowering plant of a large group that includes seaweeds and many single-celled forms. Algae contain chlorophyll but lack true stems, roots, or leaves.
ALLY: (noun) a state or nation cooperating with another for a military or other purpose. (Verb) to form or become an alliance.
ALMA: (noun) a feminine given name.
ALMS: (noun) something given to a person in need.
ALOE: (noun) a genus of succulent plants.
ALPS: (noun) a mountain range in Europe.
ALSO: (adverb) in addition; too.
ALTO: (noun) a high male voice or the singer with such a voice; also a low female voice or its singer.
ALUM: (noun) aluminum sulfate or aluminum potassium sulfate.
AMEN: (interjection) so be it.
AMES: (noun) a place name.
AMID: (preposition) surrounded by; in the middle of.
AMIN: (noun) a given name.
AMIR: (noun) a title of nobility in some Muslim countries, equivalent to emir.
AMIS: (noun) a plural.
AMMO: (noun) ammunition.
AMPS: (noun) amperes; a unit of electric current.
ANAL: (adjective) relating to the anus.
ANCE: (suffix) forming nouns, often from verbs.
ANEW: (adverb) once more; again.
ANNA: (noun) a feminine given name.
ANNO: (prefix) used in dates (Anno Domini).
ANON: (adverb) soon; shortly.
ANTE: (prefix) before; prior to.
ANTI: (prefix) opposed to; against.
ANTS: (noun) plural of ant.
ANUS: (noun) the opening at the end of the alimentary canal through which solid waste is expelled.
APES: (noun) plural of ape; primates.
APEX: (noun) the highest point; summit.
APSE: (noun) a large, usually semicircular recess in a church, typically at the eastern end, and usually containing the altar.
AQUA: (noun) water.
ARCH: (noun) a curved structure spanning an opening; (adjective) chief or principal.
ARCO: (adverb, musical) played with a bow (arco).
ARCS: (noun) plural of arc; a curved line.
ARDS: (noun) a plural; sometimes indicating high grounds.
AREA: (noun) a region or space.
ARES: (noun) the Greek god of war.
ARIA: (noun) a long, accompanied song for a solo voice, typically one in an opera or oratorio.
ARID: (adjective) extremely dry; barren.
ARMS: (noun) plural of arm.
ARMY: (noun) a large organized body of soldiers.
ARSE: (noun, informal) buttocks.
ARTS: (noun) plural of art.
ASKS: (verb) third person singular present tense of ask.
ATOM: (noun) the smallest particle of an element that can exist.
ATOP: (preposition/adverb) on top of.
AULD: (adjective, Scottish) old.
AUNT: (noun) the sister of one's father or mother; the wife of one's uncle.
AURA: (noun) a distinctive atmosphere or quality that seems to surround and be generated by a person, thing, or place.
AUTO: (noun) a car.
AVER: (verb) state or assert to be the case.
AVID: (adjective) having or showing a keen interest in or enthusiasm for something.
AWAY: (adverb) to or at a distance from a particular place, person, or thing.
AWED: (adjective) filled with awe.
AWRY: (adverb/adjective) away from the expected or proper course; askew; amiss.
AXEL: (noun) a pin or shaft on which a wheel rotates.
AXES: (noun) plural of ax; tools used for chopping wood.
AXIS: (noun) a real or imaginary straight line about which a body rotates.
AXLE: (noun) a rod or shaft on which a wheel rotates.
AXON: (noun) the long threadlike part of a nerve fiber that conducts nerve impulses away from the neuron cell body.
BAAL: (noun) a Canaanite god.
BABA: (noun) a grandmother (in some languages); also a type of dessert.
BABE: (noun) a baby; an attractive young woman.
BABU: (noun, archaic) a title of respect in India (now considered offensive).
BABY: (noun) a very young child.
BACH: (noun) referring to Johann Sebastian Bach, a composer.
BACK: (noun/adverb/verb) the rear surface of the human body from the neck to the hips.
BADE: (verb) archaic past tense of bid.
BAGS: (noun) plural of bag.
BAHT: (noun) the basic monetary unit of Thailand.
BAIL: (noun/verb) to release (someone) from custody on payment of money; the money paid to secure release.
BAIT: (noun/verb) to tempt (a person or animal) with some attraction.
BAKE: (verb) to cook (food) by dry heat without direct exposure to a flame.
BALD: (adjective) lacking hair on the head; clearly stated, without concealment.
BALE: (noun) a large amount of something bundled together; (verb) to make into a bale.
BALK: (verb) to refuse abruptly; hesitate; (noun) a hindrance or obstacle.
BALL: (noun) a spherical object; a social gathering or dance.
BALM: (noun) something that soothes or heals.
BAND: (noun) a strip or ring; a group of musicians; (verb) to bind together.
BANE: (noun) a cause of great distress or annoyance.
BANG: (noun/verb) a sudden loud noise; to strike something forcefully.
BANK: (noun) an establishment that provides financial services; the land alongside a river or lake.
BANS: (noun) plural of ban.
BAPU: (noun) an affectionate term for Mahatma Gandhi.
BARB: (noun) a point or spike; a barbed remark.
BARD: (noun) a poet, traditionally one reciting epics and associated with a particular oral tradition.
BARE: (adjective) not covered by clothing or other covering; (verb) to reveal (something).
BARK: (noun) the outer layer of a tree's trunk and branches; (verb) to utter loud, harsh sounds like a dog.
BARN: (noun) a farm building for storing grain.
BARS: (noun) plural of bar; a rod or stripe.
BASE: (noun) the bottom or lowest part of something; (adjective) morally low.
BASH: (verb) to strike forcefully; (noun) a lively party.
BASK: (verb) to sit or lie enjoying warmth or sunshine.
BASS: (noun) a low-pitched sound or musical note; a type of fish.
BAST: (verb, archaic) to sew with basting stitches.
BATE: (verb, archaic) to lessen or reduce; to moderate.
BATH: (noun) a washing of the body in a bath.
BATS: (noun) plural of bat.
BAUD: (noun) a unit of data transmission rate.
BAYS: (noun) plural of bay; a body of water sheltered by land.
BEAD: (noun) a small, usually round object pierced for stringing.
BEAK: (noun) a bird's mouth.
BEAM: (noun) a strong, horizontal bar of wood or metal used to support a structure; a ray of light.
BEAN: (noun) a seed or pod of leguminous plants.
BEAR: (noun) a large, heavy mammal; (verb) to carry or support.
BEAT: (verb) to strike repeatedly; (noun) a regular pulsation or rhythm.
BEAU: (noun) a boyfriend; a male admirer.
BECK: (noun) a nod or beckoning gesture.
BEDE: (verb, archaic) to adorn; embellish.
BEDS: (noun) plural of bed.
BEEF: (noun) the flesh of a cow, used as food.
BEEN: (verb) past participle of be.
BEEP: (noun/verb) a short, high-pitched sound.
BEER: (noun) an alcoholic drink made from grain.
BEES: (noun) plural of bee.
BEET: (noun) a root vegetable.
BEGS: (verb) third person singular present tense of beg.
BEIN: (verb, archaic) being.
BELL: (noun) a hollow, metallic object that makes a ringing sound when struck.
BELT: (noun) a flexible band worn around the waist; a region or zone.
BEND: (verb) to curve; (noun) a curve.
BENE: (adjective, Italian) good.
BENI: (adjective) benevolent; kind.
BENT: (adjective) curved; determined; dedicated.
BERG: (noun) a mass of ice floating in the sea.
BEST: (adjective/adverb/noun) of the most excellent type or quality.
BETA: (noun) the second letter of the Greek alphabet; a preliminary or testing version.
BETH: (noun) a feminine given name.
BETS: (noun) plural of bet; wagers.
BHAI: (noun) Hindi for brother.
BIAS: (noun) a particular tendency, trend, inclination, feeling, or opinion, especially one that prevents unprejudiced consideration of a question.
BIDE: (verb, archaic) to await; endure.
BIDS: (noun) plural of bid; offers of price.
BIEN: (adverb, French) well; fine.
BIER: (noun) a structure on which a corpse is placed before burial.
BIKE: (noun) a bicycle.
BILE: (noun) a bitter, greenish-yellow fluid secreted by the liver, that aids digestion.
BILL: (noun) a statement of costs; a proposed law.
BIND: (verb) to tie or fasten tightly.
BING: (verb) to hit forcefully.
BINS: (noun) plural of bin; containers for storage.
BIOS: (noun) basic input/output system (computer); a living organism's biological processes.
BIRD: (noun) a feathered, winged animal.
BITE: (verb) to cut or crush with the teeth; (noun) an act of biting.
BITS: (noun) plural of bit; small pieces.
BLAH: (interjection) expressing boredom or dissatisfaction.
BLED: (verb) past tense of bleed.
BLEW: (verb) past tense of blow.
BLOB: (noun) a small drop or lump of a viscous substance.
BLOC: (noun) a coalition or group, particularly of nations, especially one formed for political purposes.
BLOG: (noun) a regularly updated website or web page, typically one run by an individual or small group, that is written in an informal or conversational style.
BLOT: (verb/noun) to absorb or dry up liquid.
BLOW: (verb) to move with a current of air; to strike forcefully.
BLUE: (adjective/noun) of the colour of the clear sky.
BLUR: (verb/noun) to make or become unclear.
BOAR: (noun) a male pig.
BOAS: (noun) plural of boa; a type of snake.
BOAT: (noun) a vessel for traveling on water.
BOCK: (noun) a strong German beer.
BODE: (verb) to be an omen of (something).
BODY: (noun) the physical structure of a person or animal.
BOGS: (noun) plural of bog; areas of wet, spongy ground.
BOIL: (verb) to heat a liquid until it bubbles and steams; (noun) a painful inflamed swelling.
BOIS: (noun) plural of boy (French).
BOLD: (adjective) fearless or daring; (noun) a type of typeface.
BOLL: (noun) the seed pod of a cotton plant; a round swelling or bulb.
BOLT: (noun) a metal pin or rod for fastening things together; (verb) to fasten with a bolt.
BOMB: (noun) a device that explodes.
BONA: (noun) good faith.
BOND: (noun/verb) a connection or link; to join or unite.
BONE: (noun) a rigid body tissue constituting most of the skeleton of vertebrates.
BONY: (adjective) consisting of, resembling, or full of bone.
BOOK: (noun) a written or printed work consisting of pages glued or sewn together.
BOOL: (noun) a Boolean value, either true or false.
BOOM: (noun/verb) a deep resonant sound; to increase rapidly.
BOON: (noun) a thing that is helpful; a benefit.
BOOT: (noun) a covering for the foot and leg; (verb) to kick forcefully.
BORA: (noun) a cold, dry wind.
BORE: (verb) to make (a hole) in something; (noun) a dull person.
BORN: (verb) past participle of bear (to give birth).
BOSS: (noun) a person who manages or directs; (verb) to command or control.
BOTH: (determiner/pronoun) the two; each of two.
BOUT: (noun) a short period of intense activity.
BOWL: (noun) a rounded container, typically made of ceramic or glass, used for food or drinks; (verb) to roll a ball.
BOWS: (noun) plural of bow; the front of a ship; a weapon for shooting arrows; a gesture of respect.
BOYS: (noun) plural of boy.
BRAD: (noun) a thin nail.
BRAG: (verb) to boast; to show off.
BRAN: (noun) the outer layer of cereal grains.
BRAS: (noun) plural of bra; brassiere.
BRAT: (noun) a naughty or badly behaved child.
BRAY: (verb) to make a harsh, loud sound, like a donkey.
BRED: (verb) past tense of breed.
BREW: (verb) to make beer or ale; (noun) a drink, especially beer.
BRIG: (noun) a prison ship or small military prison.
BRIM: (noun) the edge or lip of something, such as a cup or hat.
BRIT: (noun) a British person.
BROS: (noun) plural of brother (slang).
BROW: (noun) the ridge above the eye.
BUCK: (noun) a male deer or rabbit; a unit of US currency.
BUDS: (noun) plural of bud; undeveloped shoots or flowers.
BUFF: (adjective) light yellowish-brown; (noun) an enthusiast or expert.
BUGS: (noun) plural of bug; insects; flaws or problems.
BULB: (noun) a rounded underground part of a plant, often used for reproduction.
BULK: (noun) the largest part of something; (adjective) large in size or amount.
BULL: (noun) a fully grown male bovine animal.
BUMP: (noun/verb) a rounded lump; to strike against forcefully.
BUMS: (noun, informal) buttocks; homeless people.
BUND: (noun) a levy or embankment along a riverbank.
BUNK: (noun) a bed; (verb) to deceive.
BUNS: (noun) plural of bun; bread rolls.
BUOY: (noun) a floating marker.
BURG: (noun, slang) a city or town.
BURN: (verb) to be consumed or damaged by fire; (noun) an injury caused by fire.
BURR: (noun) the prickly seed head of a plant.
BURY: (verb) to place (a body) in a grave or tomb.
BUSH: (noun) a low-growing woody plant.
BUSS: (noun) a bus; (verb, archaic) to kiss.
BUST: (noun/verb) to break; to arrest.
BUSY: (adjective) actively occupied.
BUTE: (noun) the island of Bute in Scotland.
BUTT: (noun) the buttocks; the thicker end of an object.
BUYS: (noun) plural of buy.
BUZZ: (noun/verb) a continuous humming sound; to make such a sound.
BYTE: (noun) a unit of computer storage.
CABS: (noun) plural of cab; taxicabs.
CADE: (noun) a cask of herring; (verb) to entice.
CAFE: (noun) a small restaurant or coffee shop.
CAGE: (noun) a structure made of bars or wire, used to confine an animal or bird.
CAIN: (noun) a Biblical figure.
CAKE: (noun) a sweet baked food.
CALF: (noun) a young bovine animal; the back of the leg below the knee.
CALL: (verb/noun) to shout or speak loudly to summon or attract attention.
CALM: (adjective) not showing or feeling nervousness or agitation.
CAME: (verb) past tense of come.
CAMP: (noun) a temporary place of shelter; (verb) to stay in a camp.
CAMS: (noun) plural of cam; rotating mechanical parts.
CANE: (noun) a strong, stiff plant stem; a stick used for support.
CANS: (noun) plural of can; metal containers.
CANT: (noun) insincere or affected talk; a special vocabulary used by a particular group.
CAPE: (noun) a point of land projecting into the water; a sleeveless cloak.
CAPO: (noun) a device used on a guitar or other stringed instrument to adjust pitch.
CAPS: (noun) plural of cap.
CARD: (noun) a piece of stiff paper or pasteboard.
CARE: (noun/verb) worry, concern; to be concerned or worried.
CARL: (noun) a masculine given name.
CARP: (noun) a type of fish; (verb) to complain in a petty way.
CARR: (noun) a marshy area.
CARS: (noun) plural of car.
CART: (noun) a vehicle with two or four wheels, typically used for transporting goods.
CASA: (noun) a house; a villa (Spanish).
CASE: (noun) an instance of something; a container; a legal proceeding.
CASH: (noun) money in the form of notes or coins.
CASK: (noun) a wooden barrel for liquids.
CAST: (verb) to throw; (noun) a group of actors.
CATE: (noun) a female cat.
CATS: (noun) plural of cat.
CAVA: (noun) a type of Spanish sparkling wine.
CAVE: (noun) a natural underground chamber.
CEDE: (verb) to give up possession of something.
CELL: (noun) a small room or space; a unit of biological organization.
CENT: (noun) a monetary unit.
CERT: (noun, informal) a certificate; a sure thing.
CESS: (noun, archaic) a tax.
CHAD: (noun) a small piece of paper or other material.
CHAI: (noun) a spiced tea drink.
CHAM: (noun) a title of royalty or nobility in some countries in Asia.
CHAO: (noun, archaic) chaos.
CHAP: (noun) a fellow; a man.
CHAR: (verb) to burn or scorch the surface of something.
CHAS: (noun) a chase; a pursuit.
CHAT: (verb/noun) to talk informally.
CHEF: (noun) a professional cook.
CHER: (noun) a feminine given name.
CHEW: (verb) to crush or grind with the teeth.
CHEZ: (preposition, French) at the home of; at the establishment of.
CHIA: (noun) chia seeds.
CHIC: (adjective) stylish and fashionable.
CHIN: (noun) the protruding part of the face below the mouth.
CHIP: (noun) a small piece of something broken off; (verb) to break a small piece off.
CHIT: (noun) a written note; (verb) to send a note.
CHOP: (verb) to cut something into pieces with an axe, knife, or other tool.
CHOU: (noun, culinary) cabbage.
CHOW: (noun, slang) food.
CHUM: (noun) a close friend; (verb) to be friendly.
CINE: (noun, short form) cinema.
CITE: (verb) to quote as an authority or example.
CITY: (noun) a large town.
CLAD: (verb, archaic) clothed.
CLAM: (noun) a type of shellfish.
CLAN: (noun) a group of families or tribes claiming a common ancestor.
CLAP: (verb/noun) to strike the palms of the hands together.
CLAW: (noun) a sharp, curved nail on an animal's foot.
CLAY: (noun) a stiff, sticky fine-grained earth, typically yellow, red, or bluish-grey in colour and often used for making bricks and pottery.
CLEM: (noun) Clement.
CLIP: (verb/noun) to fasten together with a clip.
CLOG: (verb/noun) to obstruct.
CLOT: (noun/verb) a lump or mass of something.
CLUB: (noun) a heavy stick used as a weapon or for sport.
CLUE: (noun) a piece of information suggesting the answer to a question.
COAL: (noun) a combustible black rock consisting mainly of carbonized vegetable matter, found mainly in underground seams and used as fuel.
COAT: (noun) an outer garment.
COAX: (verb) to persuade gently.
COBB: (noun) a cobblestone; a type of corn.
COCA: (noun) a coca plant; the plant's leaves are used to make cocaine.
COCK: (noun) a male bird, especially a domestic fowl.
COCO: (noun) a coconut; referring to the cocoa plant.
CODA: (noun) a concluding passage of a piece of music.
CODE: (noun) a system of words, letters, figures, or other symbols used to represent others.
COED: (adjective) coeducational; mixed gender.
COIL: (verb/noun) to wind into a spiral.
COIN: (noun) a piece of metal used as money.
COKE: (noun) a fuel made from coal.
COLA: (noun) a type of soft drink.
COLD: (adjective) having a low temperature; (noun) a common illness marked by sneezing and fever.
COLE: (noun) a cabbage.
COLL: (noun, informal) college.
COLS: (noun) plural of col; mountain passes.
COLT: (noun) a young male horse.
COMA: (noun) a prolonged state of unconsciousness.
COMB: (noun) a toothed instrument for dressing hair.
COME: (verb) to move or travel towards the speaker or towards a specified place.
COMM: (noun, abbreviation) communication; community.
COMP: (noun, abbreviation) computer; compensation.
COND: (noun, abbreviation) condenser; condition.
CONE: (noun) a solid or hollow object that tapers from a circular base to a point.
CONF: (noun, abbreviation) conference; confession.
CONN: (noun, abbreviation) connection.
CONS: (noun, abbreviation) consensus; considerations.
COOK: (verb/noun) to prepare food by heating.
COOL: (adjective) pleasantly low in temperature.
COON: (noun, offensive) a raccoon; (offensive racial slur) a Black person.
COOP: (noun) a cage for poultry.
COPE: (verb) to manage or deal with something.
COPS: (noun, informal) police officers.
COPY: (noun/verb) a reproduction or imitation; to reproduce something.
CORD: (noun) a length of thick string, rope, or cable.
CORE: (noun) the central part of something.
CORK: (noun) the outer bark of the cork oak, used for bottle stoppers etc.
CORN: (noun) the grains of maize.
CORY: (noun) a masculine given name.
COST: (noun/verb) the amount of money needed to buy, do, or make something; to require a certain amount of money.
COSY: (adjective, British) snug and comfortable.
COTE: (noun) a shelter for animals.
COTS: (noun) plural of cot; small beds.
COUP: (noun) a sudden, violent, and illegal seizure of power from a government.
COUR: (noun, abbreviation) court; course.
COVE: (noun) a small sheltered bay.
COWS: (noun) plural of cow.
COZY: (adjective) snug and comfortable.
CRAB: (noun) a crustacean with ten legs.
CRAG: (noun) a steep, rugged rock.
CRAM: (verb) to push or force something into a place that is too small or already full.
CRAP: (noun/interjection, vulgar) excrement; nonsense.
CRAY: (noun) a type of fish.
CREE: (noun) a Native American tribe.
CREW: (noun) a group of people working together.
CRIB: (noun) a baby's bed; a small shelter.
CRIM: (noun, slang) a criminal.
CRIT: (noun/verb, abbreviation) critique; criticism; to criticize.
CROP: (noun/verb) a cultivated plant or plants; to harvest.
CROW: (noun) a large black bird.
CRUX: (noun) the decisive or most important point at issue.
CUBE: (noun) a solid figure with six square faces.
CUBS: (noun) plural of cub; young animals.
CUES: (noun) plural of cue; signals; hints.
CUFF: (noun) a band around a sleeve; (verb) to strike.
CULT: (noun) a system of religious veneration and devotion directed towards a particular figure or object.
CUNT: (noun, vulgar) the female genitals.
CUPS: (noun) plural of cup.
CURB: (noun/verb) a restraint or check; to restrain.
CURD: (noun) the thick part of milk that separates from the liquid when it is curdled or sour.
CURE: (noun/verb) the restoration of health; to restore to health.
CURL: (verb/noun) to form into a curl; a curved shape.
CURR: (noun, abbreviation) current.
CURT: (adjective) rudely brief.
CUSP: (noun) a pointed end; a point of transition.
CUTE: (adjective) attractively small or pretty.
CUTS: (noun) plural of cut; injuries.
CYST: (noun) a fluid-filled sac or cavity.
CZAR: (noun) the former title of the emperors of Russia.
DADA: (noun) a style of art.
DAFT: (adjective) silly; foolish.
DAHL: (noun) referring to Roald Dahl, an author; also a type of pea.
DAIS: (noun) a raised platform for a speaker or lecturer.
DALE: (noun) a valley.
DALI: (noun) referring to Salvador Dali, an artist.
DAME: (noun) a woman of high social standing; a title of honor.
DAMN: (verb/interjection) to condemn to hell; an expression of anger or disgust.
DAMP: (adjective) slightly wet.
DAMS: (noun) plural of dam.
DANG: (noun/verb) something dangerous; to hang precariously.
DANK: (adjective) unpleasantly moist or wet.
DANS: (noun) plural of dan; a rank.
DARE: (verb/noun) to challenge (someone) to do something; a challenge.
DARK: (adjective) having little or no light.
DARN: (verb) to mend with stitches.
DART: (noun/verb) to move suddenly and quickly.
DASH: (noun/verb) a brief mark or stroke; to strike quickly and forcefully.
DATA: (noun) plural of datum; facts or information used usually to calculate, analyze, or plan something; or to make a decision about something.
DATE: (noun) a specified day of the month or year; a social engagement.
DAVY: (noun) a masculine given name.
DAWN: (noun) the first appearance of light in the sky before sunrise.
DAYS: (noun) plural of day.
DAZE: (verb/noun) to stun or bewilder.
DEAD: (adjective) no longer alive.
DEAF: (adjective) lacking the sense of hearing.
DEAL: (noun/verb) a transaction or agreement; to distribute or share.
DEAN: (noun) a senior official in a college or university.
DEAR: (adjective) beloved; costly or valuable.
DEBS: (noun) plural of deb; debutantes.
DEBT: (noun) something owed to someone.
DECK: (noun) a platform on a ship or aircraft.
DECO: (adjective, short form) Art Deco.
DEED: (noun) an action or act.
DEEM: (verb) to consider or judge.
DEEP: (adjective) extending far down; intense or profound.
DEER: (noun) a hoofed mammal with antlers.
DEFT: (adjective) neatly skillful and quick in one's movements.
DEFY: (verb) to openly resist or refuse to obey.
DELI: (noun) a delicatessen.
DELL: (noun) a small valley.
DEMO: (noun, abbreviation) demonstration; a sample or preview.
DENS: (noun) plural of den; a lair.
DENT: (noun/verb) a small depression in a surface.
DENY: (verb) to state that something is not true.
DERM: (noun, abbreviation) dermatologist; dermis (skin layer).
DESK: (noun) a table used for writing or working at.
DEUS: (noun) God (Latin).
DEVA: (noun) a Hindu deity.
DIAL: (noun/verb) a device for selecting a telephone number; to select.
DICE: (noun) plural of die; small cubes used in games of chance.
DICK: (noun, vulgar) penis.
DIDO: (noun) a feminine given name; a type of maneuver or stunt.
DIED: (verb) past tense of die.
DIES: (noun) plural of die; small cubes; also, a verb, present tense of die.
DIET: (noun) the kinds of food that a person, animal, or community habitually eats.
DIFF: (noun, abbreviation) difference; differential.
DIGS: (noun, informal) lodgings; also a verb, plural of dig.
DIKE: (noun) a barrier to prevent flooding.
DILL: (noun) an herb; a foolish person.
DIME: (noun) a US coin.
DINE: (verb) to eat a meal, especially a formal one.
DING: (noun/verb) a small dent or hollow.
DINO: (noun, short form) dinosaur.
DINT: (noun/verb) a dent or depression; to achieve by force.
DIPS: (noun) plural of dip; downward movements; also, a verb.
DIRE: (adjective) extremely serious or urgent.
DIRK: (noun) a dagger.
DIRT: (noun) earth or soil; something unclean or filthy.
DISC: (noun) a flat, circular object.
DISH: (noun) a shallow container for serving food.
DISK: (noun) a flat, circular object; a storage device.
DISS: (verb, slang) to disrespect; disparage.
DIVE: (verb/noun) to plunge into water headfirst; a steep descent.
DOCK: (noun) an enclosed area in a harbour or riverbank where ships can be moored.
DOCS: (noun, abbreviation) documents; docks.
DOER: (noun) a person who does something.
DOES: (verb) third-person singular present tense of do.
DOGS: (noun) plural of dog.
DOIT: (noun, archaic) a small coin.
DOLE: (noun) money given to the poor.
DOLL: (noun) a toy representing a baby or person.
DOME: (noun) a rounded roof or ceiling.
DONA: (noun) a woman or lady (Spanish).
DONE: (verb) past participle of do.
DONG: (noun) a unit of currency.
DONS: (noun) plural of don; a title of respect; also a verb.
DOOM: (noun/verb) ruin or destruction; to condemn.
DOOR: (noun) a hinged barrier at the entrance to a room.
DOPA: (noun, chemical) 3,4-dihydroxyphenylalanine; a precursor to dopamine.
DOPE: (noun, slang) a drug; (informal) a fool.
DORE: (noun) a golden colour.
DORM: (noun, abbreviation) dormitory.
DOSE: (noun) a measured amount of medicine.
DOST: (verb, archaic) second person singular present tense of do.
DOTH: (verb, archaic) third person singular present tense of do.
DOTS: (noun) plural of dot; small points or spots.
DOTY: (adjective, archaic) being a duty.
DOUR: (adjective) stern or severe; gloomy.
DOVE: (noun) a type of bird.
DOWN: (adverb/preposition/adjective) from a higher to a lower level.
DOZE: (verb/noun) to sleep lightly.
DRAB: (adjective) dull and uninteresting.
DRAG: (verb/noun) to pull something along forcefully.
DRAM: (noun) a small drink of spirits.
DRAW: (verb) to pull or tug; to sketch.
DREW: (verb) past tense of draw.
DRIP: (verb/noun) to fall in drops; a drop of liquid.
DROP: (verb/noun) to fall; something that falls.
DRUG: (noun) a medicine or other substance which has a physiological effect when ingested or otherwise introduced into the body.
DRUM: (noun) a hollow cylindrical percussion instrument.
DUAL: (adjective) consisting of two parts.
DUCE: (noun) a leader or dictator (Italian).
DUCK: (noun) a type of waterfowl; (verb) to lower the head or body quickly.
DUCT: (noun) a tube or pipe for conveying liquids or gases.
DUDE: (noun, slang) a man.
DUEL: (noun/verb) a contest between two people.
DUES: (noun) plural of due; payments.
DUET: (noun) a piece of music for two voices or instruments.
DUFF: (noun) a type of pudding.
DUKE: (noun) a male nobleman.
DULL: (adjective) lacking interest or excitement; not sharp or bright.
DULY: (adverb) in accordance with what is required or expected; properly.
DUMA: (noun) the former Russian parliament.
DUMB: (adjective) unable to speak; stupid.
DUMP: (verb/noun) to dispose of waste; a place for dumping waste.
DUNE: (noun) a mound or ridge of sand.
DUNG: (noun) excrement.
DUNS: (noun) plural of dun; demands for payment; a colour.
DUPE: (noun/verb) a person easily tricked or deceived.
DURA: (noun) dura mater; the outermost membrane covering the brain and spinal cord.
DUSK: (noun) the period between sunset and complete darkness.
DUST: (noun) fine particles of earth or other matter.
DUTY: (noun) a moral or legal obligation; a tax.
DYAD: (noun) a group of two people or things.
DYED: (verb) past tense of dye.
DYER: (noun) a person who dyes fabrics.
DYES: (noun) plural of dye; coloring substances.
DYKE: (noun) a ditch or embankment; (offensive slur) a lesbian woman.
EACH: (determiner/pronoun) every one of two or more.
EARL: (noun) a nobleman.
EARN: (verb) to receive something as a result of work or effort.
EARS: (noun) plural of ear.
EASE: (noun/verb) freedom from difficulty or discomfort.
EAST: (noun/adjective) the direction in which the sun rises.
EASY: (adjective) simple or straightforward.
EATS: (noun) food.
ECHO: (noun/verb) a reflected sound.
EDDY: (noun) a current of water or air moving circularly.
EDGE: (noun) the outer boundary or margin of something.
EDGY: (adjective) nervous or tense.
EDIT: (verb) to prepare (written material) for publication.
EELS: (noun) plural of eel.
EGGS: (noun) plural of egg.
EGOS: (noun) plural of ego; the self.
EINE: (adjective, German) one.
ELAN: (noun) style and elegance.
ELMS: (noun) plural of elm; a type of tree.
ELSE: (adverb/pronoun) otherwise; another.
EMIR: (noun) a title of nobility in some Muslim countries, equivalent to amir.
EMIT: (verb) to produce and discharge (something, especially gas or radiation).
EMMA: (noun) a feminine given name.
EMMY: (noun) an Emmy Award.
ENDS: (noun) plural of end; the final part of something.
ENVY: (noun/verb) a feeling of discontent or resentment towards another for their possessions, qualities, or luck.
EPIC: (noun/adjective) a long poem, typically one derived from ancient oral traditions, narrating the deeds and adventures of heroic or legendary figures.
ERAS: (noun) plural of era; historical periods.
ERGO: (adverb) therefore.
ERIC: (noun) a masculine given name.
EROS: (noun) the Greek god of love.
ERST: (adverb, archaic) formerly; first.
ESSE: (noun) being (Latin).
ETAT: (noun) state (French).
ETCH: (verb) to cut or engrave.
EURO: (noun) the basic monetary unit of most of the countries of the European Union.
EVEN: (adjective/adverb) flat; smooth; equally.
EVER: (adverb) at any time; always.
EVIL: (noun/adjective) profound wickedness; wicked or morally wrong.
EWES: (noun) plural of ewe; female sheep.
EXAM: (noun, abbreviation) examination.
EXEC: (noun, abbreviation) executive.
EXIT: (noun/verb) a way out; to leave.
EXON: (noun) a segment of a DNA or RNA molecule that contains information coding for a protein or peptide sequence.
EXPO: (noun, abbreviation) exposition; exhibition.
EYED: (verb) past tense of eye.
EYES: (noun) plural of eye.
EYRE: (noun) an area (archaic).
FACE: (noun/verb) the front part of a person's head.
FACT: (noun) something that is known to be true.
FADE: (verb) to lose intensity or brightness gradually.
FADS: (noun) plural of fad; short-lived fashions or trends.
FAIL: (verb) to be unsuccessful in achieving or completing something.
FAIN: (adverb, archaic) gladly; willingly.
FAIR: (adjective) just or equitable; attractive or pleasing.
FAKE: (adjective/noun/verb) not genuine; a fraud; to imitate deceptively.
FALL: (verb/noun) to drop or descend; autumn.
FAME: (noun) the state of being well known.
FANG: (noun) a long, pointed tooth, especially of a dog or snake.
FANS: (noun) plural of fan; enthusiasts.
FARE: (noun) money paid for travel; (verb) to get along or progress.
FARM: (noun/verb) a piece of land used for farming.
FART: (noun/verb) to expel gas from the anus.
FAST: (adjective/adverb) moving or occurring at high speed; quickly.
FATE: (noun) something inevitable or unavoidable.
FATS: (noun) plural of fat; oily substances.
FAUT: (noun) a fault (French).
FAUX: (adjective) artificial; imitation.
FAWN: (noun) a young deer; (verb) to try to win favor through flattery.
FEAR: (noun/verb) a feeling of apprehension about something.
FEAT: (noun) an act or deed, especially one of skill, daring, or strength.
FEDS: (noun, slang) federal agents.
FEED: (verb/noun) to give food to someone or something; food.
FEEL: (verb/noun) to perceive with the sense of touch; a sensation.
FEES: (noun) plural of fee; payments.
FEET: (noun) plural of foot.
FELL: (verb) past tense of fall; (noun) a wild area.
FELT: (verb) past tense of feel; (noun) a fabric.
FEND: (verb) to defend or protect oneself.
FERN: (noun) a type of plant.
FETE: (noun/verb) a festive gathering.
FEUD: (noun/verb) a long-lasting quarrel.
FIAT: (noun) an official order; a decree.
FIEF: (noun, archaic) a feudal estate.
FIFE: (noun) a small flute.
FIGS: (noun) plural of fig; a type of fruit.
FILE: (noun/verb) a folder for papers; to record information; to smooth with a file.
FILL: (verb) to make or become full.
FILM: (noun/verb) a motion picture; to make a movie.
FILS: (noun) sons (Arabic).
FIND: (verb) to discover something unexpectedly or during a search.
FINE: (adjective/noun/verb) of high quality; a sum of money paid as a penalty.
FINK: (noun, slang) an informer; a person who is unreliable.
FINS: (noun) plural of fin; the external appendage of a fish.
FIRE: (noun/verb) the rapid oxidation of a material in the exothermic chemical process of combustion, releasing heat, light, and various reaction products.
FIRM: (adjective/noun) strong and steady; a business.
FIRS: (noun) plural of fir; a type of tree.
FISH: (noun/verb) an aquatic animal; to catch fish.
FISK: (noun) a type of monetary fund.
FIST: (noun) a hand with the fingers closed.
FITS: (noun) plural of fit; seizures.
FIVE: (number) equivalent to 5.
FLAG: (noun) a piece of cloth bearing a design.
FLAK: (noun) criticism.
FLAP: (noun/verb) to move up and down.
FLAT: (adjective) level and even; without much relief.
FLAW: (noun) a fault or defect.
FLAX: (noun) a plant whose fibres are used to make linen.
FLEA: (noun) a small, wingless, parasitic insect.
FLED: (verb) past tense of flee.
FLEE: (verb) to run away from danger.
FLEW: (verb) past tense of fly.
FLEX: (verb/noun) to bend.
FLIP: (verb/noun) to turn over quickly.
FLOP: (verb/noun) to fail; a failure.
FLOR: (noun, abbreviation) Florida; floor.
FLOW: (verb/noun) to move steadily and continuously.
FLUE: (noun) a pipe or channel for smoke.
FLUX: (noun) a state of continuous change or movement.
FOAL: (noun) a young horse.
FOAM: (noun) a mass of bubbles.
FOCI: (noun) plural of focus; points of convergence.
FOES: (noun) plural of foe; enemies.
FOIL: (noun/verb) a thin sheet of metal; to prevent something from succeeding.
FOLD: (verb/noun) to bend or double something over; a bend or crease.
FOLK: (noun) people in general; a group of people sharing a common feature.
FOND: (adjective) having a liking for someone or something.
FONT: (noun) a typeface; a container for holy water.
FOOD: (noun) anything that people or animals eat or drink or that plants absorb to maintain life and growth.
FOOL: (noun/verb) a person who acts unwisely or without thought; to make a fool of.
FOOT: (noun) the lower extremity of a vertebrate's leg.
FORA: (noun) plural of forum; places of discussion or debate.
FORD: (noun/verb) to cross a river or stream at a shallow place.
FORE: (adjective/adverb) situated in front; before.
FORK: (noun) a tool for eating; a branching point.
FORM: (noun/verb) a type or kind; to shape or mold.
FORT: (noun) a fortified place.
FOSS: (noun) a ditch or trench.
FOUL: (adjective/noun/verb) offensive; something disgusting; to make unclean.
FOUR: (number) equivalent to 4.
FOWL: (noun) a bird, especially one raised for food.
FRAU: (noun) Mrs. (German).
FRAY: (noun/verb) to unravel or become worn; a fight or brawl.
FREE: (adjective/verb) not confined or under restraint; to release.
FRET: (verb) to worry; to wear away.
FROG: (noun) an amphibious animal.
FROM: (preposition) indicating the starting point of an action or process.
FUCK: (verb/noun/interjection, vulgar) to have sexual intercourse; an act of sexual intercourse; an exclamation of anger or frustration.
FUEL: (noun/verb) a material used to produce heat or power.
FUJI: (noun) Mount Fuji; also a brand name.
FULL: (adjective) containing as much as possible or as much as is needed; completely occupied.
FUME: (noun/verb) irritating smoke or gas.
FUND: (noun/verb) a sum of money saved or made available for a specific purpose.
FUNG: (noun) a fungus.
FUNK: (noun) a genre of music; a state of depression or low spirits.
FURS: (noun) plural of fur.
FURY: (noun) violent anger.
FUSE: (noun/verb) a safety device; to melt or join together.
FUSS: (noun/verb) needless worry or activity.
GAGE: (noun/verb) a pledge or security; to measure or judge.
GAIN: (noun/verb) an increase in something; to acquire something.
GAIT: (noun) a manner of walking or running.
GALA: (noun) a festive occasion or celebration.
GALE: (noun) a very strong wind.
GALL: (noun) bitterness; (verb) to annoy or irritate.
GAMA: (noun) a given name.
GAME: (noun) a form of play or competition.
GANG: (noun) a group of criminals or associates.
GAOL: (noun, British spelling) jail.
GAPS: (noun) plural of gap; spaces or openings.
GARB: (noun) clothing.
GASH: (noun/verb) a long, deep cut.
GASP: (verb/noun) to catch one's breath; a sudden intake of breath.
GATE: (noun) a barrier across an opening.
GAVE: (verb) past tense of give.
GAYS: (noun) plural of gay; homosexual men and women.
GAZE: (verb/noun) to look steadily and intently.
GEAR: (noun) equipment; the mechanism of a machine.
GELS: (noun) plural of gel; gelatinous substances.
GEMS: (noun) plural of gem; precious stones.
GENE: (noun) a unit of heredity.
GENS: (noun) plural of genus; kinds or types.
GENT: (noun, informal) a gentleman.
GERM: (noun) a microorganism.
GETS: (verb) third person singular present tense of get.
GHEE: (noun) clarified butter.
GIFT: (noun) something given voluntarily without payment.
GILA: (noun) a Gila monster; a river in the US.
GILL: (noun) a respiratory organ in fish.
GILT: (noun/adjective) gold leaf or paint; covered with gold.
GINN: (noun) a gin; a machine.
GIRL: (noun) a female child or young woman.
GIST: (noun) the main point or essence of something.
GIVE: (verb) to present or hand over something to someone.
GLAD: (adjective) feeling pleasure or happiness.
GLEE: (noun) great joy or delight.
GLEN: (noun) a small, secluded valley.
GLIA: (noun) supporting cells of the nervous system.
GLIB: (adjective) fluent and voluble but insincere and shallow.
GLOW: (noun/verb) a soft light.
GLUE: (noun/verb) an adhesive substance.
GLUM: (adjective) looking or appearing dejected or sulky.
GLUT: (noun/verb) an excessive supply; to supply with more than is needed.
GOAD: (noun/verb) a stick or rod used to prod cattle; to urge or prod.
GOAL: (noun) something that is aimed at; an objective.
GOAT: (noun) a hoofed mammal.
GODS: (noun) plural of god.
GOES: (verb) third-person singular present tense of go.
GOFF: (noun) a game, similar to golf.
GOLD: (noun/adjective) a precious metal.
GOLF: (noun) a game played on a course with clubs and balls.
GONE: (verb) past participle of go.
GONG: (noun) a large, flat metal disc that produces a resonant sound when struck.
GOOD: (adjective/noun) of a favorable character or tendency.
GORE: (noun) blood; (verb) to pierce or wound with a pointed object.
GORY: (adjective) involving or showing bloodshed or violence.
GOSH: (interjection) an exclamation of surprise or wonder.
GOSS: (noun) gossip.
GOUT: (noun) a disease affecting joints, characterized by sudden acute pain and inflammation.
GOWN: (noun) a woman's long dress; an academic robe.
GRAB: (verb/noun) to take or snatch something suddenly.
GRAD: (noun, abbreviation) graduate.
GRAM: (noun) a unit of mass.
GRAN: (noun, informal) grandmother.
GRAY: (adjective) of the colour between black and white.
GREW: (verb) past tense of grow.
GREY: (adjective) of the colour between black and white.
GRID: (noun) a network of lines or points; a system of distribution.
GRIM: (adjective) unpleasant; depressing; frightening.
GRIN: (verb/noun) to smile broadly.
GRIP: (verb/noun) to hold firmly; a firm hold.
GRIT: (noun) small particles of hard material; courage.
GROW: (verb) to increase in size or amount.
GRUB: (noun) larvae of insects; food.
GULF: (noun) a large bay or inlet.
GULL: (noun) a type of seabird; (verb) to trick or deceive.
GULP: (verb/noun) to swallow quickly or greedily.
GUMS: (noun) plural of gum; the fleshy tissue surrounding the teeth.
GUNS: (noun) plural of gun.
GURU: (noun) a spiritual teacher or guide.
GUSH: (verb/noun) to flow rapidly; a sudden flow.
GUST: (noun) a sudden, brief rush of wind or rain.
GUTS: (noun, informal) courage; intestines.
GUYS: (noun, informal) men.
GYRO: (noun) a type of food; a gyroscope.
HACK: (verb/noun) to cut or chop roughly; a skilled programmer.
HAIL: (noun/verb) frozen precipitation; to greet enthusiastically.
HAIR: (noun) a fine threadlike outgrowth of the epidermis of mammals, which grows from a follicle, and is made of keratin.
HAJI: (noun) a person who has made a pilgrimage to Mecca.
HAJJ: (noun) the Muslim pilgrimage to Mecca.
HALE: (adjective) healthy and strong.
HALF: (noun/adjective/adverb) one of two equal parts.
HALL: (noun) a large room or space.
HALO: (noun) a ring of light around the sun or moon; a circle of light.
HALT: (verb/noun) to stop; a stop.
HAMS: (noun) plural of ham.
HAND: (noun) the end part of a person's arm.
HANG: (verb) to suspend something from above.
HANK: (noun) a length of yarn or thread wound into a coil.
HARD: (adjective) firm or solid; difficult.
HARE: (noun) a type of rabbit.
HARK: (verb, archaic) to listen attentively.
HARM: (noun/verb) physical or emotional injury; to injure.
HARP: (noun) a large stringed instrument.
HART: (noun) an adult male deer.
HASH: (verb/noun) to chop finely; minced food.
HAST: (verb, archaic) second person singular present tense of have.
HATE: (verb/noun) to dislike intensely.
HATH: (verb, archaic) third person singular present tense of have.
HATS: (noun) plural of hat.
HAUL: (verb/noun) to pull or drag; a journey.
HAUT: (adjective, French) high.
HAVE: (verb) to possess something.
HAWK: (noun) a bird of prey.
HAYS: (noun) plural of hay; dried grass.
HAZE: (noun) a slight obscuring of the air.
HAZY: (adjective) slightly obscure or unclear.
HEAD: (noun) the upper part of the body.
HEAL: (verb) to make or become sound or healthy again.
HEAP: (noun/verb) a pile of things.
HEAR: (verb) to perceive sounds with the ear.
HEAT: (noun/verb) to make or become hot.
HECK: (interjection) an exclamation of anger or annoyance.
HEED: (verb) to pay attention to.
HEEL: (noun) the back part of the foot.
HEFT: (noun/verb) weight; to lift or carry.
HEIR: (noun) a person who inherits property or a title.
HELD: (verb) past tense of hold.
HELL: (noun) the place or state of the damned.
HELM: (noun) a steering mechanism for a ship or aircraft.
HELP: (verb/noun) to assist someone; assistance.
HEME: (noun) a chemical group found in hemoglobin.
HEMP: (noun) a plant used to make rope and fabric.
HENS: (noun) plural of hen; female birds.
HERB: (noun) a plant used for flavouring food or for medicinal purposes.
HERD: (noun/verb) a group of animals; to tend or guide animals.
HERE: (adverb) in or at this place.
HERO: (noun) a person who is admired for their courage, outstanding achievements, or noble qualities.
HERS: (pronoun) possessive form of she.
HEWN: (verb) past participle of hew; to cut or shape.
HICK: (noun, informal) a rural person.
HIDE: (verb/noun) to conceal; animal skin.
HIGH: (adjective/adverb) extending far upwards; at or to a great height.
HIKE: (noun/verb) a long walk in the countryside.
HILL: (noun) a raised area of land.
HILT: (noun) the handle of a sword or dagger.
HIND: (noun) a female deer; (adjective) at the rear.
HINT: (noun/verb) a subtle suggestion.
HIPS: (noun) plural of hip; the area of the body below the waist.
HIRE: (verb/noun) to employ someone; employment.
HISS: (verb/noun) to make a sibilant sound.
HIST: (interjection) an exclamation of warning or encouragement.
HITS: (noun) plural of hit; successful acts or events.
HIVE: (noun) a container for bees.
HOAR: (adjective) white or grey with age or frost.
HOAX: (noun/verb) a trick or deception.
HOCK: (noun) the joint between the knee and the hock (animal).
HOES: (noun) plural of hoe; gardening tools.
HOGG: (noun) a young sheep.
HOGS: (noun) plural of hog; pigs.
HOLD: (verb/noun) to grasp something tightly; a grip.
HOLE: (noun) an opening in a surface.
HOLM: (noun) a holm oak; a small island.
HOLM: (noun) a small island.
HOLY: (adjective) sacred or consecrated to God.
HOME: (noun/adverb) the house or place where a person lives.
HOMO: (noun, abbreviation) homosexual.
HONE: (verb/noun) to sharpen; a whetstone.
HONG: (noun) a port or harbor.
HONS: (noun, abbreviation) honors.
HOOD: (noun) a covering for the head; the part of a car over the engine.
HOOF: (noun) the horny covering of the foot of an ungulate.
HOOK: (noun/verb) a curved piece of metal; to catch or fasten with a hook.
HOOP: (noun) a ring-shaped object.
HOOT: (noun/verb) to utter a loud, harsh cry.
HOPE: (noun/verb) to wish for something to happen.
HOPS: (noun) a climbing plant; also a verb.
HORA: (noun) a type of dance.
HORN: (noun) a hard, pointed outgrowth on the head of some animals.
HORS: (noun, abbreviation) horses.
HOSE: (noun) a flexible pipe for conveying water.
HOST: (noun/verb) a person who entertains guests; to entertain guests.
HOUR: (noun) a period of sixty minutes.
HOVE: (verb, archaic) hovered; raised.
HOWE: (noun) a surname.
HOWL: (verb/noun) to make a long, loud, mournful cry.
HUBS: (noun) plural of hub; central points.
HUCK: (verb) to throw something.
HUES: (noun) plural of hue; shades of colour.
HUFF: (noun/verb) to puff out air angrily or forcefully.
HUGE: (adjective) extraordinarily large.
HUGS: (noun) plural of hug; embraces.
HULK: (noun) the body of a ship; a large, clumsy person.
HULL: (noun) the outer shell of a seed or fruit.
HUMP: (noun/verb) a rounded protuberance; to hunch up one's back.
HUNG: (verb) past tense of hang.
HUNK: (noun) a large, thick piece of something.
HUNS: (noun) a nomadic people of Central Asia.
HUNT: (verb/noun) to chase and kill wild animals.
HURL: (verb) to throw forcefully.
HURT: (verb/adjective) to inflict pain on; injured.
HUSH: (verb/noun) to make or become quiet.
HUSK: (noun) the dry outer covering of some seeds or fruits.
HUTS: (noun) plural of hut; small dwellings.
HYMN: (noun) a religious song.
HYPE: (noun/verb) exaggerated publicity; to promote something excessively.
HYPO: (noun, abbreviation) hypodermic injection.
IBIS: (noun) a type of bird.
ICED: (verb/adjective) past tense of ice; covered with ice.
ICES: (noun) plural of ice.
ICON: (noun) a religious painting or image.
IDEA: (noun) a thought or suggestion.
IDEE: (noun) idea (French).
IDEM: (adverb) the same (Latin).
IDLE: (adjective/verb) not active or working.
IDLY: (adverb) in an idle manner.
IDOL: (noun) an image or representation of a god, used as an object of worship.
ILIA: (noun) plural of ilium; bones of the pelvis.
ILLS: (noun) plural of ill; diseases.
IMAM: (noun) the leader of a mosque.
INCH: (noun) a unit of length.
INFO: (noun, abbreviation) information.
INGS: (noun) plural of ing; something that is in progress; meadows.
INKS: (noun) plural of ink.
INNS: (noun) plural of inn; hotels.
INTO: (preposition) expressing movement or direction towards the inside of something.
IONS: (noun) plural of ion; electrically charged atoms.
IOTA: (noun) a very small amount.
IRIS: (noun) the coloured part of the eye; a type of flower.
IRON: (noun/verb) a hard, strong metal; to press clothes with an iron.
ISLE: (noun) an island.
ITCH: (noun/verb) an uncomfortable sensation on the skin.
ITEM: (noun) an individual article or unit.
JACK: (noun) a mechanical device for lifting heavy objects.
JADE: (noun) a hard, green gemstone.
JAIL: (noun) a prison.
JAKE: (noun) a masculine given name.
JAMB: (noun) a vertical piece of timber or stone forming the side of a doorway or fireplace.
JAMS: (noun) plural of jam; preserves; traffic jams.
JANE: (noun) a feminine given name.
JAPS: (noun, offensive) Japanese people.
JARS: (noun) plural of jar; containers.
JAVA: (noun) a programming language; coffee.
JAWS: (noun) plural of jaw; the parts of the mouth.
JAZZ: (noun) a type of music.
JEAN: (noun) a type of trousers.
JEEP: (noun) a type of car.
JEFF: (noun) a masculine given name.
JERK: (noun/verb) a sudden, sharp movement.
JESS: (noun) a feminine given name.
JEST: (noun/verb) a joke; to joke.
JETS: (noun) plural of jet; aircraft; streams of liquid.
JEWS: (noun) Jewish people.
JILL: (noun) a feminine given name.
JOBS: (noun) plural of job.
JOCK: (noun, slang) a male athlete; (offensive slur) a Scottish person.
JOEY: (noun) a young kangaroo.
JOHN: (noun) a masculine given name.
JOIN: (verb) to connect or unite.
JOKE: (noun/verb) something said or done to evoke laughter.
JOLT: (noun/verb) a sudden violent shake or movement; to shake violently.
JONG: (noun) a type of musical instrument.
JOSH: (noun/verb) to tease; a joke.
JOUR: (noun, abbreviation) journal; journey.
JOYS: (noun) plural of joy.
JUDY: (noun) a feminine given name.
JUGS: (noun) plural of jug; containers.
JUMP: (verb/noun) to leap or spring.
JUNK: (noun) unwanted or discarded items; (slang) heroin.
JURA: (noun) a mountain range.
JURE: (verb) to swear; (noun) a jury.
JURY: (noun) a group of people sworn to give a verdict in a legal case.
JUST: (adverb/adjective) only; righteous.
JUTE: (noun) a strong fibre used to make sacks and rope.
KALE: (noun) a type of cabbage.
KALI: (noun) a Hindu goddess.
KAMA: (noun) love (Sanskrit).
KAMI: (noun) a Japanese god.
KANE: (noun) a given name.
KANG: (noun) a kangaroo.
KANT: (noun) referring to Immanuel Kant, a philosopher.
KARA: (noun) a feminine given name.
KEEL: (noun) the principal longitudinal structural member of a ship, running along its center line from stem to stern.
KEEN: (adjective) having or showing eagerness or enthusiasm.
KEEP: (verb) to continue to have or retain something.
KELP: (noun) a large brown seaweed.
KEMP: (noun) a given name.
KENT: (noun) a county in England.
KEPT: (verb) past tense of keep.
KERN: (verb) to adjust the spacing between characters.
KETO: (adjective, short form) ketogenic.
KEYS: (noun) plural of key; metal instruments for opening locks.
KHAN: (noun) a title of nobility in some Asian countries.
KICK: (noun/verb) a blow with the foot; to strike with the foot.
KIDS: (noun, informal) children.
KIEV: (noun) Kyiv, the capital of Ukraine.
KILL: (verb) to cause the death of (a person or animal).
KILN: (noun) an oven for firing pottery or bricks.
KILO: (noun/prefix) kilogram; kilometer.
KIND: (noun/adjective) a type or sort; benevolent or caring.
KING: (noun) a male monarch.
KINK: (noun) a twist or bend; a peculiar habit.
KINO: (noun) a type of movie theater.
KIRK: (noun) a church (Scottish).
KISS: (noun/verb) to touch with the lips.
KITE: (noun) a toy that flies in the wind.
KITS: (noun) plural of kit.
KIVA: (noun) a subterranean ceremonial chamber.
KNEE: (noun) the joint between the thigh and the lower leg.
KNEW: (verb) past tense of know.
KNIT: (verb) to make (a garment) by interlocking loops of yarn or thread.
KNOB: (noun) a rounded handle or protuberance.
KNOT: (noun/verb) a fastening made by looping or tying string or rope.
KNOW: (verb) to be aware of through observation, inquiry, or information.
KOHL: (noun) a black powder used as eye makeup.
KOLA: (noun) a type of nut.
KRIS: (noun) a dagger (Southeast Asian).
KYLE: (noun) a masculine given name.
LABS: (noun, abbreviation) laboratories.
LACE: (noun/verb) a delicate fabric; to fasten with a lace.
LACK: (noun/verb) the state of being without; to be without.
LACY: (adjective) made of or resembling lace.
LADS: (noun, informal) boys or young men.
LADY: (noun) a polite term for a woman.
LAGS: (noun) plural of lag; slow movements.
LAID: (verb) past tense of lay.
LAIN: (verb) past participle of lie (to recline).
LAIR: (noun) the resting place of a wild animal.
LAKE: (noun) a large body of water.
LAKH: (noun) 100,000 (Indian).
LAMA: (noun) a Buddhist monk; a llama.
LAMB: (noun) a young sheep.
LAME: (adjective) unable to walk well; weak or unsatisfactory.
LAMP: (noun) a device that produces light.
LANA: (noun) a feminine given name.
LAND: (noun/verb) the part of the earth's surface that is not covered by water; to come to earth from the air.
LANE: (noun) a narrow road.
LANG: (noun, abbreviation) language.
LAPS: (noun) plural of lap; a circuit; parts of the body.
LARD: (noun/verb) pig fat; to add lard to food.
LARK: (noun) a type of bird; a mischievous act.
LARS: (noun) a masculine given name.
LASH: (noun/verb) a whip; to strike with a whip.
LASS: (noun) a girl or young woman.
LAST: (adjective/noun/verb) final; to endure.
LATE: (adjective/adverb) after the expected or usual time.
LATH: (noun) a thin, narrow strip of wood.
LAUD: (verb) to praise highly.
LAVA: (noun) hot molten rock.
LAVE: (verb, archaic) to wash.
LAWN: (noun) an area of short, mown grass.
LAWS: (noun) plural of law.
LAYS: (noun) plural of lay; songs.
LAZY: (adjective) unwilling to work or use energy.
LEAD: (noun/verb) a heavy metal; to guide or direct.
LEAF: (noun) one of the flat, typically green parts of a plant.
LEAK: (noun/verb) an unintentional hole or crack; to escape through a hole.
LEAM: (verb, archaic) to shine; gleam.
LEAN: (adjective/verb) thin; to incline or bend.
LEAP: (verb/noun) to jump or spring.
LEAR: (noun) a given name.
LEAS: (noun) plural of lease; rentals.
LEER: (verb/noun) to look or glance in a lascivious or unpleasant manner.
LEES: (noun) sediment in a liquid.
LEFT: (adjective/adverb/noun) on, towards, or to the side of the body opposite to the right.
LEGS: (noun) plural of leg.
LEND: (verb) to give (something) temporarily to someone.
LENS: (noun) a piece of glass or other transparent material, shaped to converge or diverge light rays.
LENT: (verb) past tense of lend; (noun) a period of fasting.
LESS: (adverb/adjective) to a smaller extent.
LEST: (conjunction) in order to prevent something.
LETS: (verb) third-person singular present tense of let.
LEVY: (noun/verb) to impose a tax or fee; a tax or fee.
LEWD: (adjective) sexually suggestive or explicit.
LIAR: (noun) a person who tells lies.
LIAS: (noun) a type of clay.
LICE: (noun) plural of louse; small parasitic insects.
LICK: (verb/noun) to pass the tongue over; a single stroke of the tongue.
LIDS: (noun) plural of lid; covers.
LIED: (verb) past tense of lie (to tell falsehoods).
LIEN: (noun) a right to keep possession of property belonging to another person until a debt owed by that person is discharged.
LIES: (noun) plural of lie; false statements; also a verb.
LIEU: (noun) instead.
LIFE: (noun) the condition that distinguishes animals and plants from inorganic matter, including the capacity for growth, reproduction, functional activity, and continual change preceding death.
LIFT: (verb/noun) to raise; to raise something.
LIKE: (verb/preposition/adjective) to find someone or something pleasing or attractive; similar or alike.
LILY: (noun) a type of flower.
LIMA: (noun) a city in Peru; a type of bean.
LIMB: (noun) an arm or leg; a branch of a tree.
LIME: (noun) a type of fruit; calcium oxide.
LIMO: (noun, slang) limousine.
LIMP: (adjective/verb) lacking firmness; to walk haltingly.
LIND: (noun) a linden tree.
LINE: (noun/verb) a long, thin mark; to mark with a line.
LING: (noun) a type of fish; heather.
LINK: (noun/verb) a connection between things.
LINN: (noun) a waterfall.
LINT: (noun) fluff from cloth.
LION: (noun) a large, powerful cat.
LIPS: (noun) plural of lip; the fleshy folds surrounding the mouth.
LIRA: (noun) a former monetary unit.
LIRE: (noun) a former monetary unit.
LISP: (noun/verb) a speech impediment.
LIST: (noun/verb) a series of things written or printed.
LITE: (adjective) light (alternative spelling of 'light').
LIVE: (verb/adjective) to be alive; living.
LOAD: (noun/verb) a heavy weight; to load something.
LOAF: (noun) a shaped mass of bread.
LOAM: (noun) a fertile soil.
LOAN: (noun) a sum of money lent at interest.
LOBE: (noun) a rounded projection or division of an organ.
LOCH: (noun) a lake (Scottish).
LOCI: (noun) plural of locus; points or places.
LOCK: (noun/verb) a fastening device; to fasten.
LOCO: (adjective/noun, slang) crazy; a locomotive.
LODE: (noun) a vein or deposit of ore.
LOFT: (noun) a room or space under a roof.
LOGO: (noun) a symbol or design used by an organization.
LOGS: (noun) plural of log.
LOIN: (noun) the part of the body on either side of the spine between the ribs and the hip.
LOMA: (noun) a hill (Spanish).
LOME: (noun) a city in Togo.
LONE: (adjective) solitary; single.
LONG: (adjective/adverb) having considerable extent from one end to the other.
LOOK: (verb/noun) to direct one's gaze; a glance.
LOOM: (noun/verb) a machine for weaving cloth; to appear vaguely.
LOON: (noun) a type of bird; a crazy person.
LOOP: (noun/verb) a circular or oval shape; to form a loop.
LOOS: (noun, abbreviation) lavatories.
LOOT: (noun/verb) stolen goods; to steal.
LOPE: (verb/noun) to run at a steady, easy pace.
LORD: (noun) a man who has power, authority, or status; a nobleman; God.
LORE: (noun) traditional knowledge or beliefs.
LOSE: (verb) to be deprived of; to fail to win.
LOSS: (noun) the fact or process of losing something.
LOST: (verb) past tense of lose.
LOTH: (adjective, archaic) reluctant.
LOTS: (noun) plural of lot; a large number.
LOUD: (adjective) making a lot of noise.
LOVE: (noun/verb) a strong affection.
LOWE: (noun) a given name.
LOWS: (noun) plural of low; opposite of highs; lows in stock market.
LUCE: (noun) a type of fish.
LUCK: (noun) success or failure apparently brought by chance rather than through one's own actions.
LUKE: (noun) a masculine given name.
LULL: (noun/verb) a period of calm or quiet.
LULU: (noun) a remarkable or unusual person or thing.
LUMP: (noun/verb) a piece of a substance; to form into a lump.
LUNA: (noun) the moon; a feminine given name.
LUNG: (noun) each of the pair of organs situated within the rib cage, consisting of elastic sacs with branching passages into which air is drawn, so that oxygen can pass into the blood and carbon dioxide be removed.
LURE: (noun/verb) something that attracts or tempts.
LURK: (verb) to lie hidden or in wait.
LUSH: (adjective) luxuriantly attractive.
LUST: (noun) intense sexual desire.
LUTE: (noun) a stringed instrument.
LUTZ: (noun) a type of jump in figure skating.
LYME: (noun) Lyme disease.
LYNX: (noun) a type of wild cat.
LYRE: (noun) a type of ancient stringed instrument.
MAAS: (noun) a river in the Netherlands.
MACE: (noun) a heavy club; a spice.
MACH: (noun/adjective) Mach number (speed); relating to speed.
MACK: (noun) a masculine given name.
MADE: (verb) past tense of make.
MAGE: (noun) a magician or sorcerer.
MAGI: (noun) plural of magus; wise men.
MAHA: (noun) a given name.
MAID: (noun) a young woman.
MAIL: (noun/verb) letters or packages; to send mail.
MAIN: (adjective) principal or most important.
MAIR: (noun) more (Scottish).
MAKE: (verb) to create or produce something.
MALA: (noun) a type of prayer beads.
MALE: (noun/adjective) a man or boy; masculine.
MALI: (noun) a country in West Africa.
MALL: (noun) a large, covered shopping center.
MALT: (noun) barley that has been steeped in water and allowed to germinate.
MAMA: (noun) mother.
MANA: (noun) supernatural power (Polynesian).
MANE: (noun) the long hair on the neck of a horse or lion.
MANI: (noun) a feminine given name.
MANO: (noun) a given name; hand (Spanish).
MANS: (noun) plural of manse; a house.
MANY: (adjective/pronoun) a large number of.
MAPS: (noun) plural of map.
MARA: (noun) a feminine given name.
MARC: (noun) a masculine given name; a unit of mass.
MARE: (noun) a female horse.
MARK: (noun/verb) a visible sign or indication; to make a mark.
MARL: (noun) a mixture of clay and sand.
MARS: (noun) the planet fourth in order from the sun.
MART: (noun) a market.
MARY: (noun) a feminine given name.
MASH: (verb/noun) to crush or pulverize; a crushed mixture.
MASK: (noun/verb) a covering for the face; to conceal.
MASS: (noun) a large amount of something; a religious service.
MAST: (noun) a tall upright pole supporting sails on a ship.
MATE: (noun/verb) a companion or friend.
MATH: (noun) mathematics.
MATS: (noun) plural of mat; floor coverings.
MATT: (noun) a masculine given name.
MAUD: (noun) a feminine given name.
MAWR: (noun, Welsh) more.
MAYA: (noun) Mayan civilization; a feminine given name.
MAYO: (noun) mayonnaise.
MAYS: (noun) plural of May; months.
MAZE: (noun) a confusing network of interconnecting paths.
MEAD: (noun) an alcoholic drink made with honey.
MEAL: (noun) a portion of food eaten at one time.
MEAN: (adjective/verb) unkind or nasty; to intend or signify.
MEAT: (noun) the flesh of animals used as food.
MEEK: (adjective) quiet and gentle.
MEER: (noun) a lake; a boundary.
MEET: (verb) to encounter or come across someone or something.
MEGA: (prefix) large; million.
MEIN: (adjective, German) my.
MELT: (verb) to make or become liquid.
MEME: (noun) a unit of cultural information spread by imitation.
MEMO: (noun) a short written message.
MEMS: (noun, abbreviation) microelectromechanical systems.
MEND: (verb) to repair something that is broken.
MENG: (noun) a given name.
MENT: (verb, abbreviation) mentioned; meant.
MENU: (noun) a list of dishes available in a restaurant.
MERE: (adjective) being nothing more than; only.
MESA: (noun) an isolated flat-topped elevation.
MESH: (noun/verb) material made of interwoven threads.
MESS: (noun/verb) a disorderly state.
META: (prefix) beyond; referring to meta-analysis.
METH: (noun, slang) methamphetamine.
METS: (noun) New York Mets; also a verb.
MICA: (noun) a mineral.
MICE: (noun) plural of mouse.
MICH: (noun) Michigan.
MICK: (noun, offensive) an Irishman.
MIDI: (adjective) medium-sized.
MIEN: (noun) a person's appearance or manner.
MIHI: (pronoun) to me (Latin).
MIKE: (noun) a microphone; a given name.
MILD: (adjective) gentle or moderate; not strong or extreme.
MILE: (noun) a unit of distance.
MILK: (noun) a white liquid produced by mammary glands of mammals.
MILL: (noun) a building where grain is ground into flour.
MILO: (noun) a given name.
MIME: (noun/verb) a type of performance.
MINA: (noun) a feminine given name.
MIND: (noun/verb) the element of a person that enables them to be aware of the world and their experiences; to care about or object to.
MINE: (noun/pronoun) a place where minerals are extracted from the earth; belonging to me.
MING: (noun) a given name; a type of pottery.
MINI: (adjective/prefix) small; miniature.
MINK: (noun) a type of mammal.
MINT: (noun) a plant; a place where coins are made.
MIRE: (noun/verb) deep mud; to get stuck in mud.
MIRO: (noun) referring to Joan Miró, an artist.
MISE: (noun) a legal action (archaic).
MISS: (noun/verb) a title of address for an unmarried woman; to fail to hit or reach.
MIST: (noun) a light rain.
MITE: (noun) a small arachnid.
MITT: (noun) a glove; a mitt in baseball.
MOAN: (noun/verb) a low, mournful cry.
MOAT: (noun) a deep, wide ditch, typically filled with water, surrounding a castle or other fortified place.
MOBY: (noun) referring to Moby Dick, a novel.
MOCK: (verb/adjective) to make fun of; false or imitation.
MODE: (noun) a way or manner of doing something.
MOHR: (noun) a given name.
MOLD: (noun/verb) a shape or form; to shape or form.
MOLE: (noun) a small, burrowing mammal; a spot on the skin.
MOLL: (noun) a woman (slang).
MOLT: (verb) to shed or cast off (hair, skin, or feathers).
MOMS: (noun) plural of mom.
MONA: (noun) a feminine given name.
MONK: (noun) a member of a religious order who lives in a monastery.
MONO: (prefix) single; one.
MONS: (noun) a mountain or hill.
MOOD: (noun) a temporary state of mind or feeling.
MOON: (noun) the natural satellite of the earth.
MOOR: (noun/verb) a bog or marsh; to secure (a ship).
MOOT: (adjective/verb) open to discussion or debate.
MORA: (noun) a feminine given name.
MORE: (adjective/adverb/pronoun) a greater or additional amount.
MORN: (noun, archaic) morning.
MORT: (noun, archaic) death.
MOSS: (noun) a flowerless plant of a group that typically grows in damp or shady places.
MOST: (adjective/adverb/pronoun) the greatest in quantity, amount, or degree.
MOTE: (noun) a small speck or particle of dust or dirt.
MOTH: (noun) an insect with large wings.
MOTS: (noun, abbreviation) mots justes; precise words.
MOTT: (noun) a given name.
MOVE: (verb/noun) to change position; a change of position.
MUCH: (adjective/adverb/pronoun) a large quantity or amount.
MUCK: (noun/verb) manure; to soil or mess.
MUGS: (noun) plural of mug.
MUIR: (noun) a given name; a moor.
MULE: (noun) an animal that is a hybrid between a horse and a donkey.
MULL: (verb) to think over carefully.
MUNI: (noun, abbreviation) municipal.
MUON: (noun) an elementary particle.
MUSE: (verb/noun) to think deeply; a source of inspiration.
MUSH: (noun/verb) soft, pulpy food; to make into a pulp.
MUSK: (noun) a strong-smelling substance used in perfumes.
MUST: (verb/modal) expressing necessity.
MUTE: (adjective/noun/verb) without sound; a person who cannot speak; to silence.
MYTH: (noun) a traditional story, especially one concerning the early history of a people or explaining some natural or social phenomenon, and typically involving supernatural beings or events.
NACH: (noun, German) night.
NADA: (noun) nothing (Spanish).
NAGA: (noun) a type of snake.
NAIL: (noun/verb) a thin, pointed piece of metal used to fasten things together.
NAME: (noun/verb) a word or set of words by which a person, animal, place, or thing is known, addressed, or referred to.
NANA: (noun) grandmother.
NANG: (noun) a type of drug.
NAPA: (noun) Napa Valley.
NAPE: (noun) the back of the neck.
NAPS: (noun) plural of nap; short sleeps.
NAVE: (noun) the central part of a church.
NAVY: (noun) a country's fleet of warships.
NAZI: (noun) a member of the Nazi Party.
NEAL: (noun) a masculine given name.
NEAR: (adjective/adverb/preposition) close or nearby.
NEAT: (adjective) clean and tidy.
NECK: (noun) the part of the body connecting the head to the torso.
NEED: (noun/verb) something that is necessary or required.
NEON: (noun) a chemical element.
NESS: (suffix) forming nouns.
NEST: (noun) a structure built by a bird for its eggs or young.
NETS: (noun) plural of net.
NEVI: (noun) plural of nevus; birthmarks.
NEWS: (noun) new information.
NEWT: (noun) a type of amphibian.
NEXT: (adjective/adverb) immediately following.
NICE: (adjective) pleasant or agreeable.
NICK: (noun/verb) a small cut or scratch; to steal.
NIGH: (adverb/adjective, archaic) near; close.
NILS: (noun) plural of nil; nothing.
NINE: (number) equivalent to 9.
NISI: (adverb, Latin) unless.
NOAH: (noun) a Biblical figure.
NODE: (noun) a point where something branches or divides.
NODS: (noun) plural of nod.
NOEL: (noun) Christmas.
NOIR: (adjective) black (French); film noir.
NOME: (noun) a place name; a scientific term.
NONE: (pronoun) not one.
NOOK: (noun) a sheltered corner or recess.
NOON: (noun) midday.
NOPE: (adverb, informal) no.
NORM: (noun) a standard or pattern.
NOSE: (noun) the part of the face above the mouth.
NOTE: (noun/verb) a brief record of something; to observe.
NOUN: (noun) a word denoting a person, animal, place, thing, or idea.
NOUS: (noun) intellect or understanding.
NOVA: (noun) a star that suddenly increases greatly in brightness.
NUDE: (adjective/noun) naked; a naked person.
NULL: (adjective/noun) having no value or effect; a null value.
NUMB: (adjective/verb) devoid of feeling.
NUNS: (noun) plural of nun; women devoted to religious life.
NURS: (noun, abbreviation) nurses.
NUTS: (noun) plural of nut; seeds.

OAKS: (noun) plural of oak; a type of tree.
OARS: (noun) plural of oar; paddles.
OATH: (noun) a solemn promise.
OATS: (noun) plural of oat; a type of grain.
OBEY: (verb) to comply with a command or request.
OBOE: (noun) a woodwind instrument.
ODDS: (noun) plural of odd; chances or probabilities.
ODES: (noun) plural of ode; lyric poems.
ODOR: (noun) a distinctive smell, especially an unpleasant one.
OFFS: (noun, abbreviation) offsets.
OGRE: (noun) a monster or giant.
OHMS: (noun) plural of ohm; units of electrical resistance.
OILS: (noun) plural of oil.
OILY: (adjective) covered or greasy with oil.
OKAY: (adverb, informal) acceptable; all right.
OLDS: (noun) plural of old; older people.
OMEN: (noun) a sign or warning of something about to happen.
OMER: (noun) a unit of capacity (Biblical).
OMIT: (verb) to leave out or exclude something.
ONCE: (adverb) one time only; formerly.
ONES: (noun) plural of one.
ONLY: (adverb/adjective) and no one or nothing more; being the sole example.
ONTO: (preposition) onto something.
ONUS: (noun) something that is one's duty or responsibility.
OOZE: (noun/verb) a soft, wet mud; to seep slowly.
OPAL: (noun) a gemstone.
OPEN: (adjective/verb) not closed or shut.
OPUS: (noun) a work, especially a musical composition (Latin).
ORAL: (adjective) spoken rather than written.
ORES: (noun) plural of ore; minerals.
ORGY: (noun) a wild, uncontrolled celebration.
OTTO: (noun) a given name.
OUCH: (interjection) expressing pain.
OURS: (pronoun) possessive form of we.
OUST: (verb) to remove or force someone from a position of power.
OUTS: (noun) the outside; (slang) outs in baseball.
OVAL: (adjective/noun) egg-shaped; an oval shape.
OVEN: (noun) a heated chamber for cooking food.
OVER: (adverb/preposition) above or across; finished.
OVUM: (noun) a female reproductive cell or egg.
OWED: (verb) past tense of owe.
OWES: (verb) third-person singular present tense of owe.
OWLS: (noun) plural of owl; a type of bird.
OWNS: (verb) third-person singular present tense of own.
OXEN: (noun) plural of ox; cattle.
PACE: (noun/verb) a single step; to walk at a steady pace.
PACK: (noun/verb) a collection of things; to pack something.
PACO: (noun) a given name.
PACS: (noun, abbreviation) Pacific.
PACT: (noun) a formal agreement or treaty.
PADS: (noun) plural of pad; cushions; pads in sports.
PAGE: (noun) a sheet of paper in a book or document.
PAID: (verb) past tense of pay.
PAIL: (noun) a bucket.
PAIN: (noun) an unpleasant sensation; suffering.
PAIR: (noun/verb) two things of the same kind; to pair things.
PAIS: (noun) peace (French).
PALE: (adjective/verb) lacking color or brightness; to become pale.
PALL: (noun) a cloth covering for a coffin; (verb) to lose interest or appeal.
PALM: (noun) a type of tree; the inner surface of the hand.
PALS: (noun, informal) friends.
PANE: (noun) a section of glass in a window.
PANG: (noun) a sudden sharp feeling of pain or distress.
PANS: (noun) plural of pan.
PANT: (verb/noun) to breathe rapidly; rapid breathing.
PAPA: (noun) father.
PARA: (prefix) beyond; beside.
PARE: (verb) to trim or cut something.
PARK: (noun/verb) an area of land preserved for recreation; to park something.
PARR: (noun) a young salmon.
PARS: (noun) plural of par; a standard value.
PART: (noun/verb) a piece or component; to separate.
PASS: (verb/noun) to go or move past; a permit or certificate.
PAST: (adjective/noun/adverb/preposition) relating to a former time; history; earlier than; past something.
PATE: (noun, archaic) head.
PATH: (noun) a track or route.
PATS: (noun) plural of pat; light strokes.
PAUL: (noun) a masculine given name.
PAVE: (verb) to cover a surface with stones or concrete.
PAWN: (noun/verb) a chess piece; to pledge something as security for a loan.
PAWS: (noun) plural of paw; the feet of an animal.
PAYS: (verb) third-person singular present tense of pay.
PEAK: (noun) the pointed top of a mountain.
PEAL: (noun/verb) a loud ringing of bells.
PEAR: (noun) a type of fruit.
PEAS: (noun) plural of pea; a type of vegetable.
PEAT: (noun) a dark-brown soil material formed by the partial decomposition of plant matter.
PECK: (noun/verb) a unit of dry measure; to strike repeatedly.
PEEK: (verb/noun) to look quickly and secretly.
PEEL: (verb/noun) to remove the skin of a fruit or vegetable.
PEEP: (verb/noun) to look or peer closely.
PEER: (noun/verb) a person of equal standing; to look closely.
PEGS: (noun) plural of peg; pins; also, a verb.
PELL: (noun) a skin; a pelt.
PELT: (verb/noun) to strike repeatedly; a skin or hide.
PENS: (noun) plural of pen.
PENT: (adjective, archaic) confined; enclosed.
PERE: (noun) father (French).
PERI: (noun) a supernatural being in Persian mythology.
PERM: (noun, slang) a permanent wave; a permit.
PERT: (adjective) bold; lively; cheeky.
PESO: (noun) a monetary unit in several countries.
PEST: (noun) an annoying or troublesome person or thing; a harmful insect.
PETS: (noun) plural of pet.
PEWS: (noun) plural of pew; seats in a church.
PICA: (noun) a type of typeface; a medical condition.
PICK: (verb/noun) to choose; a tool for digging.
PIED: (adjective) having patches of different colours.
PIER: (noun) a structure extending from the shore into the water.
PIES: (noun) plural of pie.
PIET: (noun) piety.
PIGS: (noun) plural of pig.
PIKE: (noun) a type of fish; a pointed weapon.
PILE: (noun/verb) a heap of things; to heap something.
PILL: (noun) a small, rounded dose of medicine.
PIMA: (noun) a type of cotton; a Native American tribe.
PIMP: (noun/verb, vulgar) a person who procures prostitutes; to exploit or promote.
PINE: (noun) a type of evergreen tree.
PING: (noun/verb) a short, high-pitched sound.
PINK: (adjective/noun) of a light red color.
PINS: (noun) plural of pin; small, thin pieces of metal.
PINT: (noun) a unit of liquid measure.
PION: (noun) a type of subatomic particle.
PIPE: (noun) a tube for conveying liquids or gases.
PISS: (noun/verb, vulgar) urine; to urinate.
PITH: (noun) the soft, spongy central part of a plant stem.
PITS: (noun) plural of pit; holes; also a verb.
PITY: (noun/verb) a feeling of sorrow or compassion.
PLAN: (noun/verb) a scheme or method; to devise a scheme.
PLAT: (noun) a flat, level area; a braid of hair.
PLAY: (verb/noun) to engage in games; a theatrical performance.
PLEA: (noun) a request made earnestly.
PLOT: (noun/verb) a secret plan; to plan secretly.
PLOW: (noun/verb) a tool for tilling land; to till land.
PLOY: (noun) a tactic or strategy.
PLUG: (noun/verb) a device to block a hole; to block something.
PLUM: (noun) a type of fruit; (adjective, informal) excellent.
PLUS: (preposition/conjunction/noun) added to; in addition to; a plus sign.
POCO: (adverb, Italian) little; a little.
PODS: (noun) plural of pod; seed cases.
POEM: (noun) a piece of literature written in verse.
POET: (noun) a writer of poems.
POKE: (verb/noun) to prod or push; a pointed stick.
POLE: (noun) a long, slender, rod-shaped object; the North or South Pole.
POLK: (noun) a given name.
POLL: (noun/verb) a survey of public opinion; to conduct a poll.
POLO: (noun) a sport played on horseback.
POLY: (prefix) many; polymer.
POMP: (noun) ceremony and splendid display.
POND: (noun) a small body of still water.
PONG: (noun) a game; (verb) to produce a bad smell.
PONS: (noun) plural of pons; part of the brainstem.
PONT: (noun) a bridge (French).
PONY: (noun) a small horse.
POOH: (interjection) expressing contempt or disbelief.
POOL: (noun) a small body of still water; a shared sum of money.
POOP: (noun, vulgar) excrement.
POOR: (adjective) lacking sufficient money; of low quality.
POPE: (noun) the head of the Roman Catholic Church.
POPS: (noun) plural of pop; fizzy drinks.
PORE: (noun) a tiny opening in the skin; (verb) to read carefully.
PORK: (noun) the flesh of a pig, used as food.
PORN: (noun, slang) pornography.
PORT: (noun) a harbor; a type of wine.
POSE: (verb/noun) to assume a particular attitude or stance.
POSH: (adjective) elegant or luxurious.
POST: (noun/verb) a position or job; to send or publish.
POTS: (noun) plural of pot.
POUR: (verb) to flow rapidly.
POWS: (noun, abbreviation) prisoners of war.
PRAY: (verb) to address God in prayer.
PREM: (noun, abbreviation) premium; premier.
PREP: (verb/noun, informal) prepare; preparation.
PREY: (noun/verb) an animal hunted or killed by another; to hunt or kill.
PRIM: (adjective) formal or stiff.
PROB: (noun, abbreviation) problem; probability.
PROD: (verb/noun) to poke or jab; a pointed stick.
PROF: (noun, abbreviation) professor.
PROG: (noun, abbreviation) program.
PROM: (noun, abbreviation) prom; promenade.
PROP: (noun/verb) something that supports or holds something up.
PROS: (noun, abbreviation) professionals; advantages.
PROW: (noun) the front of a ship.
PUBS: (noun) plural of pub; public houses.
PUCK: (noun) a mischievous sprite; a hockey disc.
PUFF: (noun/verb) a short burst of smoke; to inflate or swell.
PUGH: (noun) a surname.
PUJA: (noun) a Hindu religious ceremony.
PULL: (verb/noun) to draw or tug.
PULP: (noun) soft, wet mass.
PUMP: (noun/verb) a device for moving liquids.
PUNK: (noun) a young hooligan; a genre of music.
PUNS: (noun) plural of pun; jokes using words with multiple meanings.
PUNT: (noun/verb) a type of flat-bottomed boat; to kick a ball.
PUNY: (adjective) small and weak.
PUPS: (noun) plural of pup; young dogs.
PURE: (adjective) free from contaminants.
PURI: (noun) a type of bread.
PUSH: (verb/noun) to exert force on something.
PUTS: (noun) plural of put; actions.
PUTT: (noun/verb) a short stroke in golf.
PYRE: (noun) a pile of combustible material, especially one for burning a corpse.
QUAD: (noun/adjective) quadrangle; four.
QUAI: (noun) a wharf or quay.
QUAY: (noun) a wharf or reinforced bank beside a body of water.
QUID: (noun, British slang) a pound.
QUIN: (noun) a quintet.
QUIT: (verb) to stop doing something.
QUIZ: (noun/verb) a test; to question someone.
QUOD: (noun, archaic) because.
RABI: (noun) a rabbi.
RACE: (noun/verb) a competition; to run or compete.
RACK: (noun) a framework for storing things.
RADS: (noun, abbreviation) rads; units of radiation.
RAFT: (noun) a floating platform.
RAGA: (noun) a melodic pattern in Indian music.
RAGE: (noun/verb) violent anger; to be angry.
RAGS: (noun) plural of rag; scraps of cloth.
RAID: (noun/verb) a sudden attack.
RAIL: (noun/verb) a horizontal bar; to travel by train.
RAIN: (noun/verb) water falling from the sky.
RAJA: (noun) a king or prince (Indian).
RAKE: (noun/verb) a garden tool; to gather or collect.
RAMI: (noun) a type of fiber.
RAMP: (noun) an inclined plane.
RAMS: (noun) plural of ram; male sheep.
RANA: (noun) a feminine given name.
RAND: (noun) a monetary unit in South Africa.
RANG: (verb) past tense of ring (to sound).
RANI: (noun) a queen (Indian).
RANK: (noun/verb) a position or status; to be positioned.
RANT: (noun/verb) a loud, angry speech.
RAPE: (noun/verb) sexual assault.
RAPT: (adjective) completely fascinated or absorbed.
RARE: (adjective) not common; unusual.
RASH: (adjective/noun) reckless; a skin eruption.
RATA: (noun) a feminine given name.
RATE: (noun/verb) a measure, quantity, or frequency; to assess or estimate.
RATH: (noun) a building (Irish).
RATS: (noun) plural of rat; rodents.
RAVE: (noun/verb) a party; to talk wildly.
RAYS: (noun) plural of ray; beams of light; also, fish.
READ: (verb) to look at and comprehend the meaning of written or printed matter.
REAL: (adjective) actually existing or occurring.
REAP: (verb) to cut or gather a crop.
REAR: (noun/verb/adjective) the back part; to raise or cultivate; at the back.
REDE: (noun, archaic) counsel or advice.
REDO: (verb) to do something again.
REDS: (noun) plural of red; communist.
REED: (noun) a tall, slender grass.
REEF: (noun) a ridge of rocks or sand.
REEL: (noun/verb) a cylinder for winding thread; to be unsteady.
REES: (noun) plural of ree; a type of bird.
REFS: (noun, slang) referees.
REIN: (noun/verb) a strap for controlling a horse; to control.
REIS: (noun) a former monetary unit in Portugal.
RELY: (verb) to depend on someone or something.
REND: (verb) to tear violently.
RENT: (noun/verb) money paid for the use of property.
REPS: (noun, abbreviation) representatives.
REST: (noun/verb) a state of inactivity; to cease activity.
RHEA: (noun) a type of bird.
RIBS: (noun) plural of rib; bones in the chest.
RICE: (noun) a type of grain.
RICH: (adjective) possessing great wealth; abundant.
RICK: (noun) a stack of hay or straw.
RIDE: (verb/noun) to sit on and control a moving vehicle.
RIFE: (adjective) prevalent or widespread.
RIFT: (noun) a crack or split.
RIG: (verb/noun) to manipulate or control dishonestly; a piece of equipment.
RIME: (noun) frost.
RIMS: (noun) plural of rim; edges.
RIND: (noun) the outer covering of something, such as the skin of fruit or cheese.
RING: (noun/verb) a circular band; to sound a bell.
RINK: (noun) an ice rink; a skating rink.
RIOT: (noun/verb) a violent public disturbance.
RIPE: (adjective) fully developed; ready for harvest.
RISE: (verb/noun) to get up from a lying or sitting posture; to increase in number or level.
RISK: (noun/verb) a chance of loss or injury; to put something at risk.
RITE: (noun) a religious ceremony or practice.
RITZ: (noun) luxury and elegance.
ROAD: (noun) a public thoroughfare.
ROAM: (verb) to wander freely.
ROAN: (adjective) of a horse, having a coat of mixed white and other coloured hairs.
ROAR: (verb/noun) to make a loud, deep sound.
ROBE: (noun) a long, loose outer garment.
ROBS: (verb) third-person singular present tense of rob.
ROCK: (noun/verb) a hard mineral substance; to shake or move back and forth.
RODE: (verb) past tense of ride.
RODS: (noun) plural of rod; long, thin sticks.
ROLE: (noun) a part played by an actor; a function or duty.
ROLF: (noun) a given name.
ROLL: (verb/noun) to turn or move in a circular direction; a roll of paper.
ROMA: (noun) Rome (Italian).
ROMS: (noun) read-only memory (computer); also a verb.
ROOD: (noun) a unit of area; a crucifix.
ROOF: (noun) the structure forming the upper covering of a building.
ROOK: (noun) a type of bird; a chess piece.
ROOM: (noun) a space within a building, enclosed by walls, floor, and ceiling.
ROOS: (noun) plural of roo; kangaroos.
ROOT: (noun) the part of a plant that attaches it to the ground.
ROPE: (noun) a strong thick cord made of twisted fibers.
RORY: (noun) a given name.
ROSE: (noun) a type of flower; past tense of rise.
ROSY: (adjective) rose-colored; cheerful.
ROTE: (noun) memorizing by repetition; routine.
ROUT: (noun/verb) a defeat; to defeat decisively.
ROUX: (noun) a cooked mixture of butter and flour.
ROWS: (noun) plural of row; lines; also a verb.
RUBS: (verb) third person singular present tense of rub; also a noun.
RUBY: (noun) a precious red gemstone.
RUDD: (noun) a type of fish.
RUDE: (adjective) offensively impolite or ill-mannered.
RUFF: (noun) a frill or pleated strip of fabric.
RUGS: (noun) plural of rug; floor coverings.
RUIN: (noun/verb) destruction or devastation; to destroy.
RULE: (noun/verb) a regulation or guideline; to govern or control.
RUMP: (noun) the buttocks; the hindquarters of an animal.
RUNG: (noun/verb) a rung of a ladder; past tense of ring (to sound a bell).
RUNS: (verb) third-person singular present tense of run; scores.
RUSE: (noun) a trick or stratagem.
RUSH: (noun/verb) a sudden, hurried movement; to rush something.
RUSK: (noun) a type of biscuit.
RUST: (noun/verb) a reddish coating formed on iron.
RUTH: (noun) a feminine given name.
RUTS: (noun) plural of rut; grooves in a road.

SACK: (noun/verb) a large bag made of strong material; to dismiss from employment.
SACS: (noun) plural of sac; bags.
SADE: (noun) referring to the Marquis de Sade, an author.
SAFE: (adjective/noun) protected from harm or danger.
SAGA: (noun) a long story or legend.
SAGE: (noun/adjective) a wise person; wise.
SAGO: (noun) a starch obtained from certain palm trees.
SAID: (verb) past tense of say.
SAIL: (noun/verb) a piece of fabric used to propel a ship.
SAKE: (noun) for the sake of; a type of Japanese rice wine.
SALE: (noun) the exchange of a commodity for money; a bargain or discount.
SALT: (noun) a white crystalline substance.
SAMA: (noun) a given name; sir or madam (Japanese).
SAME: (adjective/pronoun) identical; similar.
SAMS: (noun) plural of Sam; a given name.
SAND: (noun) fine particles of rock.
SANE: (adjective) of sound mind; reasonable.
SANG: (verb) past tense of sing.
SANK: (verb) past tense of sink.
SANS: (preposition) without (French).
SANT: (noun) a saint (Spanish).
SARI: (noun) a garment worn by women in India.
SARS: (noun) severe acute respiratory syndrome.
SASH: (noun) a long strip of fabric worn around the waist.
SATI: (noun) sati; a ritual suicide.
SAUL: (noun) a masculine given name (Biblical).
SAVE: (verb) to rescue from harm; to keep or store.
SAWN: (verb) past participle of saw.
SAWS: (noun) plural of saw.
SAYS: (verb) third person singular present tense of say.
SCAB: (noun) a protective crust over a sore.
SCAM: (noun) a fraudulent scheme.
SCAN: (verb/noun) to examine or inspect closely; a scan in medicine.
SCAR: (noun) a mark left on the skin after an injury has healed.
SCOT: (noun) a Scottish person.
SCUM: (noun) the unpleasant matter that forms on the surface of a liquid.
SEAL: (noun/verb) a sea mammal; to close securely.
SEAM: (noun) a line of stitching; a joint or fissure.
SEAN: (noun) a given name.
SEAS: (noun) plural of sea.
SEAT: (noun/verb) a place to sit; to seat someone.
SECT: (noun) a group of people with shared beliefs, often religious.
SEED: (noun/verb) a small embryonic plant; to sow seeds.
SEEK: (verb) to attempt to find something.
SEEM: (verb) to give the impression of being.
SEEN: (verb) past participle of see.
SEEP: (verb) to flow slowly through something.
SEER: (noun) a prophet.
SEES: (verb) third-person singular present tense of see.
SELF: (noun/pronoun) one's own person or being.
SELL: (verb) to exchange goods or services for money.
SEMI: (prefix) half; semi-detached.
SENA: (noun) a feminine given name.
SEND: (verb) to cause to go or be taken to a particular place.
SENS: (noun, abbreviation) senses; sensors.
SENT: (verb) past tense of send.
SEPT: (noun, abbreviation) September; septum.
SERA: (noun) plural of serum; blood serum.
SERF: (noun) a person in feudal society who is bound to work on the land.
SESS: (noun, abbreviation) session.
SETS: (noun) plural of set; groups of things; also a verb.
SEWN: (verb) past participle of sew.
SEXY: (adjective) sexually attractive.
SHAD: (noun) a type of fish.
SHAH: (noun) a former title of the rulers of Persia and other countries.
SHAM: (noun/adjective/verb) a pretence or deception; to deceive or pretend.
SHAN: (noun) a given name; a people of Myanmar.
SHAW: (noun) a given name.
SHAY: (noun) a chaise.
SHEA: (noun) a shea tree.
SHED: (noun/verb) a small structure; to cast off something.
SHEW: (verb, archaic) to show.
SHIN: (noun) the front part of the leg below the knee.
SHIP: (noun) a large vessel for traveling on water.
SHIT: (noun/verb/interjection, vulgar) excrement; to defecate; an exclamation of anger or disgust.
SHOD: (verb) past tense of shoe.
SHOE: (noun/verb) a covering for the foot.
SHOP: (noun/verb) a retail store; to shop.
SHOT: (noun/verb) the act of firing a weapon; to fire a weapon.
SHOW: (noun/verb) a public display; to display something.
SHRI: (noun) a given name; shri (Hindu).
SHUN: (verb) to avoid or reject someone.
SHUT: (verb) to close something.
SICH: (adjective, archaic) such.
SICK: (adjective) affected by illness; feeling nausea.
SIDE: (noun) a position to the left or right of something; one aspect or viewpoint.
SIFT: (verb) to separate fine particles from coarser ones.
SIGH: (verb/noun) to breathe out slowly and audibly.
SIGN: (noun/verb) an indication or symbol; to sign something.
SILK: (noun) a fine, strong, soft fiber.
SILL: (noun) the horizontal piece forming the base of a window or doorframe.
SILO: (noun) a tower for storing grain or silage.
SILT: (noun) fine sand, clay, or other material carried by running water and deposited as sediment.
SIMS: (noun) a video game; also a verb.
SIND: (noun) Sindh, a region in Pakistan.
SINE: (noun) a trigonometric function.
SING: (verb) to produce musical sounds with the voice.
SINK: (verb/noun) to descend below the surface of water; a basin or drain.
SINS: (noun) plural of sin; wrongdoings.
SIPS: (noun) plural of sip; small drinks.
SIRE: (noun/verb) a father; to beget (a child).
SIRS: (noun) plural of sir; a title of respect.
SITE: (noun) a piece of land occupied by a building or town.
SITS: (verb) third-person singular present tense of sit.
SIZE: (noun/verb) the extent of something; to determine the size of.
SKEW: (verb/adjective) to distort or bias.
SKID: (verb/noun) to slip or slide.
SKIM: (verb) to remove something from the surface of a liquid.
SKIN: (noun) the outer covering of an animal or human.
SKIP: (verb/noun) to jump lightly; an act of skipping.
SKIS: (noun) plural of ski.
SLAB: (noun) a large, thick, flat piece of something.
SLAG: (noun) a waste product from smelting.
SLAM: (verb/noun) to shut forcefully; a forceful shutting.
SLAP: (verb/noun) to strike with the flat of the hand.
SLAY: (verb) to kill.
SLED: (noun) a vehicle used for sliding over snow or ice.
SLEW: (verb) past tense of slay.
SLID: (verb) past tense of slide.
SLIM: (adjective/verb) thin; to make or become thin.
SLIP: (verb/noun) to slide; a sudden involuntary movement.
SLIT: (noun/verb) a narrow cut or opening; to cut a narrow opening.
SLOP: (noun/verb) watery, messy food; to spill or splash.
SLOT: (noun) a long, narrow opening.
SLOW: (adjective/adverb/verb) moving or happening at a low speed; to slow down.
SLUG: (noun) a slow-moving mollusc; (verb) to hit forcefully.
SLUM: (noun) a squalid and overcrowded urban area.
SLUR: (noun/verb) an indistinct utterance; to speak indistinctly.
SLUT: (noun, vulgar) a woman who engages in promiscuous sex.
SMOG: (noun) a fog that is mixed with smoke and other pollutants.
SMUG: (adjective) having or showing an excessive pride in oneself or one's achievements.
SNAG: (noun/verb) an unexpected difficulty or obstacle; to catch or tear something.
SNAP: (verb/noun) to break suddenly; a sudden sharp sound.
SNOB: (noun) a person who believes they are superior to others.
SNOW: (noun/verb) frozen atmospheric water vapor; to snow.
SNUB: (verb/noun) to ignore or reject.
SNUG: (adjective) warm and comfortable.
SOAK: (verb) to become completely wet.
SOAP: (noun) a substance used for washing.
SOAR: (verb) to fly high in the air.
SOBS: (noun) plural of sob; acts of crying.
SOCK: (noun) a soft covering for the foot.
SODA: (noun) a soft drink; sodium carbonate.
SOFA: (noun) a long upholstered seat with a back and arms.
SOFT: (adjective) yielding readily to pressure.
SOHO: (noun) a district in London.
SOIL: (noun) earth or land; (verb) to make dirty.
SOLA: (noun) a given name; a type of sun lamp.
SOLD: (verb) past tense of sell.
SOLE: (noun/adjective) the bottom of a foot or shoe; only or single.
SOLO: (noun/adjective/verb) a musical piece for a single performer; alone; to perform solo.
SOMA: (noun) a hypothetical drug; a type of plant.
SOME: (adjective/pronoun/adverb) an unspecified amount or number.
SONG: (noun) a short musical composition with words.
SONS: (noun) plural of son.
SOON: (adverb) at or within a short time.
SOOT: (noun) a black powder produced when something is burnt.
SORE: (adjective/noun) painful or aching; a painful area.
SORT: (noun/verb) a type or kind; to arrange or classify.
SOUL: (noun) the spiritual or immaterial part of a person.
SOUP: (noun) a liquid food.
SOUR: (adjective) having an acid taste.
SOUS: (noun) a monetary unit.
SOWN: (verb) past participle of sow (to plant seeds).
SOWS: (noun) plural of sow; female pigs.
SOYA: (noun) soybean.
SPAM: (noun) unsolicited email.
SPAN: (noun/verb) the distance between two points; to extend over.
SPAR: (noun/verb) a long, thick pole; to box or fight.
SPAT: (noun/verb) a quarrel; to spit.
SPEC: (noun/verb, abbreviation) specification; to specify.
SPED: (verb) past tense of speed.
SPIE: (noun) spy.
SPIN: (verb/noun) to rotate; a rotation.
SPIT: (noun/verb) saliva; to eject saliva.
SPOT: (noun/verb) a small area or mark; to detect something.
SPUN: (verb) past tense of spin.
SPUR: (noun/verb) a pointed device for urging a horse; to urge on.
STAB: (noun/verb) to wound with a pointed object.
STAG: (noun) an adult male deer.
STAR: (noun) a celestial body.
STAT: (noun/verb, abbreviation) statistic; immediately.
STAY: (verb/noun) to remain in one place; a period of staying.
STEM: (noun) the main stalk of a plant.
STEP: (noun/verb) a single movement of the foot; to walk.
STEW: (noun/verb) a type of food.
STIR: (verb/noun) to mix something.
STOP: (verb/noun) to cease movement or activity.
STOW: (verb) to pack or store things away neatly.
STUB: (noun/verb) a short piece; to stub a toe.
STUD: (noun) a metal pin; a male animal.
SUBS: (noun, abbreviation) submarines.
SUCH: (adjective/determiner/pronoun) of the same or similar kind.
SUCK: (verb) to draw liquid into the mouth.
SUED: (verb) past tense of sue.
SUIT: (noun) a set of clothes; a legal action.
SULU: (noun) the Sulu Archipelago.
SUMP: (noun) a sump pump; a low-lying area.
SUMS: (noun) plural of sum; totals.
SUNG: (verb) past tense of sing.
SUNK: (verb) past tense of sink.
SUNS: (noun) plural of sun.
SURA: (noun) a chapter in the Koran.
SURE: (adjective/adverb) certain; certainly.
SURF: (noun/verb) waves breaking on a shore; to surf.
SWAB: (noun/verb) a piece of absorbent material.
SWAM: (verb) past tense of swim.
SWAN: (noun) a large, graceful water bird.
SWAP: (verb/noun) to exchange.
SWAT: (verb/noun) to strike forcefully.
SWAY: (verb/noun) to move rhythmically; movement.
SWIM: (verb) to move through water by moving the limbs.
SYED: (noun) a title in some Muslim countries.
SYNC: (noun/verb, abbreviation) synchronization; to synchronize.
TABS: (noun) plural of tab; labels or projections.
TABU: (adjective) forbidden; taboo.
TACK: (noun/verb) a short nail; to fasten something.
TACT: (noun) sensitivity and skill in dealing with people.
TAGS: (noun) plural of tag.
TAIL: (noun) the hindmost part of an animal's body.
TAIN: (verb, archaic) to taint.
TAIT: (noun) a given name.
TAKE: (verb) to grasp or seize; to accept or receive.
TALC: (noun) a soft mineral.
TALE: (noun) a story.
TALK: (verb/noun) to speak or converse.
TALL: (adjective) of greater than average height.
TAME: (adjective/verb) domesticated; to domesticate.
TANA: (noun) a given name.
TANG: (noun) a strong taste; a sharp sound.
TANK: (noun) a container for liquids.
TAOS: (noun) a town in New Mexico.
TAPE: (noun/verb) a long, thin strip of material; to record.
TAPS: (noun) plural of tap; faucets.
TARA: (noun) a feminine given name.
TARN: (noun) a small mountain lake.
TARO: (noun) a type of plant.
TART: (adjective/noun) sharp and sour in taste; a type of pastry.
TASK: (noun) a piece of work to be done.
TATE: (noun) a given name.
TAUT: (adjective) stretched tight; tense.
TAXA: (noun) plural of taxon; taxonomic units.
TAXI: (noun) a taxicab.
TEAK: (noun) a tropical hardwood.
TEAL: (adjective/noun) a bluish-green color; a type of duck.
TEAM: (noun) a group of people working together.
TEAR: (noun/verb) a drop of clear liquid from the eye; to rip or pull apart.
TEAS: (noun) plural of tea.
TECH: (noun/adjective, abbreviation) technology; technical.
TEEN: (noun/adjective) a teenager; in one's teens.
TEIL: (noun) part (German).
TELE: (prefix) television; distant.
TELL: (verb) to communicate information.
TEMP: (noun/adjective/verb, abbreviation) temporary; temperature; to work temporarily.
TEND: (verb) to care for; to look after.
TENS: (noun) plural of ten.
TENT: (noun) a temporary shelter.
TERM: (noun) a word or phrase; a period of time.
TERN: (noun) a type of seabird.
TEST: (noun/verb) an examination or trial; to examine.
TETE: (noun, French) head.
TEXT: (noun/verb) written material; to send a text message.
THAN: (conjunction) used to introduce the second element in a comparison.
THAR: (noun, archaic) there.
THAT: (pronoun/adjective/conjunction) used to identify a specific person or thing observed or heard by the speaker; such; introducing a clause.
THAW: (verb/noun) to melt ice or snow.
THEE: (pronoun, archaic) you (objective case).
THEM: (pronoun) objective form of they.
THEN: (adverb/conjunction) at that time; afterwards.
THEY: (pronoun) plural of he, she, or it.
THIN: (adjective/verb) slender; to make or become thin.
THIS: (determiner/pronoun) used to identify a specific person or thing present or near to the speaker; these.
THOU: (pronoun, archaic) you.
THRO: (preposition, abbreviation) through.
THRU: (preposition, abbreviation) through.
THUD: (noun/verb) a dull, heavy sound.
THUS: (adverb) in this or that way; therefore.
TIAN: (noun) a given name.
TICK: (noun/verb) a small mark; to make a ticking sound.
TICS: (noun) plural of tic; involuntary movements.
TIDE: (noun) the rise and fall of the sea.
TIDY: (adjective/verb) neatly arranged; to tidy up.
TIED: (verb) past tense of tie.
TIER: (noun) a row or layer.
TIES: (noun) plural of tie.
TILE: (noun/verb) a flat, thin piece of material for covering roofs.
TILL: (preposition/conjunction/verb, archaic) until; to cultivate land.
TILT: (verb/noun) to cause to lean or incline; an inclination.
TIME: (noun) the indefinite continued progress of existence and events in the past, present, and future regarded as a whole.
TINA: (noun) a feminine given name.
TINE: (noun) a prong of a fork.
TING: (noun/verb) a light, ringing sound.
TINS: (noun) plural of tin; metal containers.
TINT: (noun/verb) a delicate shade of color; to color slightly.
TINY: (adjective) extremely small.
TIPS: (noun) plural of tip; ends or points; also a verb.
TIRE: (noun/verb) a rubber covering for a wheel; to become tired.
TITS: (noun, vulgar) breasts.
TOAD: (noun) a type of amphibian.
TOBY: (noun) a given name.
TOED: (adjective) having toes.
TOES: (noun) plural of toe.
TOFU: (noun) a food made from soybeans.
TOGA: (noun) a loose outer garment worn by the citizens of ancient Rome.
TOIL: (verb/noun) to work hard; laborious work.
TOLD: (verb) past tense of tell.
TOLL: (noun) a charge for using a bridge or road; (verb) to sound a bell slowly.
TOMB: (noun) a large stone structure for burying the dead.
TOME: (noun) a large, heavy book.
TOMS: (noun) plural of Tom; a given name.
TONE: (noun) a sound of a particular quality; a shade of color.
TONG: (noun) a type of pliers; tongs.
TONS: (noun) plural of ton.
TONY: (noun) a given name.
TOOK: (verb) past tense of take.
TOOL: (noun) an instrument or device used to carry out a particular function.
TOPS: (noun) plural of top; the highest point.
TORE: (verb) past tense of tear.
TORI: (noun) plural of torus; doughnut-shaped objects.
TORN: (verb) past participle of tear.
TORO: (noun) a bull (Spanish).
TORR: (noun) a unit of pressure.
TORT: (noun) a wrongful act or an infringement of a right.
TORY: (noun) a Conservative (British politics).
TOSS: (verb/noun) to throw or fling something.
TOTE: (verb) to carry.
TOUR: (noun/verb) a journey for pleasure or sightseeing.
TOUT: (verb/noun) to promote or praise excessively; a tout.
TOWN: (noun) a settlement larger than a village but smaller than a city.
TOYS: (noun) plural of toy.
TRAM: (noun) a type of streetcar or trolley.
TRAP: (noun/verb) a device for catching animals; to catch.
TRAY: (noun) a flat container.
TREE: (noun) a woody plant with a single stem or trunk.
TREK: (noun/verb) a long and arduous journey.
TRES: (number, French) three.
TRIE: (noun) a trial.
TRIM: (verb/adjective) to decorate; neat or tidy.
TRIO: (noun) a group of three people or things.
TRIP: (noun/verb) a journey; to stumble or fall.
TROD: (verb) past tense of tread.
TROP: (noun, abbreviation) tropical; trope.
TROT: (noun/verb) a type of gait; to trot.
TROY: (noun) Troy; a city.
TRUE: (adjective/adverb) in accordance with fact or reality; truthfully.
TSAR: (noun) the former title of the emperors of Russia.
TUAN: (noun) a title of respect (Southeast Asian).
TUBE: (noun) a long, hollow cylinder.
TUBS: (noun) plural of tub; baths.
TUCK: (verb/noun) to fold or gather; a fold or gather.
TUFF: (noun) a type of rock.
TUFT: (noun) a bunch or clump of something, typically hair or grass.
TUGS: (noun) plural of tug; tugboats.
TUNA: (noun) a type of fish.
TUNE: (noun/verb) a melody; to adjust or regulate.
TUNG: (noun) a tung tree; tungsten.
TURF: (noun) a surface of ground covered with grass.
TURK: (noun) a Turkish person.
TURN: (verb/noun) to rotate; a rotation.
TWAS: (verb, archaic) it was.
TWIG: (noun) a small, slender branch.
TWIN: (noun/adjective) one of two children born at the same birth; paired.
TWOS: (noun) plural of two.
TYNE: (noun) a river in England.
TYPE: (noun/verb) a category or kind; to type something.
TYRE: (noun, British spelling) tire.
UGLY: (adjective) unpleasant or repulsive in appearance.
ULNA: (noun) a bone in the forearm.
UNDE: (prefix, archaic) under.
UNDO: (verb) to cancel or reverse something.
UNIT: (noun) a single, complete thing.
UNTO: (preposition, archaic) to or toward.
UPON: (preposition, archaic) on.
UREA: (noun) a colorless crystalline compound.
URGE: (verb/noun) to push or force; a strong desire.
URIC: (adjective) relating to uric acid.
URNS: (noun) plural of urn; containers.
USED: (verb) past tense of use.
USER: (noun) a person who uses something.
USES: (verb) third-person singular present tense of use.
VAIL: (noun/verb) a veil; to lower.
VAIN: (adjective) having or showing an excessively high opinion of one's appearance, abilities, or worth.
VALE: (noun) a valley.
VANE: (noun) a device that rotates to show the direction of the wind.
VANS: (noun) plural of van; vans.
VARY: (verb) to differ in size, amount, degree, or kind.
VASA: (noun) plural of vas; vessels.
VASE: (noun) a decorative container for flowers.
VAST: (adjective) extremely large.
VATS: (noun) plural of vat; large containers.
VEAL: (noun) the flesh of a calf, used as food.
VEER: (verb) to change direction.
VEGA: (noun) a star.
VEIL: (noun/verb) a covering for the face; to cover.
VEIN: (noun) a blood vessel.
VENA: (noun) a vein (Latin).
VENT: (noun/verb) an opening for air; to express feelings.
VERA: (noun) a feminine given name.
VERB: (noun) a word used to describe an action, state, or occurrence.
VERS: (noun, abbreviation) verse; versus.
VERT: (adjective) green.
VERY: (adverb) to a high degree.
VEST: (noun) a sleeveless garment.
VETO: (noun/verb) the power to prevent something.
VIAL: (noun) a small container for liquid.
VICE: (noun) immoral or wicked behavior.
VIDE: (verb, archaic) to see.
VIED: (verb) past tense of vie; to compete.
VIEW: (noun/verb) what can be seen from a particular place; to look at something.
VILE: (adjective) extremely unpleasant.
VINE: (noun) a plant with a climbing stem.
VISA: (noun) an endorsement on a passport.
VISE: (noun) a clamping tool.
VITA: (noun) life (Latin).
VIVA: (interjection) long live (Italian).
VIVE: (verb, French) live.
VIVO: (adverb, Latin) alive.
VOID: (adjective/noun/verb) empty or useless; emptiness; to invalidate.
VOLK: (noun) people (German).
VOLS: (noun, abbreviation) volumes.
VOLT: (noun) a unit of electrical potential.
VOTE: (noun/verb) a choice made in an election.
VOW: (noun/verb) a solemn promise.
WADE: (verb) to walk through water.
WADI: (noun) a dry riverbed.
WAGE: (noun/verb) money paid for work; to wage war.
WAIL: (verb/noun) to cry out in grief or pain.
WAIS: (noun, abbreviation) waist.
WAIT: (verb) to stay in a place or remain in a particular state until a particular person or event arrives or occurs.
WAKE: (verb/noun) to stop sleeping; a wake.
WALD: (noun) a wood (German).
WALK: (noun/verb) a journey on foot.
WALL: (noun) a continuous vertical brick or stone structure that encloses or divides an area of land.
WAND: (noun) a slender rod.
WANE: (verb/noun) to decrease in strength or intensity.
WANG: (noun) a given name.
WANT: (verb/noun) to desire something; a desire.
WARD: (noun/verb) a division of a hospital; to protect or defend.
WARE: (noun) goods or merchandise; (verb, archaic) to beware.
WARM: (adjective/verb) moderately hot.
WARN: (verb) to make aware of danger.
WARP: (noun/verb) a twist or distortion; to distort.
WARS: (noun) plural of war.
WART: (noun) a small, hard lump on the skin.
WARY: (adjective) cautious.
WASH: (verb/noun) to clean with water; the washing of clothes.
WASP: (noun) a type of insect.
WATT: (noun) a unit of power.
WAVE: (noun/verb) a ridge of water; to wave something.
WAVY: (adjective) having waves or undulations.
WAXY: (adjective) covered or resembling wax.
WAYS: (noun) plural of way; paths or routes.
WEAK: (adjective) lacking strength.
WEAL: (noun) a mark on the skin caused by a blow.
WEAN: (verb) to accustom (a child or other young mammal) to food other than its mother's milk.
WEAR: (verb) to have or use (clothing).
WEBS: (noun) plural of web; spiderwebs.
WEED: (noun/verb) an unwanted plant; to remove weeds.
WEEK: (noun) a period of seven days.
WEEP: (verb) to cry.
WEFT: (noun) the crosswise threads in weaving.
WEIL: (noun) a given name.
WEIR: (noun) a low dam or fence in a river to catch fish.
WELD: (verb) to join pieces of metal.
WELL: (adverb/adjective/noun) in a satisfactory manner; in good health; a deep hole.
WELT: (noun) a ridge on the skin caused by a blow.
WENT: (verb) past tense of go.
WEPT: (verb) past tense of weep.
WERE: (verb) past tense of be.
WERT: (verb, archaic) were.
WEST: (noun/adjective) the direction in which the sun sets.
WHAT: (pronoun/adjective/adverb) interrogative pronoun; what kind of.
WHEN: (adverb/conjunction) at what time; at the time that.
WHEY: (noun) the watery part of milk that separates from the curds when cheese is made.
WHIG: (noun) a member of the Whig Party (historical).
WHIM: (noun) a sudden desire or change of mind.
WHIP: (noun/verb) a flexible instrument for striking; to strike with a whip.
WHIT: (noun) a small amount.
WHIZ: (noun/verb) a whizzing or hissing sound; to make such a sound.
WHOA: (interjection) used to stop a horse or other animal.
WHOM: (pronoun) objective case of who.
WICK: (noun) a fibrous material that draws up liquid.
WIDE: (adjective/adverb) having considerable extent from side to side.
WIFE: (noun) a married woman.
WIGS: (noun) plural of wig; artificial hair.
WILD: (adjective) existing in a natural state; untamed.
WILL: (noun/verb/modal) a legal document; determination; to be determined or resolved.
WILT: (verb/noun) to become limp or weak; a weakening.
WILY: (adjective) skilled at deception.
WIND: (noun/verb) moving air; to wind something.
WINE: (noun) an alcoholic drink made from fermented grapes.
WING: (noun) one of the paired appendages by which a bird or insect flies.
WINK: (verb/noun) to close and open one eye quickly.
WINN: (noun) a given name.
WINS: (noun) plural of win; victories.
WIPE: (verb/noun) to clean a surface; a cleaning action.
WIRE: (noun/verb) a thin, flexible strand of metal; to connect with wire.
WIRY: (adjective) lean and strong.
WISE: (adjective) having or showing knowledge and good judgment.
WISH: (noun/verb) to hope or desire something.
WISP: (noun) a small, thin strand or tuft.
WISS: (verb, archaic) to know.
WITH: (preposition) expressing accompaniment; together.
WITS: (noun) plural of wit; intelligence.
WOES: (noun) plural of woe; troubles.
WOKE: (verb) past tense of wake.
WOLF: (noun) a wild canine mammal.
WOMB: (noun) the organ in the lower part of a woman's abdomen where a fetus develops.
WONT: (noun/verb) a habit or custom; accustomed.
WOOD: (noun) a dense forest.
WOOL: (noun) the soft, fine hair of sheep.
WORD: (noun) a single distinct meaningful element of speech or writing.
WORE: (verb) past tense of wear.
WORK: (noun/verb) activity involving mental or physical effort done in order to achieve a purpose or result.
WORM: (noun) a long, slender creature.
WORN: (verb) past participle of wear.
WORT: (noun) a type of herb.
WOVE: (verb) past tense of weave.
WRAP: (verb/noun) to enclose or cover something.
WREN: (noun) a small, brown bird.
WRIT: (noun/verb, archaic) writing; to write.
WYNN: (noun) a given name.
YALE: (noun) Yale University.
YAMS: (noun) plural of yam; a type of vegetable.
YANG: (noun) the male principle in Chinese philosophy.
YANK: (verb/noun) to pull something suddenly.
YARD: (noun) a unit of length; a garden.
YARN: (noun) spun thread.
YAWN: (verb/noun) to open one's mouth wide, usually involuntarily, as a sign of tiredness or boredom.
YEAH: (adverb, informal) yes.
YEAN: (verb) to give birth to (a young goat or sheep).
YEAR: (noun) a period of twelve months.
YELL: (verb/noun) to shout loudly.
YOGA: (noun) a system of exercises practiced as part of a Hindu spiritual discipline.
YOGI: (noun) a person who practices yoga.
YOKE: (noun/verb) a wooden crosspiece joining a pair of oxen; to join together.
YOLK: (noun) the yellow part of an egg.
YORE: (noun, archaic) former times.
YORK: (noun) York; a city.
YOUR: (pronoun) possessive form of you.
YUAN: (noun) a monetary unit in China.
YULE: (noun) Christmas.
ZACK: (noun) a given name.
ZEAL: (noun) great energy or enthusiasm in pursuit of a cause or objective.
ZERO: (noun/number) equivalent to 0.
ZEST: (noun) great enthusiasm and energy.
ZETA: (noun) the sixth letter of the Greek alphabet.
ZINC: (noun) a metallic element.
ZONA: (noun) a zone (Spanish).
ZONE: (noun) a region or area.
ZOOM: (verb/noun) to increase or decrease magnification; a zooming action.
ZOOS: (noun) plural of zoo.
ZULU: (noun) a member of the Zulu people.
which: (pronoun/adjective) what one or ones.
there: (adverb/pronoun) in, at, or to that place or position.
their: (pronoun) possessive form of they.
about: (preposition/adverb) concerning or regarding something; approximately.
would: (verb) past tense of will; expressing a conditional or hypothetical action.
these: (pronoun) plural of this.
other: (adjective/pronoun/determiner) different; another.
words: (noun) a single distinct meaningful element of speech or writing, used with other such elements in constructing sentences.
could: (verb) past tense of can; expressing ability or possibility.
write: (verb) to mark letters, words, or other symbols on a surface.
first: (adjective/noun/adverb) coming before all others in time or order; the first thing.
water: (noun) a colorless, transparent, odorless, and tasteless liquid.
after: (preposition/adverb/conjunction) following in time or order; later; following something.
where: (adverb/conjunction) in or at what place or position.
right: (adjective/noun/adverb) morally good; correctness; correctly; directly.
think: (verb) have a particular belief or idea.
three: (number) equivalent to 3.
years: (noun) plural of year; twelve months.
place: (noun/verb) a particular position or point in space.
sound: (noun/verb/adjective) vibrations that travel through the air or another medium and can be heard when they reach a person's or animal's ear; to make a sound; in good condition.
great: (adjective/adverb/noun) of an extent, amount, or intensity considerably above average.
again: (adverb) one more time; once more.
still: (adverb/adjective) not moving; yet; quiet.
every: (determiner/pronoun) each and all of the members of a group considered individually.
small: (adjective) little in size; limited in amount.
found: (verb) past tense of find.
those: (pronoun) plural of that.
never: (adverb) at no time; not ever.
under: (preposition/adverb) below; beneath.
might: (verb/noun) past tense of may; expressing possibility; power or strength.
while: (conjunction/noun) during the time that; a period of time.
house: (noun) a building for human habitation.
world: (noun) the earth, together with all of its countries, peoples, and natural features.
below: (preposition/adverb) in or to a lower place; down.
asked: (verb) past tense of ask.
going: (verb) present participle of go.
large: (adjective) relatively great in size, extent, amount, or number.
until: (preposition/conjunction) up to the point in time or event that.
along: (preposition/adverb) extending along the length of something.
shall: (verb) modal auxiliary denoting future action.
being: (verb) present participle of be.
often: (adverb) frequently.
earth: (noun) the planet on which we live.
began: (verb) past tense of begin.
since: (preposition/adverb/conjunction) from a past time until now; after a particular event.
study: (noun/verb) the devotion of time and attention to acquiring knowledge of an academic subject, a skill, etc.; to study.
night: (noun) the period of darkness between sunset and sunrise.
light: (adjective/noun/verb) emitting or reflecting light; illumination; to light something.
above: (preposition/adverb) in a higher place than; overhead.
paper: (noun) a material manufactured in thin sheets from the pulp of wood or other fibrous substances, used for writing, drawing, or printing on.
parts: (noun) plural of part; a component or element.
young: (adjective) at an early stage of life or growth.
story: (noun) a description of events, especially one that is fictional or intended to entertain.
point: (noun/verb) a specific place; to direct attention to.
times: (noun) plural of time; occasions.
heard: (verb) past tense of hear.
whole: (adjective/noun) complete; the whole thing.
white: (adjective/noun) of the colour of fresh snow.
given: (verb) past participle of give.
means: (noun) a method, course of action, or instrument by which something can be accomplished.
music: (noun) vocal or instrumental sounds (or both) combined in such a way as to produce beauty of form, harmony, and expression of emotion.
miles: (noun) plural of mile.
thing: (noun) an object that one need not, cannot, or does not wish to give a specific name to.
today: (noun/adverb) the present day.
later: (adverb) at a time or date after the present one; subsequently.
using: (verb) present participle of use.
money: (noun) a current medium of exchange in the form of coins and banknotes; coins and banknotes collectively.
lines: (noun) plural of line.
order: (noun/verb) a sequence or arrangement; to arrange or command.
group: (noun/verb) a number of things or persons considered as a unit.
among: (preposition) surrounded by or in the company of.
learn: (verb) acquire knowledge or skill.
known: (verb) past participle of know.
space: (noun) a continuous area or expanse which is free, available, or unoccupied.
table: (noun) a piece of furniture with a flat top and legs, used for eating, working, or playing games.
early: (adjective/adverb) occurring or done at or during an early time or stage.
trees: (noun) plural of tree.
short: (adjective/adverb) having a small distance from one end to the other; briefly.
hands: (noun) plural of hand.
state: (noun/verb) the particular condition that someone or something is in at a specific time; to state something.
black: (adjective/noun) of the darkest colour owing to the absence or complete absorption of light; black dye or pigment.
shown: (verb) past participle of show.
stood: (verb) past tense of stand.
front: (noun/adjective/adverb) the part or surface of something that faces forward; foremost; in front of.
voice: (noun) the sound produced in a person's larynx and uttered through the mouth.
kinds: (noun) plural of kind.
makes: (verb) third person singular present tense of make.
comes: (verb) third person singular present tense of come.
close: (adjective/adverb/verb/noun) near in space or time.
power: (noun) the ability to do something or act in a particular way.
lived: (verb) past tense of live.
vowel: (noun) a speech sound made with the vocal tract open, such as 'a', 'e', 'i', 'o', 'u', as opposed to a consonant.
taken: (verb) past participle of take.
built: (verb) past tense of build.
heart: (noun) a hollow muscular organ that pumps the blood through the circulatory system by rhythmic contraction and dilation.
ready: (adjective/adverb) prepared or willing.
quite: (adverb) to the utmost or most absolute extent.
class: (noun) a group of students taught together.
bring: (verb) to take or convey something or someone to a place.
round: (adjective/adverb/noun/preposition) having a circular shape; in a circular direction; a round object; around.
horse: (noun) a hoofed mammal with long hair on its mane and tail.
shows: (verb) third person singular present tense of show.
piece: (noun) a portion or section of something.
green: (adjective/noun) of the color between blue and yellow in the spectrum.
stand: (verb/noun) to support oneself on one's feet; a stand.
birds: (noun) plural of bird.
start: (verb/noun) to begin; the beginning of something.
river: (noun) a large natural stream of water flowing in a channel to the sea, a lake, or another such stream.
tried: (verb) past tense of try.
least: (adjective/adverb/noun) smallest or lowest in amount, degree, or importance; to the least extent.
field: (noun) an area of open land, especially one planted with crops or pasture, typically bounded by hedges or fences.
whose: (pronoun) belonging to whom.
girls: (noun) plural of girl.
leave: (verb/noun) to go away from a place; permission to be absent from one's workplace.
added: (verb) past tense of add.
color: (noun) the quality of an object or substance with respect to light reflected by it, perceived by the eye as red, yellow, blue, or other shades.
third: (adjective/noun/adverb) coming after two others in order.
hours: (noun) plural of hour.
moved: (verb) past tense of move.
plant: (noun/verb) a living organism of the kind exemplified by trees, shrubs, herbs, grasses, ferns, and mosses, typically growing in a permanent site, absorbing water and inorganic substances through its roots, and synthesizing nutrients in its leaves by photosynthesis using the green pigment chlorophyll.
doing: (verb) present participle of do.
names: (noun) plural of name.
forms: (noun) plural of form.
heavy: (adjective) having great weight.
ideas: (noun) plural of idea.
cried: (verb) past tense of cry.
check: (noun/verb) an examination; to examine.
floor: (noun) the lower inside surface of a room or building.
begin: (verb) to start.
woman: (noun) an adult female human being.
alone: (adverb/adjective) without other people.
plane: (noun) a flat surface; an aircraft.
spell: (verb/noun) to form a word from letters; a period of time.
watch: (noun/verb) a small timepiece worn on the wrist; to observe.
carry: (verb) to transport something.
wrote: (verb) past tense of write.
clear: (adjective/adverb/verb) easily understood; clearly.
named: (verb) past tense of name.
books: (noun) plural of book.
child: (noun) a young human being below the age of puberty or below the legal age of majority.
glass: (noun) a hard, brittle, noncrystalline, more or less transparent substance produced by fusion, usually composed of silica and other additives.
human: (adjective/noun) of, relating to, or characteristic of humanity.
takes: (verb) third person singular present tense of take.
party: (noun) a social gathering.
build: (verb) to construct or erect something.
seems: (verb) third person singular present tense of seem.
blood: (noun) the red liquid that circulates in the arteries and veins of vertebrate animals, carrying oxygen and nutrients.
sides: (noun) plural of side.
seven: (number) equivalent to 7.
mouth: (noun) the opening in the lower part of the human face, surrounded by the lips, through which food is taken in and from which speech and other sounds are emitted.
solve: (verb) to find an answer to a problem.
north: (noun/adjective/adverb) the direction opposite to south.
value: (noun) the importance, worth, or usefulness of something.
death: (noun) the action or fact of dying or being killed; the end of life.
maybe: (adverb) perhaps.
happy: (adjective) feeling or showing pleasure or contentment.
tells: (verb) third person singular present tense of tell.
gives: (verb) third person singular present tense of give.
looks: (verb) third person singular present tense of look.
shape: (noun/verb) the external form or appearance characteristic of someone or something; to give a particular shape or form to.
lives: (verb) third person singular present tense of live.
steps: (noun) plural of step.
areas: (noun) plural of area.
sense: (noun/verb) a faculty by which humans and animals perceive stimuli.
speak: (verb) to utter words; to express oneself in speech.
force: (noun/verb) strength or energy as an attribute of physical action or movement.
ocean: (noun) a very large expanse of sea.
speed: (noun/verb) the rate at which someone or something is able to move or operate.
women: (noun) plural of woman.
metal: (noun) a solid material that is typically hard, shiny, malleable, fusible, and ductile, with good electrical and thermal conductivity.
south: (noun/adjective/adverb) the direction opposite to north.
grass: (noun) a common, usually green, herbaceous plant.
scale: (noun/verb) a series of markings at fixed intervals; to climb.
cells: (noun) plural of cell; basic units of life.
lower: (adjective/verb/adverb) situated or placed beneath another; to lower something; lower down.
sleep: (noun/verb) a state of rest for the body and mind during which the nervous system is relatively inactive.
wrong: (adjective/adverb/noun) not correct or true; wrongly; something that is incorrect.
pages: (noun) plural of page.
ships: (noun) plural of ship.
needs: (verb) third person singular present tense of need.
rocks: (noun) plural of rock.
eight: (number) equivalent to 8.
major: (adjective/noun) important; a major.
level: (noun/adjective/verb) a position or rank; flat; to make something level.
total: (adjective/noun/verb) complete; the sum or whole; to add up.
ahead: (adverb) in or toward the front; in advance.
reach: (verb/noun) to stretch out to touch or grasp something; the act of reaching.
stars: (noun) plural of star.
store: (noun/verb) a place where goods are sold; to store something.
sight: (noun) the faculty or power of seeing; something seen.
terms: (noun) plural of term; conditions; words or phrases.
catch: (verb/noun) to seize or capture something.
works: (noun) plural of work; also, a verb.
board: (noun/verb) a flat piece of wood; to board a plane.
cover: (verb/noun) to place something over something else; a covering.
songs: (noun) plural of song.
equal: (adjective/noun/verb) being the same in quantity, size, degree, or value.
stone: (noun) a hard, solid substance that forms rocks.
waves: (noun) plural of wave.
guess: (verb/noun) to form an opinion or make a judgment on the basis of incomplete information.
dance: (noun/verb) a series of rhythmic steps.
spoke: (verb) past tense of speak.
break: (verb/noun) to separate or cause to separate into pieces.
cause: (noun/verb) a person or thing that gives rise to an action, phenomenon, or condition; to bring about something.
radio: (noun) an electronic device that receives and transmits radio waves.
weeks: (noun) plural of week.
lands: (noun) plural of land.
basic: (adjective) forming the base; fundamental.
liked: (verb) past tense of like.
trade: (noun/verb) the exchange of goods or services.
fresh: (adjective) recently made or obtained.
final: (adjective/noun) coming at the end of a process or period of time.
fight: (noun/verb) a struggle or battle.
meant: (verb) past tense of mean.
drive: (noun/verb) to operate a motor vehicle; a journey.
spent: (verb) past tense of spend.
local: (adjective/noun/adverb) relating to or occurring in a particular area or place.
waxes: (noun) plural of wax.
knows: (verb) third-person singular present tense of know.
train: (noun/verb) a series of connected railway carriages pulled by an engine; to train something.
bread: (noun) a food made from flour, water, and yeast.
homes: (noun) plural of home.
teeth: (noun) plural of tooth.
coast: (noun) the part of the land adjoining a sea or lake.
thick: (adjective) having a great distance between opposite surfaces or sides; dense.
brown: (adjective/noun) of the color of dark-roasted coffee.
clean: (adjective/verb) free from dirt, marks, or stains.
quiet: (adjective/adverb/noun) making little or no noise; quietly; calmness.
sugar: (noun) a sweet crystalline carbohydrate used as a food.
facts: (noun) plural of fact.
steel: (noun) a hard, strong, grey or bluish-grey alloy of iron with carbon and usually other elements.
forth: (adverb) forward; onward.
rules: (noun) plural of rule; regulations.
notes: (noun) plural of note; short written records; musical notes.
units: (noun) plural of unit; single entities.
peace: (noun) freedom from disturbance; quiet and tranquility.
month: (noun) a period of approximately four weeks.
verbs: (noun) plural of verb.
seeds: (noun) plural of seed.
helps: (verb) third person singular present tense of help.
sharp: (adjective/adverb) having a very fine edge or point; sharply.
visit: (noun/verb) a formal or informal act of going to see a person or place.
woods: (noun) plural of wood; a dense forest.
chief: (adjective/noun) most important; a leader.
walls: (noun) plural of wall.
cross: (noun/verb/adjective) a structure that is built to cross an obstacle such as a river; to cross something.
wings: (noun) plural of wing.
grown: (verb) past participle of grow.
cases: (noun) plural of case.
foods: (noun) plural of food.
crops: (noun) plural of crop.
fruit: (noun) the sweet and fleshy product of a tree or other plant that contains seeds and can be eaten as food.
stick: (noun/verb) a piece of wood; to attach something.
wants: (verb) third person singular present tense of want.
stage: (noun) a particular point in time, state, or process.
sheep: (noun) a woolly quadrupedal ruminant mammal.
nouns: (noun) plural of noun.
plain: (adjective/noun) not decorated or elaborate; an area of flat land.
drink: (verb/noun) to ingest liquid; a liquid for drinking.
bones: (noun) plural of bone.
apart: (adverb/adjective/preposition) separated or distant.
turns: (verb) third person singular present tense of turn.
moves: (verb) third person singular present tense of move.
touch: (verb/noun) to make contact with someone or something; contact.
angle: (noun) the space between two intersecting lines or surfaces at or close to the point where they meet.
based: (verb) past participle of base; founded on or dependent on something.
range: (noun/verb) the area covered by something; to range over.
marks: (noun) plural of mark.
tired: (adjective) feeling weary because of hard work or exertion.
older: (adjective) having lived for a longer period of time.
farms: (noun) plural of farm.
spend: (verb) to use or consume time or money.
shoes: (noun) plural of shoe.
goods: (noun) plural of good; things that can be bought and sold.
chair: (noun) a seat with a back and usually four legs.
twice: (adverb) two times; on two occasions.
cents: (noun) plural of cent.
empty: (adjective/verb) containing nothing.
alike: (adjective/adverb) similar or comparable.
style: (noun) a manner of doing something.
broke: (verb) past tense of break.
pairs: (noun) plural of pair.
count: (verb/noun) to say numbers in order; a number.
enjoy: (verb) to take delight or pleasure in something.
score: (noun/verb) the number of points achieved in a game.
shore: (noun) the land along the edge of a sea or lake.
roots: (noun) plural of root.
paint: (noun/verb) a colored substance used to coat a surface; to coat a surface with paint.
heads: (noun) plural of head.
shook: (verb) past tense of shake.
serve: (verb) to perform duties or provide a function.
angry: (adjective) feeling or showing strong annoyance, displeasure, or hostility.
crowd: (noun) a large number of people gathered together.
wheel: (noun) a circular device that rotates on an axle and is used to move vehicles and machinery.
quick: (adjective/adverb) done with speed or haste.
dress: (noun/verb) a garment for women or girls; to dress.
share: (noun/verb) a portion of something divided among people; to share something.
alive: (adjective) living; not dead.
noise: (noun) a sound, especially one that is loud or unpleasant or disruptive.
solid: (adjective/noun) firm and stable in shape; a solid substance.
cloth: (noun) a woven or knitted material.
signs: (noun) plural of sign.
hills: (noun) plural of hill.
types: (noun) plural of type.
drawn: (verb) past participle of draw.
worth: (adjective/noun) equivalent in value to the sum or item specified.
truck: (noun) a large motor vehicle used for transporting goods.
piano: (noun) a large keyboard musical instrument.
upper: (adjective/noun) situated higher up.
loved: (verb) past tense of love.
usual: (adjective) done, used, or occurring frequently or habitually.
faces: (noun) plural of face.
drove: (verb) past tense of drive.
cabin: (noun) a small house or hut.
boats: (noun) plural of boat.
towns: (noun) plural of town.
proud: (adjective) feeling deep pleasure or satisfaction as a result of one's own achievements, qualities, or possessions or those of someone with whom one is closely associated.
court: (noun) a court of law; a courtyard.
model: (noun/verb) a miniature representation of something; to model.
prime: (adjective/noun) first in importance; a prime number.
fifty: (number) equivalent to 50.
plans: (noun) plural of plan.
yards: (noun) plural of yard.
prove: (verb) to demonstrate the truth or existence of something by evidence or argument.
tools: (noun) plural of tool.
price: (noun/verb) the amount of money expected, required, or given in payment for something.
sheet: (noun) a large rectangular piece of material, especially cloth or paper.
smell: (noun/verb) a distinctive odor.
boxes: (noun) plural of box.
raise: (verb/noun) to lift something up; an increase.
match: (noun/verb) a short contest or competition; to match something.
truth: (noun) the quality or state of being true; that which is true or in accordance with fact or reality.
roads: (noun) plural of road.
threw: (verb) past tense of throw.
enemy: (noun) a person who is actively opposed or hostile to someone or something.
lunch: (noun) a light meal eaten in the middle of the day.
chart: (noun/verb) a visual representation of data; to chart something.
scene: (noun) the place where an incident or event occurs.
graph: (noun/verb) a diagram showing the relation between variable quantities.
doubt: (noun/verb) a feeling of uncertainty or lack of conviction; to doubt something.
guide: (noun/verb) a person who leads or directs someone.
winds: (noun) plural of wind.
block: (noun/verb) a solid piece of hard material; to obstruct something.
grain: (noun) the seed of cereal crops; a particle or small piece.
smoke: (noun/verb) a visible suspension of carbon or other particles in air.
mixed: (verb) past tense of mix.
games: (noun) plural of game.
wagon: (noun) a vehicle with four wheels pulled by a horse or other animal.
sweet: (adjective/noun) having a pleasant taste; something sweet.
topic: (noun) a subject that is discussed or written about.
extra: (adjective/noun/adverb) additional; something extra; exceptionally.
plate: (noun) a flat dish, typically circular or oval, from which food is eaten.
title: (noun/verb) the name of a book, composition, or other work.
knife: (noun) a cutting instrument with a sharp blade, used for various purposes.
fence: (noun/verb) a barrier enclosing an area; to enclose an area with a fence.
falls: (noun) plural of fall.
cloud: (noun) a visible mass of condensed watery vapor floating in the atmosphere.
wheat: (noun) a cereal plant that is widely cultivated as a source of food.
plays: (verb) third person singular present tense of play.
enter: (verb) to come or go into.
broad: (adjective/adverb) wide; broadly.
steam: (noun/verb) hot water vapor.
atoms: (noun) plural of atom.
press: (noun/verb) a machine for printing; to press something.
lying: (verb) present participle of lie.
basis: (noun) the base or foundation of something.
clock: (noun) an instrument for measuring time.
taste: (noun/verb) the ability to perceive flavour.
grows: (verb) third person singular present tense of grow.
thank: (verb/interjection) to express gratitude.
storm: (noun) a violent disturbance of the atmosphere with strong winds and usually rain, thunder, or snow.
agree: (verb) to have the same opinion about something.
brain: (noun) the organ of the central nervous system located in the head.
track: (noun/verb) a path or route; to track something.
smile: (noun/verb) to express pleasure, happiness, or amusement by curving one's mouth upward.
funny: (adjective/adverb) causing laughter or amusement.
beach: (noun) a pebbly or sandy shore.
stock: (noun/verb) a supply of something; to stock something.
hurry: (verb/noun) to move or act quickly.
saved: (verb) past tense of save.
sorry: (adjective/interjection) feeling regret or sadness.
giant: (adjective/noun) exceptionally large; a giant.
trail: (noun/verb) a path or track; to trail something.
offer: (verb/noun) to present something; an offer.
ought: (verb) modal auxiliary expressing moral obligation or advisability.
rough: (adjective/adverb) having an uneven surface; roughly.
daily: (adjective/adverb) done, occurring, or performed each day.
avoid: (verb) to prevent something.
keeps: (verb) third person singular present tense of keep.
throw: (verb) to propel something through the air with a movement of the arm and hand.
allow: (verb) to permit something.
cream: (noun) a smooth, thick substance.
laugh: (verb/noun) to express amusement or happiness by making sounds.
edges: (noun) plural of edge.
teach: (verb) to provide instruction or guidance to someone.
frame: (noun/verb) a rigid structure forming a border or support; to frame something.
bells: (noun) plural of bell.
dream: (noun/verb) a series of thoughts, images, or emotions occurring during sleep.
magic: (noun/adjective) the power of apparently influencing the course of events by using mysterious or supernatural forces; magical.
occur: (verb) to happen.
ended: (verb) past tense of end.
chord: (noun) a musical interval; a group of musical notes played together.
false: (adjective) not true; untrue.
skill: (noun) the ability to do something well.
holes: (noun) plural of hole.
dozen: (noun) a group of twelve.
brave: (adjective) ready to face and endure danger or pain; showing courage.
apple: (noun) a round fruit with firm, white flesh.
climb: (verb/noun) to ascend.
outer: (adjective) situated on the outside.
pitch: (noun/verb) the degree of highness or lowness of a tone; to pitch something.
ruler: (noun) a straight edge used for measuring.
holds: (verb) third person singular present tense of hold.
fixed: (verb) past tense of fix.
costs: (noun) plural of cost.
calls: (verb) third person singular present tense of call.
blank: (adjective/noun) empty; a blank space.
staff: (noun) a group of people employed by an organization.
labor: (noun/verb) physical or mental work; to labor.
eaten: (verb) past participle of eat.
youth: (noun) the period of life between childhood and adulthood.
tones: (noun) plural of tone.
honor: (noun/verb) high respect; to honor someone.
globe: (noun) a spherical body; a representation of the earth.
gases: (noun) plural of gas.
doors: (noun) plural of door.
poles: (noun) plural of pole.
loose: (adjective/adverb) not firmly attached or fastened.
apply: (verb) to put or spread something onto a surface; to make a formal request for something.
tears: (noun) plural of tear.
exact: (adjective/verb) conforming precisely to fact or truth.
brush: (noun/verb) an instrument for cleaning or painting; to brush something.
chest: (noun) a large, strong box; the upper front part of the body.
layer: (noun) a single thickness of material, typically one of several.
whale: (noun) a large marine mammal.
minor: (adjective/noun) less important or significant; a minor.
faith: (noun) complete trust or confidence in someone or something.
tests: (noun) plural of test.
judge: (noun/verb) a public official authorized to hear and decide cases in a court of law; to form an opinion about.
items: (noun) plural of item.
worry: (noun/verb) to feel or cause anxiety.
waste: (noun/verb) material that is no longer useful; to waste something.
hoped: (verb) past tense of hope.
strip: (noun/verb) a long, narrow piece of something.
begun: (verb) past participle of begin.
aside: (adverb/preposition) to or toward the side.
lakes: (noun) plural of lake.
bound: (adjective/verb/noun) tied or fastened; to leap or jump; a boundary.
depth: (noun) the distance from the top or surface to the bottom.
candy: (noun) a sweet food made with sugar.
event: (noun) a thing that happens, especially one of importance.
worse: (adjective/adverb) of poorer quality; to a greater extent.
aware: (adjective) having knowledge or perception of a situation or fact.
shell: (noun) a hard outer covering.
rooms: (noun) plural of room.
ranch: (noun) a large farm, especially one where cattle are raised.
image: (noun) a representation of the external form of a person or thing.
snake: (noun) a long limbless reptile.
aloud: (adverb) audibly; in a voice that can be heard.
dried: (verb) past tense of dry.
likes: (verb) third person singular present tense of like.
motor: (noun) a machine that converts other forms of energy, especially mechanical, into kinetic energy for the purpose of motion.
pound: (noun/verb) a unit of weight; to strike forcefully.
knees: (noun) plural of knee.
refer: (verb) to mention or allude to.
fully: (adverb) to the greatest extent possible.
chain: (noun/verb) a series of linked metal rings; to chain something.
shirt: (noun) a garment for the upper body.
flour: (noun) a powdery food made by grinding grains of wheat, maize, etc.
drops: (noun) plural of drop.
spite: (noun) a desire to hurt, annoy, or offend someone.
orbit: (noun/verb) the curved path of a celestial object or spacecraft around a star, planet, or moon.
banks: (noun) plural of bank.
shoot: (verb/noun) to fire a weapon; the act of shooting.
curve: (noun/verb) a smooth, continuous bend; to curve something.
tribe: (noun) a social division in a traditional society consisting of families or communities linked by social, economic, religious, or blood ties, with a common culture and dialect, typically having a recognized leader.
tight: (adjective/adverb) firmly fastened or secured.
blind: (adjective/noun/verb) unable to see; blindness; to blind someone.
slept: (verb) past tense of sleep.
shade: (noun/verb) slight darkness caused by something blocking the light; to shade something.
claim: (noun/verb) a statement that something is the case.
flies: (noun) plural of fly.
theme: (noun) the subject of a talk, a piece of writing, a person's thoughts, or an exhibition; a topic.
queen: (noun) a female monarch.
fifth: (adjective/noun/adverb) coming after four others in order.
union: (noun) an association of workers.
hence: (adverb) as a consequence; therefore.
straw: (noun) the dried stalk of a cereal plant.
entry: (noun) an act of entering.
issue: (noun/verb) a problem or dispute; to issue something.
birth: (noun) the process of being born.
feels: (verb) third-person singular present tense of feel.
anger: (noun) a strong feeling of annoyance, displeasure, or hostility.
brief: (adjective/noun/verb) short; a summary; to brief someone.
rhyme: (noun/verb) correspondence of sound between words or the endings of words; to rhyme.
glory: (noun) high renown or honor won by notable achievements.
guard: (noun/verb) a person or thing that protects someone or something; to guard something.
flows: (verb) third person singular present tense of flow.
flesh: (noun) the soft tissue of the body of a vertebrate animal.
owned: (verb) past tense of own.
trick: (noun/verb) a cunning or skillful act; to deceive someone.
yours: (pronoun) possessive form of you.
sizes: (noun) plural of size.
noted: (verb) past tense of note.
width: (noun) the measurement or extent of something from side to side.
burst: (verb/noun) to break open or apart suddenly and violently.
route: (noun) a way or course taken in getting from one place to another.
lungs: (noun) plural of lung.
uncle: (noun) the brother of one's father or mother; the husband of one's aunt.
bears: (noun) plural of bear.
royal: (adjective/noun) relating to a monarch; royalty.
kings: (noun) plural of king.
forty: (number) equivalent to 40.
trial: (noun) a formal examination of evidence before a judge.
cards: (noun) plural of card.
brass: (noun) a yellowish-brown alloy of copper and zinc.
opera: (noun) a dramatic work in one or more acts, typically including singing and orchestral accompaniment, set to music.
chose: (verb) past tense of choose.
owner: (noun) a person who owns something.
vapor: (noun) a substance in the gaseous state.
beats: (noun) plural of beat.
mouse: (noun) a small rodent.
tough: (adjective/adverb) strong; difficult.
wires: (noun) plural of wire.
meter: (noun) a measuring instrument.
tower: (noun) a tall, narrow structure.
finds: (verb) third person singular present tense of find.
inner: (adjective) situated inside.
stuck: (verb) past tense of stick.
arrow: (noun) a pointed projectile fired from a bow.
poems: (noun) plural of poem.
label: (noun/verb) a small piece of paper attached to an object; to label something.
swing: (noun/verb) to move back and forth; a swinging motion.
solar: (adjective) relating to the sun.
truly: (adverb) in a true or genuine manner; sincerely.
tense: (adjective/noun) stretched tight; tension.
beans: (noun) plural of bean.
split: (verb/noun/adjective) to divide something; a division; split apart.
rises: (verb) third person singular present tense of rise.
weigh: (verb) to ascertain how heavy something is.
hotel: (noun) an establishment providing accommodation, meals, and other services for travelers and tourists.
stems: (noun) plural of stem.
pride: (noun) a feeling of deep pleasure or satisfaction derived from achievements, qualities, or possessions.
swung: (verb) past tense of swing.
grade: (noun/verb) a stage in a progression; to grade something.
digit: (noun) a finger or toe.
badly: (adverb) in a poor or unsatisfactory manner.
boots: (noun) plural of boot.
pilot: (noun/verb) a person who flies an aircraft.
sales: (noun) plural of sale.
swept: (verb) past tense of sweep.
lucky: (adjective) fortunate or lucky.
prize: (noun/verb) a reward given for winning a competition.
stove: (noun) an enclosed structure for cooking food.
tubes: (noun) plural of tube.
acres: (noun) plural of acre.
wound: (noun/verb) an injury that breaks the skin; to inflict an injury.
steep: (adjective/verb) having a sharp inclination.
slide: (noun/verb) a smooth, inclined surface for sliding down.
trunk: (noun) the main stem of a tree; the luggage compartment of a car.
error: (noun) a mistake.
porch: (noun) a covered shelter projecting in front of the entrance of a building.
slave: (noun) a person who is legally owned by another and is forced to work for them.
exist: (verb) to have objective reality or being.
faced: (verb) past tense of face.
mines: (noun) plural of mine.
marry: (verb) to enter into a legally or formally recognized relationship with someone.
juice: (noun) the liquid part of a plant.
raced: (verb) past tense of race.
waved: (verb) past tense of wave.
goose: (noun) a type of waterfowl.
trust: (noun/verb) firm belief in the reliability, truth, ability, or strength of someone or something.
fewer: (adjective/pronoun) a smaller number of.
favor: (noun/verb) approval or support; to favor something.
mills: (noun) plural of mill.
views: (noun) plural of view.
joint: (noun/adjective) a point where two or more bones meet.
eager: (adjective) showing keen interest or enthusiasm.
spots: (noun) plural of spot.
blend: (verb/noun) to mix smoothly.
rings: (noun) plural of ring.
adult: (noun/adjective) a person who is fully grown.
index: (noun) an alphabetical list of names or topics.
nails: (noun) plural of nail.
horns: (noun) plural of horn.
balls: (noun) plural of ball.
flame: (noun) a hot, glowing gas produced by something burning.
rates: (noun) plural of rate.
drill: (noun/verb) a tool for boring holes; to drill a hole.
trace: (verb/noun) to follow or copy; a trace amount.
skins: (noun) plural of skin.
waxed: (verb) past tense of wax.
seats: (noun) plural of seat.
stuff: (noun/verb) materials; to stuff something.
ratio: (noun) a quantitative relation between two amounts, showing the number of times one value contains or is contained within the other.
minds: (noun) plural of mind.
dirty: (adjective/verb) covered in dirt or grime; to make something dirty.
silly: (adjective) showing a lack of common sense or judgment.
coins: (noun) plural of coin.
hello: (interjection) used as a greeting.
trips: (noun) plural of trip.
leads: (verb) third-person singular present tense of lead.
rifle: (noun) a type of gun.
hopes: (noun) plural of hope.
bases: (noun) plural of base.
shine: (noun/verb) to emit or reflect light.
bench: (noun) a long seat.
moral: (adjective/noun) concerned with the principles of right and wrong behavior.
fires: (noun) plural of fire.
meals: (noun) plural of meal.
shake: (verb/noun) to move or cause to move rapidly back and forth.
shops: (noun) plural of shop.
cycle: (noun/verb) a series of events that repeat themselves; to cycle.
movie: (noun) a motion picture.
slope: (noun/verb) a surface at an angle to the horizontal.
canoe: (noun) a light, narrow boat.
teams: (noun) plural of team.
folks: (noun) people.
fired: (verb) past tense of fire.
bands: (noun) plural of band.
thumb: (noun) the short, thick first digit of the human hand.
shout: (verb/noun) to utter a loud cry.
canal: (noun) an artificial waterway.
habit: (noun) a settled or regular tendency or practice, especially one that is hard to give up.
reply: (noun/verb) a response; to respond.
ruled: (verb) past tense of rule.
fever: (noun) a high body temperature.
crust: (noun) the hard outer surface of something.
shelf: (noun) a horizontal surface projecting from a wall.
walks: (verb) third person singular present tense of walk.
midst: (noun) the middle of something.
crack: (noun/verb) a narrow opening or fissure; to crack something.
print: (noun/verb) an impression or mark; to print something.
tales: (noun) plural of tale.
coach: (noun/verb) a person who trains an athlete or team.
stiff: (adjective/verb) rigid; to stiffen.
flood: (noun/verb) an overflowing of water onto normally dry land.
verse: (noun) a line of poetry.
awake: (adjective/verb) not asleep.
rocky: (adjective) covered with or consisting of rocks.
march: (noun/verb) a procession; to march.
fault: (noun) a defect or imperfection.
swift: (adjective/adverb) happening or done quickly.
faint: (adjective/verb/noun) weak; to faint; a faint indication.
civil: (adjective) relating to citizens.
ghost: (noun) the soul or spirit of a dead person or thing.
feast: (noun/verb) a large meal; to feast.
blade: (noun) the cutting part of a knife or other tool.
limit: (noun/verb) a point beyond which something cannot proceed; to limit something.
germs: (noun) plural of germ.
reads: (verb) third person singular present tense of read.
ducks: (noun) plural of duck.
dairy: (noun/adjective) a building where milk is processed; relating to milk.
worst: (adjective/adverb) of the lowest quality; to a greater extent.
gifts: (noun) plural of gift.
lists: (noun) plural of list.
stops: (noun) plural of stop; also a verb.
rapid: (adjective/adverb) happening or moving very quickly.
brick: (noun) a rectangular block of baked clay used for building.
claws: (noun) plural of claw.
beads: (noun) plural of bead.
beast: (noun) an animal, especially a large or wild one.
skirt: (noun) a garment worn around the waist.
cakes: (noun) plural of cake.
lions: (noun) plural of lion.
frogs: (noun) plural of frog.
tries: (verb) third person singular present tense of try.
nerve: (noun) one or more bundles of fibers that transmit impulses between parts of the nervous system.
grand: (adjective/noun) large or impressive in size or extent; a grand.
armed: (verb) past tense of arm.
treat: (noun/verb) a special and enjoyable occasion; to treat someone.
honey: (noun) a sweet substance made by bees.
moist: (adjective) slightly wet.
legal: (adjective) relating to the law.
penny: (noun) a monetary unit.
crown: (noun/verb) a decorative headdress; to crown something.
shock: (noun/verb) a sudden, upsetting event; to shock someone.
taxes: (noun) plural of tax.
sixty: (number) equivalent to 60.
altar: (noun) a raised structure on which offerings or sacrifices are made.
pulls: (verb) third person singular present tense of pull.
sport: (noun) an athletic activity requiring skill or physical prowess and often of a competitive nature.
drums: (noun) plural of drum.
talks: (verb) third person singular present tense of talk.
dying: (verb) present participle of die.
dates: (noun) plural of date.
drank: (verb) past tense of drink.
blows: (noun) plural of blow.
lever: (noun) a rigid bar resting on a pivot, used to lift or move heavy objects at one end by pushing down on the other.
wages: (noun) plural of wage.
proof: (noun/verb) evidence or arguments; to prove something.
drugs: (noun) plural of drug.
tanks: (noun) plural of tank.
sings: (verb) third person singular present tense of sing.
tails: (noun) plural of tail.
pause: (noun/verb) a temporary stop or rest.
herds: (noun) plural of herd.
arose: (verb) past tense of arise.
hated: (verb) past tense of hate.
clues: (noun) plural of clue.
novel: (noun) a fictional prose narrative of book length.
shame: (noun) a feeling of guilt, dishonor, or disgrace.
burnt: (verb) past tense of burn.
races: (noun) plural of race.
flash: (noun/verb) a sudden, brief burst of light; to flash.
weary: (adjective) feeling or showing extreme tiredness.
heels: (noun) plural of heel.
token: (noun) a symbol; a representative.
coats: (noun) plural of coat.
spare: (verb/adjective/noun) to refrain from harming or destroying; additional; a spare part.
shiny: (adjective) reflecting light.
alarm: (noun/verb) a warning signal; to alarm someone.
dimes: (noun) plural of dime.
sixth: (adjective/noun/adverb) coming after five others in order.
clerk: (noun) a person employed in an office or business establishment.
mercy: (noun) compassion or forgiveness shown toward someone whom it is within one's power to punish or harm.
sunny: (adjective) bright with sunshine.
guest: (noun) a person who is invited to visit someone's house or to attend a particular event.
float: (verb/noun) to rest on the surface of a liquid; a floating object.
shone: (verb) past tense of shine.
pipes: (noun) plural of pipe.
worms: (noun) plural of worm.
bills: (noun) plural of bill.
sweat: (noun/verb) a clear, colorless liquid secreted by sweat glands.
suits: (noun) plural of suit.
smart: (adjective/adverb) intelligent; smartly.
upset: (adjective/verb) unhappy or annoyed; to upset someone.
rains: (noun) plural of rain.
sandy: (adjective) consisting of or resembling sand.
rainy: (adjective) characterized by rain.
parks: (noun) plural of park.
sadly: (adverb) in a sad manner.
fancy: (adjective/noun/verb) elaborate or decorative; imagination; to imagine or desire.
rider: (noun) a person who rides.
unity: (noun) the state of being united or joined as a whole.
bunch: (noun) a number of things of the same kind growing or fastened together.
rolls: (noun) plural of roll.
crash: (noun/verb) a sudden violent collision.
craft: (noun/verb) skill in making things; to make something.
newly: (adverb) recently.
gates: (noun) plural of gate.
hatch: (noun/verb) a small door or opening; to hatch eggs.
paths: (noun) plural of path.
funds: (noun) plural of fund.
wider: (adjective/adverb) of greater width; more widely.
grace: (noun/verb) elegance or refinement of movement; to grace something.
grave: (noun/adjective) a place for burying a body; serious.
tides: (noun) plural of tide.
admit: (verb) to confess to be true or to be the case.
shift: (noun/verb) a change in position; to shift something.
sails: (noun) plural of sail.
pupil: (noun) a person who is learning under the supervision of another person.
tiger: (noun) a large, powerful cat.
angel: (noun) a supernatural being.
cruel: (adjective) willing to cause pain or suffering to others.
agent: (noun) a person who acts on behalf of another.
drama: (noun) a play; a serious or exciting event.
urged: (verb) past tense of urge.
patch: (noun/verb) a piece of material used to repair a hole.
nests: (noun) plural of nest.
vital: (adjective) absolutely necessary or essential.
sword: (noun) a weapon with a long blade.
blame: (noun/verb) to assign responsibility for a fault or wrong.
weeds: (noun) plural of weed.
screw: (noun/verb) a fastener; to fasten with a screw.
vocal: (adjective/noun) relating to the voice; a vocal performance.
bacon: (noun) cured meat from a pig.
chalk: (noun) a soft white limestone.
cargo: (noun) goods carried by a large vehicle.
crazy: (adjective) mentally ill; foolish.
acted: (verb) past tense of act.
goats: (noun) plural of goat.
arise: (verb) to get up; to come into existence.
witch: (noun) a woman who practices witchcraft.
loves: (verb) third person singular present tense of love.
queer: (adjective/noun) strange; a homosexual person.
dwell: (verb) to live in a place.
backs: (noun) plural of back.
ropes: (noun) plural of rope.
shots: (noun) plural of shot.
merry: (adjective) cheerful and happy.
phone: (noun) a telephone.
cheek: (noun) either side of the face below the eye.
peaks: (noun) plural of peak.
ideal: (adjective/noun) perfectly suitable; an ideal.
beard: (noun) the hair growing on the chin and cheeks of a man's face.
eagle: (noun) a large bird of prey.
creek: (noun) a small stream.
cries: (noun) plural of cry.
ashes: (noun) plural of ash; the residue of something that has been burnt.
stall: (noun/verb) a booth; to stall.
yield: (verb/noun) to produce something; a yield of crops.
mayor: (noun) the head of a city or town government.
opens: (verb) third person singular present tense of open.
input: (noun/verb) something put into a system.
fleet: (noun) a group of ships sailing together.
tooth: (noun) a hard, bony projection in the jaws of most vertebrates.
cubic: (adjective) having the shape of a cube.
wives: (noun) plural of wife.
burns: (verb) third person singular present tense of burn.
poets: (noun) plural of poet.
apron: (noun) a garment worn over clothes to protect them.
spear: (noun) a weapon with a pointed head.
organ: (noun) a part of the body that has a specific function.
cliff: (noun) a steep rock face.
stamp: (noun/verb) a small piece of gummed paper used to pay postage; to stamp something.
paste: (noun) a soft, sticky mixture.
rural: (adjective) relating to the countryside rather than the town.
baked: (verb) past tense of bake.
chase: (verb/noun) to pursue something.
slice: (noun/verb) a thin, flat piece; to cut a thin piece.
slant: (noun/verb) an oblique angle; to slant something.
knock: (verb/noun) to strike a surface.
noisy: (adjective) making much noise.
sorts: (noun) plural of sort.
stays: (verb) third person singular present tense of stay.
wiped: (verb) past tense of wipe.
blown: (verb) past tense of blow.
piled: (verb) past tense of pile.
clubs: (noun) plural of club.
cheer: (noun/verb) to express happiness or praise.
widow: (noun) a woman whose husband has died.
twist: (noun/verb) a turning motion; to twist something.
tenth: (adjective/noun/adverb) coming after nine others in order.
hides: (verb) third person singular present tense of hide.
comma: (noun) a punctuation mark.
sweep: (verb/noun) to clean; a sweeping motion.
spoon: (noun) a utensil used for eating.
stern: (adjective/noun) strict; the rear of a ship.
crept: (verb) past tense of creep.
maple: (noun) a type of tree.
deeds: (noun) plural of deed.
rides: (noun) plural of ride.
muddy: (adjective) covered in mud.
crime: (noun) an action that is against the law.
jelly: (noun) a sweet food made from fruit.
ridge: (noun) a long, narrow elevation.
drift: (noun/verb) a gradual movement; to drift.
dusty: (adjective) covered in dust.
devil: (noun) a supernatural evil being.
tempo: (noun) the speed of a piece of music.
humor: (noun) the quality of being amusing.
sends: (verb) third person singular present tense of send.
steal: (verb) to take something without the owner's permission.
tents: (noun) plural of tent.
waist: (noun) the narrow part of the body between the ribs and hips.
roses: (noun) plural of rose.
reign: (noun/verb) the period of a monarch's rule; to rule.
noble: (adjective/noun) of high moral character; a nobleman.
cheap: (adjective/adverb) low in price; cheaply.
dense: (adjective) closely packed together.
linen: (noun) a fabric made from flax.
geese: (noun) plural of goose.
woven: (verb) past participle of weave.
posts: (noun) plural of post.
hired: (verb) past tense of hire.
wrath: (noun) extreme anger.
salad: (noun) a dish of various mixtures of raw or cooked vegetables.
bowed: (verb) past tense of bow.
tires: (noun) plural of tire.
shark: (noun) a type of fish.
belts: (noun) plural of belt.
grasp: (verb/noun) to hold firmly; a firm hold.
blast: (noun/verb) a sudden, violent explosion of air or wind.
polar: (adjective) relating to the North or South Pole.
fungi: (noun) plural of fungus.
tends: (verb) third person singular present tense of tend.
pearl: (noun) a hard, lustrous gem formed within the soft tissue of a living shelled mollusk.
jokes: (noun) plural of joke.
veins: (noun) plural of vein.
frost: (noun) ice formed on cold surfaces from water vapor in the air.
hears: (verb) third person singular present tense of hear.
loses: (verb) third person singular present tense of lose.
hosts: (noun) plural of host.
diver: (noun) a person who dives.
phase: (noun) a stage in a process.
toads: (noun) plural of toad.
alert: (adjective/verb) watchful; to alert someone.
tasks: (noun) plural of task.
seams: (noun) plural of seam.
coral: (noun) a hard stony substance secreted by certain marine coelenterates.
focus: (noun/verb) the central point of interest or activity; to focus on something.
naked: (adjective) without clothing.
puppy: (noun) a young dog.
jumps: (verb) third person singular present tense of jump.
spoil: (verb/noun) to damage or destroy; spoiled food.
quart: (noun) a unit of liquid measure.
macro: (adjective/prefix) large; relating to macroeconomics.
fears: (noun) plural of fear.
flung: (verb) past tense of fling.
spark: (noun/verb) a small piece of burning material; to spark something.
vivid: (adjective) producing powerful feelings or strong, clear images in the mind.
brook: (noun) a small stream.
steer: (verb/noun) to guide or control the course of a vehicle; a steer.
spray: (noun/verb) a fine mist or shower of liquid.
decay: (noun/verb) the state or process of rotting or decomposition.
ports: (noun) plural of port.
socks: (noun) plural of sock.
urban: (adjective) relating to or characteristic of a town or city.
goals: (noun) plural of goal.
grant: (noun/verb) an amount of money given for a particular purpose; to grant something.
minus: (preposition/adjective/noun) less; negative; a minus sign.
films: (noun) plural of film.
tunes: (noun) plural of tune.
shaft: (noun) a long, narrow, typically cylindrical object.
firms: (noun) plural of firm.
skies: (noun) plural of sky.
bride: (noun) a woman on her wedding day.
wreck: (noun/verb) the destruction of something; to wreck something.
flock: (noun/verb) a group of birds; to gather in a flock.
stare: (verb/noun) to look fixedly or intently.
hobby: (noun) an activity done regularly in one's leisure time for pleasure.
bonds: (noun) plural of bond.
dared: (verb) past tense of dare.
faded: (verb) past tense of fade.
thief: (noun) a person who steals.
crude: (adjective) in a natural or raw state; lacking sophistication.
pants: (noun) trousers.
flute: (noun) a wind instrument.
votes: (noun) plural of vote.
tonal: (adjective) relating to tone or pitch.
radar: (noun) a system for detecting the presence, direction, distance, and speed of aircraft, ships, or other objects by sending out radio waves that are reflected back.
wells: (noun) plural of well.
skull: (noun) the bony framework of the head.
hairs: (noun) plural of hair.
argue: (verb) to express a different opinion; to disagree.
wears: (verb) third person singular present tense of wear.
dolls: (noun) plural of doll.
voted: (verb) past tense of vote.
caves: (noun) plural of cave.
cared: (verb) past tense of care.
broom: (noun) a brush for sweeping.
scent: (noun) a distinctive smell.
panel: (noun) a flat, rectangular section.
fairy: (noun) a mythical being.
olive: (noun/adjective) an olive tree; olive-colored.
bends: (verb) third person singular present tense of bend.
prism: (noun) a transparent optical instrument, usually made of glass, having typically three rectangular sides and triangular ends, used to separate white light into its constituent colours.
lamps: (noun) plural of lamp.
cable: (noun) a thick, strong rope or wire.
peach: (noun) a type of fruit.
ruins: (noun) plural of ruin.
rally: (noun/verb) a public meeting or demonstration; to rally.
schwa: (noun) a neutral vowel sound.
lambs: (noun) plural of lamb.
sells: (verb) third person singular present tense of sell.
cools: (verb) third person singular present tense of cool.
draft: (noun/verb) a current of air; to draft something.
charm: (noun/verb) a pleasing quality; to charm someone.
limbs: (noun) plural of limb.
brake: (noun/verb) a device for slowing or stopping a vehicle.
gazed: (verb) past tense of gaze.
cubes: (noun) plural of cube.
delay: (noun/verb) to postpone something.
beams: (noun) plural of beam.
fetch: (verb) to go and get something.
ranks: (noun) plural of rank.
array: (noun/verb) an ordered series or arrangement.
harsh: (adjective) unpleasantly rough.
camel: (noun) a large, humped mammal.
vines: (noun) plural of vine.
picks: (verb) third person singular present tense of pick.
naval: (adjective) relating to a navy.
purse: (noun) a small bag for carrying money.
rigid: (adjective) unable to bend or be forced out of shape.
crawl: (verb/noun) to move on hands and knees; a crawling motion.
toast: (noun/verb) bread browned by heat; to toast something.
soils: (verb) third person singular present tense of soil.
sauce: (noun) a liquid or semi-liquid condiment.
basin: (noun) a bowl-shaped container.
ponds: (noun) plural of pond.
twins: (noun) plural of twin.
wrist: (noun) the joint connecting the hand to the forearm.
fluid: (noun/adjective) a substance that can flow.
pools: (noun) plural of pool.
brand: (noun/verb) a trademark; to brand something.
stalk: (noun/verb) the main stem of a plant; to stalk someone.
robot: (noun) a machine that can perform complex actions automatically.
reeds: (noun) plural of reed.
hoofs: (noun) plural of hoof.
buses: (noun) plural of bus.
sheer: (adjective/adverb) very thin; completely.
grief: (noun) intense sorrow.
bloom: (noun/verb) a flower; to flower.
dwelt: (verb) past tense of dwell.
melts: (verb) third person singular present tense of melt.
risen: (verb) past participle of rise.
flags: (noun) plural of flag.
knelt: (verb) past tense of kneel.
fiber: (noun) a thin, threadlike structure.
roofs: (noun) plural of roof.
freed: (verb) past tense of free.
armor: (noun) protective covering.
piles: (noun) plural of pile.
aimed: (verb) past tense of aim.
algae: (noun) plural of alga.
twigs: (noun) plural of twig.
lemon: (noun) a type of citrus fruit.
ditch: (noun/verb) a long, narrow channel dug in the ground; to ditch something.
drunk: (adjective/verb) intoxicated; to drink.
rests: (verb) third person singular present tense of rest.
chill: (noun/verb) a feeling of cold; to chill something.
slain: (verb) past participle of slay.
panic: (noun/verb) sudden uncontrollable fear or anxiety.
cords: (noun) plural of cord.
tuned: (verb) past tense of tune.
crisp: (adjective) firm, fresh, and brittle.
ledge: (noun) a narrow horizontal shelf.
dived: (verb) past tense of dive.
swamp: (noun/verb) an area of low-lying, waterlogged land; to swamp something.
clung: (verb) past tense of cling.
stole: (verb) past tense of steal.
molds: (noun) plural of mold.
yarns: (noun) plural of yarn.
liver: (noun) a large gland in the abdomen.
gauge: (noun/verb) a measuring instrument; to gauge something.
breed: (noun/verb) a type of animal; to breed animals.
stool: (noun) a seat without a back or arms.
gulls: (noun) plural of gull.
awoke: (verb) past tense of awake.
gross: (adjective/noun) very unpleasant; a gross amount.
diary: (noun) a daily record of events.
rails: (noun) plural of rail.
belly: (noun) the abdomen.
trend: (noun) a general direction in which something is developing or changing.
flask: (noun) a small, flat bottle.
stake: (noun/verb) a pointed piece of wood; to stake something.
fried: (verb) past tense of fry.
draws: (verb) third person singular present tense of draw.
actor: (noun) a person who acts in a play, movie, or television program.
handy: (adjective) useful or convenient.
bowls: (noun) plural of bowl.
haste: (noun) excessive speed or urgency of movement or action.
scope: (noun) the extent of the area or subject matter that something deals with or to which it is relevant.
deals: (noun) plural of deal.
knots: (noun) plural of knot.
moons: (noun) plural of moon.
essay: (noun) a short piece of writing on a particular subject.
thump: (noun/verb) a heavy blow or impact; to thump something.
hangs: (verb) third person singular present tense of hang.
bliss: (noun) perfect happiness.
dealt: (verb) past tense of deal.
gains: (noun) plural of gain.
bombs: (noun) plural of bomb.
clown: (noun) a person who entertains people by acting in a funny way.
palms: (noun) plural of palm.
cones: (noun) plural of cone.
roast: (verb/noun) to cook by dry heat; roasted meat.
tidal: (adjective) relating to tides.
bored: (adjective) feeling weary because one is unoccupied or lacks interest in one's current activity.
chant: (noun/verb) a repetitive song or phrase.
acids: (noun) plural of acid.
dough: (noun) a thick, sticky mixture of flour and water.
camps: (noun) plural of camp.
swore: (verb) past tense of swear.
lover: (noun) a person who loves another person.
hooks: (noun) plural of hook.
males: (noun) plural of male.
cocoa: (noun) a powder made from roasted cacao beans.
punch: (noun/verb) a blow; to punch someone.
award: (noun/verb) a prize or distinction; to award something.
reins: (noun) plural of rein.
ninth: (adjective/noun/adverb) coming after eight others in order.
noses: (noun) plural of nose.
links: (noun) plural of link.
drain: (noun/verb) a pipe that carries off waste water or sewage; to drain something.
fills: (verb) third person singular present tense of fill.
nylon: (noun) a synthetic material.
lunar: (adjective) relating to the moon.
pulse: (noun/verb) the rhythmic expansion and contraction of the arteries; to pulse.
flown: (verb) past participle of fly.
elbow: (noun) the joint between the forearm and upper arm.
fatal: (adjective) causing death.
sites: (noun) plural of site.
moths: (noun) plural of moth.
meats: (noun) plural of meat.
foxes: (noun) plural of fox.
mined: (verb) past tense of mine.
attic: (noun) a room under a roof.
fiery: (adjective) burning fiercely; passionate.
mount: (noun/verb) a mountain; to mount something.
usage: (noun) the way in which something is used.
swear: (verb) to make a solemn statement or promise.
snowy: (adjective) covered in snow.
rusty: (adjective) covered in rust.
scare: (verb/noun) to frighten someone; a frightening experience.
traps: (noun) plural of trap.
relax: (verb) to make or become less tense or anxious.
react: (verb) to act in response to something.
valid: (adjective) legally sound or effective.
robin: (noun) a type of bird.
cease: (verb) to stop.
gills: (noun) plural of gill.
prior: (adjective/noun) preceding in time or order; a prior.
safer: (adjective) more safe.
polio: (noun) poliomyelitis; infantile paralysis.
loyal: (adjective) giving or showing firm and constant support or allegiance to a person or cause.
swell: (noun/verb) a rise in the level of something.
salty: (adjective) containing or tasting of salt.
marsh: (noun) an area of low-lying land that is flooded in wet seasons or at high tide.
vague: (adjective) unclear or imprecise.
weave: (verb) to make (a garment, fabric, etc.) by interlacing threads or other flexible materials.
mound: (noun) a heap of earth or stones.
seals: (noun) plural of seal.
mules: (noun) plural of mule.
virus: (noun) an infective agent that typically consists of a nucleic acid molecule in a protein coat.
scout: (noun/verb) a person employed to look for information; to scout for something.
acute: (adjective) severe; sharp.
windy: (adjective) very windy.
stout: (adjective) strong and sturdy.
folds: (noun) plural of fold.
seize: (verb) to take hold of suddenly and forcibly.
hilly: (adjective) having many hills.
joins: (verb) third person singular present tense of join.
pluck: (verb/noun) to pull something off suddenly.
stack: (noun/verb) a pile of things; to stack something.
lords: (noun) plural of lord.
dunes: (noun) plural of dune.
burro: (noun) a donkey.
hawks: (noun) plural of hawk.
trout: (noun) a type of fish.
feeds: (verb) third person singular present tense of feed.
scarf: (noun) a piece of fabric worn around the neck or head.
halls: (noun) plural of hall.
coals: (noun) plural of coal.
towel: (noun) a piece of absorbent cloth or paper used for drying.
souls: (noun) plural of soul.
elect: (verb/noun) to choose someone for a position; an elected official.
buggy: (adjective/noun) full of bugs; a type of carriage.
pumps: (noun) plural of pump.
loans: (noun) plural of loan.
spins: (verb) third person singular present tense of spin.
files: (noun) plural of file.
oxide: (noun) a compound of oxygen and another element.
pains: (noun) plural of pain.
photo: (noun, short form) photograph.
rival: (noun/verb) a person or thing competing with another for the same objective or for superiority in the same field; to rival.
flats: (noun) plural of flat.
syrup: (noun) a thick, sweet liquid.
rodeo: (noun) a public spectacle featuring various competitive events.
sands: (noun) plural of sand.
moose: (noun) a large deer.
pints: (noun) plural of pint.
curly: (adjective) having curls.
comic: (adjective/noun) causing laughter; a comic.
cloak: (noun) a loose outer garment.
onion: (noun) a type of vegetable.
clams: (noun) plural of clam.
scrap: (noun/verb) a small piece; to scrap something.
didst: (verb, archaic) second person singular past tense of do.
couch: (noun) a long seat with a back and arms.
codes: (noun) plural of code.
fails: (verb) third person singular present tense of fail.
ounce: (noun) a unit of weight.
lodge: (noun/verb) a small house or cabin; to lodge somewhere.
greet: (verb) to address or welcome someone.
gypsy: (noun) a member of a wandering group of people.
utter: (verb/adjective) to speak or pronounce something; complete or absolute.
paved: (verb) past tense of pave.
zones: (noun) plural of zone.
fours: (noun) plural of four.
alley: (noun) a narrow passageway.
tiles: (noun) plural of tile.
bless: (verb) to make holy or sacred; to ask God to protect someone.
crest: (noun) the top of a hill or wave; a badge or emblem.
elder: (noun/adjective) an older person, especially one who is respected for their age and wisdom; older.
kills: (verb) third person singular present tense of kill.
yeast: (noun) a fungus that is used in baking to make bread rise.
erect: (adjective/verb) upright; to erect something.
bugle: (noun) a brass instrument.
medal: (noun) an award given for achievement.
roles: (noun) plural of role.
hound: (noun) a type of dog.
snail: (noun) a mollusc that has a coiled shell.
alter: (verb) to change something.
ankle: (noun) the joint connecting the foot to the leg.
relay: (noun/verb) a race in which runners take turns; to relay something.
loops: (noun) plural of loop.
zeros: (noun) plural of zero.
bites: (noun) plural of bite.
modes: (noun) plural of mode.
debts: (noun) plural of debt.
realm: (noun) a kingdom; a field of study.
glove: (noun) a covering for the hand.
rayon: (noun) a synthetic fiber.
swims: (verb) third person singular present tense of swim.
poked: (verb) past tense of poke.
stray: (verb/adjective/noun) to wander away; wandering; something stray.
lifts: (verb) third person singular present tense of lift.
maker: (noun) a person who makes something.
lumps: (noun) plural of lump.
graze: (verb/noun) to feed on grass; a graze.
dread: (noun/verb) intense fear; to fear greatly.
barns: (noun) plural of barn.
docks: (noun) plural of dock.
masts: (noun) plural of mast.
pours: (verb) third person singular present tense of pour.
wharf: (noun) a structure on the shore where ships can dock to load and unload goods.
curse: (noun/verb) to utter a word or phrase expressing anger or annoyance; a curse.
plump: (adjective/verb) pleasantly fat; to make something plump.
robes: (noun) plural of robe.
seeks: (verb) third person singular present tense of seek.
cedar: (noun) a type of evergreen tree.
curls: (noun) plural of curl.
jolly: (adjective/adverb) cheerful and good-humored.
myths: (noun) plural of myth.
cages: (noun) plural of cage.
gloom: (noun) partial or total darkness.
locks: (noun) plural of lock.
pedal: (noun/verb) a foot-operated lever; to pedal.
beets: (noun) plural of beet.
crows: (noun) plural of crow.
anode: (noun) the positive electrode of an electrolytic cell.
slash: (verb/noun) to cut with a sweeping stroke; a sweeping stroke.
creep: (verb/noun) to move slowly and carefully.
rowed: (verb) past tense of row.
chips: (noun) plural of chip.
fists: (noun) plural of fist.
wines: (noun) plural of wine.
cares: (verb) third person singular present tense of care.
valve: (noun) a device that regulates the passage of fluids or gases.
newer: (adjective) more new.
motel: (noun) a roadside hotel.
ivory: (noun/adjective) a hard, creamy-white substance; ivory-colored.
necks: (noun) plural of neck.
clamp: (noun/verb) a device for holding or fastening things tightly together.
barge: (noun) a large, flat-bottomed boat.
blues: (noun) a type of music; sadness.
alien: (adjective/noun) belonging to another country; an alien.
frown: (noun/verb) to wrinkle one's brow.
strap: (noun/verb) a strip of material used for fastening or support; to strap something.
crews: (noun) plural of crew.
shack: (noun) a small, crudely built hut or cabin.
gonna: (verb, informal) going to.
saves: (verb) third person singular present tense of save.
stump: (noun/verb) the part of a tree left in the ground after the rest has been cut down; to stump someone.
ferry: (noun/verb) a boat or ship for carrying passengers and goods across a body of water; to ferry someone.
idols: (noun) plural of idol.
cooks: (noun) plural of cook.
juicy: (adjective) full of juice.
glare: (noun/verb) a harsh, bright light; to glare.
carts: (noun) plural of cart.
alloy: (noun) a metal made by combining two or more metallic elements.
bulbs: (noun) plural of bulb.
lawns: (noun) plural of lawn.
lasts: (verb) third person singular present tense of last.
fuels: (noun) plural of fuel.
oddly: (adverb) strangely.
crane: (noun) a large, tall bird; a machine.
filed: (verb) past tense of file.
weird: (adjective) strange or odd.
shawl: (noun) a piece of fabric worn over the shoulders or head.
slips: (noun) plural of slip.
troop: (noun/verb) a group of soldiers; to troop.
bolts: (noun) plural of bolt.
suite: (noun) a set of rooms.
sleek: (adjective) smooth and glossy.
quilt: (noun) a bed covering.
tramp: (noun/verb) a homeless person; to trample.
blaze: (noun/verb) a large, uncontrolled fire; to blaze.
atlas: (noun) a book of maps; also an anatomical term.
odors: (noun) plural of odor.
scrub: (noun/verb) low-lying vegetation; to scrub.
crabs: (noun) plural of crab.
probe: (noun/verb) an investigation; to investigate something.
logic: (noun) rational thinking.
adobe: (noun) a type of brick.
exile: (noun/verb) the state of being banished from one's native country; to exile someone.
rebel: (noun/verb) a person who rebels.
grind: (verb/noun) to reduce something to powder or small pieces; a grinding motion.
sting: (noun/verb) a sharp, sudden pain; to sting someone.
spine: (noun) the series of vertebrae extending from the skull to the small of the back, forming the main support of the body; a sharp point.
cling: (verb) to hold on tightly to someone or something.
desks: (noun) plural of desk.
grove: (noun) a small group of trees.
leaps: (noun) plural of leap.
prose: (noun) written or spoken language in its ordinary form, without metrical structure.
lofty: (adjective) of imposing height.
agony: (noun) intense physical or mental suffering.
snare: (noun/verb) a trap; to trap.
tusks: (noun) plural of tusk; long, pointed teeth of some animals.
bulls: (noun) plural of bull.
moods: (noun) plural of mood.
humid: (adjective) containing a high amount of water vapor.
finer: (adjective) of better quality.
dimly: (adverb) faintly; vaguely.
plank: (noun) a long, flat, thick piece of wood.
china: (noun) porcelain tableware; China (the country).
pines: (noun) plural of pine.
guilt: (noun) the fact or state of having committed a specified or implied offense or crime.
sacks: (noun) plural of sack.
brace: (noun/verb) a support; to brace something.
quote: (noun/verb) a passage or expression; to quote something.
lathe: (noun) a machine for shaping wood or metal.
gaily: (adverb) in a cheerful and lively manner.
fonts: (noun) plural of font.
scalp: (noun) the skin covering the top of the head.
adopt: (verb) to take something as one's own.
foggy: (adjective) misty or hazy.
ferns: (noun) plural of fern.
grams: (noun) plural of gram.
clump: (noun/verb) a dense group or cluster of things; to clump together.
perch: (noun/verb) a bird's resting place; to perch.
tumor: (noun) a swelling of a part of the body, generally without inflammation, caused by an abnormal growth of tissue.
teens: (noun) plural of teen.
crank: (noun/verb) a handle for turning a machine; to crank something.
fable: (noun) a short story, typically with animals as characters, conveying a moral.
hedge: (noun/verb) a fence or boundary; to hedge.
genes: (noun) plural of gene.
sober: (adjective/verb) not drunk; to sober up.
boast: (noun/verb) a proud statement; to boast.
tract: (noun) an area of land; a pamphlet.
cigar: (noun) a roll of tobacco leaves.
unite: (verb) to join or combine.
owing: (verb) present participle of owe.
thigh: (noun) the part of the leg between the hip and the knee.
haiku: (noun) a Japanese poem.
swish: (noun/verb) a swishing sound; to swish something.
dikes: (noun) plural of dike.
wedge: (noun/verb) a piece of wood or metal tapering to a thin edge; to wedge something.
booth: (noun) a small enclosure or stall.
eased: (verb) past tense of ease.
frail: (adjective) weak and delicate.
cough: (noun/verb) to expel air from the lungs.
tombs: (noun) plural of tomb.
darts: (noun) plural of dart.
forts: (noun) plural of fort.
choir: (noun) a group of singers.
pouch: (noun) a small bag or sack.
pinch: (verb/noun) to squeeze something firmly between the fingers; a pinching action.
hairy: (adjective) covered in hair.
buyer: (noun) a person who buys something.
torch: (noun) a handheld device that produces light.
vigor: (noun) physical strength and energy.
waltz: (noun/verb) a dance.
heats: (verb) third person singular present tense of heat.
herbs: (noun) plural of herb.
users: (noun) plural of user.
flint: (noun) a hard, grey or black kind of stone that produces sparks when struck.
click: (noun/verb) a short, sharp sound; to click.
madam: (noun) a polite form of address for a woman.
bleak: (adjective) bare and desolate.
blunt: (adjective/verb) having a dull edge or point; to blunt something.
aided: (verb) past tense of aid.
lacks: (verb) third person singular present tense of lack.
masks: (noun) plural of mask.
waded: (verb) past tense of wade.
risks: (noun) plural of risk.
nurse: (noun/verb) a person trained to care for the sick or infirm; to nurse someone.
chaos: (noun) complete disorder and confusion.
sewed: (verb) past tense of sew.
cured: (verb) past tense of cure.
ample: (adjective) enough or more than enough; plentiful.
lease: (noun/verb) a contract granting use or occupation of property during a specified period.
steak: (noun) a slice of meat.
sinks: (verb) third person singular present tense of sink.
merit: (noun) the quality of being good or worthy.
bluff: (noun/verb/adjective) a steep cliff or bank; to bluff someone.
bathe: (verb) to wash or soak oneself.
gleam: (noun/verb) a flash of light; to gleam.
bonus: (noun) an amount of money added to a person's wages.
colts: (noun) plural of colt.
shear: (verb) to cut the wool off (a sheep).
gland: (noun) an organ that secretes substances into the bloodstream or into a body cavity or onto the surface of the skin.
silky: (adjective) smooth and soft.
skate: (verb/noun) to glide on ice skates.
birch: (noun) a type of tree.
anvil: (noun) a heavy iron block on which metal is shaped.
sleds: (noun) plural of sled.
groan: (verb/noun) to make a deep, prolonged sound expressing pain or unhappiness.
maids: (noun) plural of maid.
meets: (verb) third person singular present tense of meet.
speck: (noun) a very small spot or mark.
hymns: (noun) plural of hymn.
hints: (noun) plural of hint.
drown: (verb) to die under water.
bosom: (noun) a woman's chest.
slick: (adjective/verb) smooth and slippery; to slick something.
quest: (noun) a long or arduous search for something.
coils: (noun) plural of coil.
spied: (verb) past tense of spy.
snows: (verb) third person singular present tense of snow.
stead: (noun) a place.
snack: (noun) a small amount of food eaten between meals.
plows: (noun) plural of plow.
blond: (adjective/noun) light-yellow or golden-colored hair.
tamed: (verb) past tense of tame.
thorn: (noun) a sharp-pointed woody projection.
waits: (verb) third person singular present tense of wait.
glued: (verb) past tense of glue.
banjo: (noun) a stringed instrument.
tease: (verb/noun) to provoke or irritate; teasing.
arena: (noun) a place where sports or entertainments are held.
bulky: (adjective) large and unwieldy.
carve: (verb) to cut or shape something.
stunt: (noun/verb) a daring feat.
warms: (verb) third person singular present tense of warm.
shady: (adjective) sheltered from direct sunlight.
razor: (noun) a sharp instrument for shaving.
folly: (noun) foolishness; a costly structure.
leafy: (adjective) full of leaves.
notch: (noun/verb) an indentation or indentation; to notch something.
fools: (noun) plural of fool.
otter: (noun) a semi-aquatic mammal.
pears: (noun) plural of pear.
flush: (verb/noun/adjective) to redden; a reddening; level.
genus: (noun) a principal taxonomic category that ranks above species and below family, and is denoted by a capitalized Latin name, e.g., Homo sapiens.
ached: (verb) past tense of ache.
fives: (noun) plural of five.
flaps: (noun) plural of flap.
spout: (noun/verb) a tube or pipe for conveying liquid; to spout something.
smote: (verb, archaic) struck or hit forcefully.
fumes: (noun) plural of fume.
adapt: (verb) to adjust or modify.
cuffs: (noun) plural of cuff.
tasty: (adjective) delicious.
stoop: (verb/noun) to bend down; a stooping posture.
clips: (noun) plural of clip.
disks: (noun) plural of disk.
sniff: (verb/noun) to draw air audibly up the nose; a sniffing sound.
lanes: (noun) plural of lane.
brisk: (adjective/adverb) quick and energetic; briskly.
imply: (verb) to strongly suggest the truth or existence of something not expressly stated.
demon: (noun) an evil supernatural being.
super: (adjective/adverb/noun) excellent; superlatively; a superhero.
furry: (adjective) covered in fur.
raged: (verb) past tense of rage.
growl: (verb/noun) to make a low, guttural sound.
texts: (noun) plural of text.
hardy: (adjective) robust; strong.
stung: (verb) past tense of sting.
typed: (verb) past tense of type.
hates: (verb) third person singular present tense of hate.
wiser: (adjective) more wise.
timid: (adjective) shy or bashful.
serum: (noun) a liquid containing antibodies.
beaks: (noun) plural of beak.
rotor: (noun) a rotating part of a machine.
casts: (verb) third person singular present tense of cast; (noun) plural of cast.
bathe: (verb) to wash or soak oneself.
glide: (verb/noun) to move smoothly and effortlessly; a gliding movement.
plots: (noun) plural of plot.
trait: (noun) a distinguishing quality or characteristic.
resin: (noun) a sticky substance that exudes from certain trees.
slums: (noun) plural of slum.
lyric: (adjective/noun) expressing deep personal emotion; a lyric poem.
puffs: (noun) plural of puff.
decks: (noun) plural of deck.
brood: (noun/verb) a family of offspring; to brood.
mourn: (verb) to feel or express great sadness.
aloft: (adverb) high up in the air.
abuse: (noun/verb) improper use or treatment; to abuse.
whirl: (noun/verb) a spinning motion; to whirl.
edged: (verb) past tense of edge.
ovary: (noun) an organ in the female reproductive system that produces eggs.
quack: (noun/verb) the sound of a duck; to quack.
heaps: (noun) plural of heap.
slang: (noun) informal language.
await: (verb) to wait for.
civic: (adjective) relating to a city or town.
saint: (noun) a person who is exceptionally holy.
bevel: (noun/verb) an angled surface; to bevel.
sonar: (noun) a system for detecting objects under water.
aunts: (noun) plural of aunt.
packs: (noun) plural of pack.
froze: (verb) past tense of freeze.
tonic: (noun/adjective) a medicinal drink; invigorating.
corps: (noun) a body of troops.
swarm: (noun/verb) a large number of insects; to swarm.
frank: (adjective/adverb/noun) honest; frankly; a frankfurter.
repay: (verb) to pay back money.
gaunt: (adjective) very thin and bony.
wired: (adjective/verb) connected with wire; wired up.
niece: (noun) the daughter of one's brother or sister.
cello: (noun) a large stringed instrument.
needy: (adjective) very poor.
chuck: (verb/noun) to throw something; a chuck roast.
stony: (adjective) consisting of or covered with stones.
media: (noun) plural of medium; means of communication.
surge: (noun/verb) a sudden powerful forward or upward movement; to surge.
hurts: (verb) third person singular present tense of hurt.
repel: (verb) to drive or force something back.
husky: (adjective) having a deep, rough voice; a husky dog.
dated: (adjective/verb) old-fashioned; to date someone.
hunts: (verb) third person singular present tense of hunt.
mists: (noun) plural of mist.
exert: (verb) to apply force or pressure.
dries: (verb) third person singular present tense of dry.
mates: (noun) plural of mate.
sworn: (verb) past participle of swear.
baker: (noun) a person who bakes bread.
spice: (noun) an aromatic vegetable substance used to flavor food.
oasis: (noun) a fertile spot in a desert.
boils: (verb) third person singular present tense of boil.
spurs: (noun) plural of spur.
doves: (noun) plural of dove.
sneak: (verb/noun) to move stealthily; a sneaky person.
paces: (noun) plural of pace.
colon: (noun) a punctuation mark.
siege: (noun) a military operation where an army surrounds a place.
strum: (verb) to play a stringed instrument by plucking the strings.
drier: (adjective/noun) more dry; a drier.
cacao: (noun) the raw material from which cocoa is made.
wreck: (noun/verb) the destruction of something; to wreck something.
flock: (noun/verb) a group of birds; to gather in a flock.
stare: (verb/noun) to look fixedly or intently.
hobby: (noun) an activity done regularly in one's leisure time for pleasure.
bonds: (noun) plural of bond.
dared: (verb) past tense of dare.
faded: (verb) past tense of fade.
thief: (noun) a person who steals.
crude: (adjective) in a natural or raw state; lacking sophistication.
pants: (noun) trousers.
flute: (noun) a wind instrument.
votes: (noun) plural of vote.
tonal: (adjective) relating to tone or pitch.
radar: (noun) a system for detecting the presence, direction, distance, and speed of aircraft, ships, or other objects by sending out radio waves that are reflected back.
wells: (noun) plural of well.
skull: (noun) the bony framework of the head.
hairs: (noun) plural of hair.
argue: (verb) to express a different opinion; to disagree.
wears: (verb) third person singular present tense of wear.
dolls: (noun) plural of doll.
voted: (verb) past tense of vote.
caves: (noun) plural of cave.
cared: (verb) past tense of care.
broom: (noun) a brush for sweeping.
scent: (noun) a distinctive smell.
panel: (noun) a flat, rectangular section.
fairy: (noun) a mythical being.
olive: (noun/adjective) an olive tree; olive-colored.
bends: (verb) third person singular present tense of bend.
prism: (noun) a transparent optical instrument, usually made of glass, having typically three rectangular sides and triangular ends, used to separate white light into its constituent colours.
lamps: (noun) plural of lamp.
cable: (noun) a thick, strong rope or wire.
peach: (noun) a type of fruit.
ruins: (noun) plural of ruin.
rally: (noun/verb) a public meeting or demonstration; to rally.
schwa: (noun) a neutral vowel sound.
lambs: (noun) plural of lamb.
sells: (verb) third person singular present tense of sell.
cools: (verb) third person singular present tense of cool.
draft: (noun/verb) a current of air; to draft something.
charm: (noun/verb) a pleasing quality; to charm someone.
limbs: (noun) plural of limb.
brake: (noun/verb) a device for slowing or stopping a vehicle.
gazed: (verb) past tense of gaze.
cubes: (noun) plural of cube.
delay: (noun/verb) to postpone something.
beams: (noun) plural of beam.
fetch: (verb) to go and get something.
ranks: (noun) plural of rank.
array: (noun/verb) an ordered series or arrangement.
harsh: (adjective) unpleasantly rough.
camel: (noun) a large, humped mammal.
vines: (noun) plural of vine.
picks: (verb) third person singular present tense of pick.
naval: (adjective) relating to a navy.
purse: (noun) a small bag for carrying money.
rigid: (adjective) unable to bend or be forced out of shape.
crawl: (verb/noun) to move on hands and knees; a crawling motion.
toast: (noun/verb) bread browned by heat; to toast something.
soils: (verb) third person singular present tense of soil.
sauce: (noun) a liquid or semi-liquid condiment.
basin: (noun) a bowl-shaped container.
ponds: (noun) plural of pond.
twins: (noun) plural of twin.
wrist: (noun) the joint connecting the hand to the forearm.
fluid: (noun/adjective) a substance that can flow.
pools: (noun) plural of pool.
brand: (noun/verb) a trademark; to brand something.
stalk: (noun/verb) the main stem of a plant; to stalk someone.
robot: (noun) a machine that can perform complex actions automatically.
reeds: (noun) plural of reed.
hoofs: (noun) plural of hoof.
buses: (noun) plural of bus.
sheer: (adjective/adverb) very thin; completely.
grief: (noun) intense sorrow.
bloom: (noun/verb) a flower; to flower.
dwelt: (verb) past tense of dwell.
melts: (verb) third person singular present tense of melt.
risen: (verb) past participle of rise.
flags: (noun) plural of flag.
knelt: (verb) past tense of kneel.
fiber: (noun) a thin, threadlike structure.
roofs: (noun) plural of roof.
freed: (verb) past tense of free.
armor: (noun) protective covering.
piles: (noun) plural of pile.
aimed: (verb) past tense of aim.
algae: (noun) plural of alga.
twigs: (noun) plural of twig.
lemon: (noun) a type of citrus fruit.
ditch: (noun/verb) a long, narrow channel dug in the ground; to ditch something.
drunk: (adjective/verb) intoxicated; to drink.
rests: (verb) third person singular present tense of rest.
chill: (noun/verb) a feeling of cold; to chill something.
slain: (verb) past participle of slay.
panic: (noun/verb) sudden uncontrollable fear or anxiety.
cords: (noun) plural of cord.
tuned: (verb) past tense of tune.
crisp: (adjective) firm, fresh, and brittle.
ledge: (noun) a narrow horizontal shelf.
dived: (verb) past tense of dive.
swamp: (noun/verb) an area of low-lying, waterlogged land; to swamp something.
clung: (verb) past tense of cling.
stole: (verb) past tense of steal.
molds: (noun) plural of mold.
yarns: (noun) plural of yarn.
liver: (noun) a large gland in the abdomen.
gauge: (noun/verb) a measuring instrument; to gauge something.
breed: (noun/verb) a type of animal; to breed animals.
stool: (noun) a seat without a back or arms.
gulls: (noun) plural of gull.
awoke: (verb) past tense of awake.
gross: (adjective/noun) very unpleasant; a gross amount.
diary: (noun) a daily record of events.
rails: (noun) plural of rail.
belly: (noun) the abdomen.
trend: (noun) a general direction in which something is developing or changing.
flask: (noun) a small, flat bottle.
stake: (noun/verb) a pointed piece of wood; to stake something.
fried: (verb) past tense of fry.
draws: (verb) third person singular present tense of draw.
actor: (noun) a person who acts in a play, movie, or television program.
handy: (adjective) useful or convenient.
bowls: (noun) plural of bowl.
haste: (noun) excessive speed or urgency of movement or action.
scope: (noun) the extent of the area or subject matter that something deals with or to which it is relevant.
deals: (noun) plural of deal.
knots: (noun) plural of knot.
moons: (noun) plural of moon.
essay: (noun) a short piece of writing on a particular subject.
thump: (noun/verb) a heavy blow or impact; to thump something.
hangs: (verb) third person singular present tense of hang.
bliss: (noun) perfect happiness.
dealt: (verb) past tense of deal.
gains: (noun) plural of gain.
bombs: (noun) plural of bomb.
clown: (noun) a person who entertains people by acting in a funny way.
palms: (noun) plural of palm.
cones: (noun) plural of cone.
roast: (verb/noun) to cook by dry heat; roasted meat.
tidal: (adjective) relating to tides.
bored: (adjective) feeling weary because one is unoccupied or lacks interest in one's current activity.
chant: (noun/verb) a repetitive song or phrase.
acids: (noun) plural of acid.
dough: (noun) a thick, sticky mixture of flour and water.
camps: (noun) plural of camp.
swore: (verb) past tense of swear.
lover: (noun) a person who loves another person.
hooks: (noun) plural of hook.
males: (noun) plural of male.
cocoa: (noun) a powder made from roasted cacao beans.
punch: (noun/verb) a blow; to punch someone.
award: (noun/verb) a prize or distinction; to award something.
reins: (noun) plural of rein.
ninth: (adjective/noun/adverb) coming after eight others in order.
noses: (noun) plural of nose.
links: (noun) plural of link.
drain: (noun/verb) a pipe that carries off waste water or sewage; to drain something.
fills: (verb) third person singular present tense of fill.
nylon: (noun) a synthetic material.
lunar: (adjective) relating to the moon.
pulse: (noun/verb) the rhythmic expansion and contraction of the arteries; to pulse.
flown: (verb) past participle of fly.
elbow: (noun) the joint between the forearm and upper arm.
fatal: (adjective) causing death.
sites: (noun) plural of site.
moths: (noun) plural of moth.
meats: (noun) plural of meat.
foxes: (noun) plural of fox.
mined: (verb) past tense of mine.
attic: (noun) a room under a roof.
fiery: (adjective) burning fiercely; passionate.
mount: (noun/verb) a mountain; to mount something.
usage: (noun) the way in which something is used.
swear: (verb) to make a solemn statement or promise.
snowy: (adjective) covered in snow.
rusty: (adjective) covered in rust.
scare: (verb/noun) to frighten someone; a frightening experience.
traps: (noun) plural of trap.
relax: (verb) to make or become less tense or anxious.
react: (verb) to act in response to something.
valid: (adjective) legally sound or effective.
robin: (noun) a type of bird.
cease: (verb) to stop.
gills: (noun) plural of gill.
prior: (adjective/noun) preceding in time or order; a prior.
safer: (adjective) more safe.
polio: (noun) poliomyelitis; infantile paralysis.
loyal: (adjective) giving or showing firm and constant support or allegiance to a person or cause.
swell: (noun/verb) a rise in the level of something.
salty: (adjective) containing or tasting of salt.
marsh: (noun) an area of low-lying land that is flooded in wet seasons or at high tide.
vague: (adjective) unclear or imprecise.
weave: (verb) to make (a garment, fabric, etc.) by interlacing threads or other flexible materials.
mound: (noun) a heap of earth or stones.
seals: (noun) plural of seal.
mules: (noun) plural of mule.
virus: (noun) an infective agent that typically consists of a nucleic acid molecule in a protein coat.
scout: (noun/verb) a person employed to look for information; to scout for something.
acute: (adjective) severe; sharp.
windy: (adjective) very windy.
stout: (adjective) strong and sturdy.
folds: (noun) plural of fold.
seize: (verb) to take hold of suddenly and forcibly.
hilly: (adjective) having many hills.
joins: (verb) third person singular present tense of join.
pluck: (verb/noun) to pull something off suddenly.
stack: (noun/verb) a pile of things; to stack something.
lords: (noun) plural of lord.
dunes: (noun) plural of dune.
burro: (noun) a donkey.
hawks: (noun) plural of hawk.
trout: (noun) a type of fish.
feeds: (verb) third person singular present tense of feed.
scarf: (noun) a piece of fabric worn around the neck or head.
halls: (noun) plural of hall.
coals: (noun) plural of coal.
towel: (noun) a piece of absorbent cloth or paper used for drying.
souls: (noun) plural of soul.
elect: (verb/noun) to choose someone for a position; an elected official.
buggy: (adjective/noun) full of bugs; a type of carriage.
pumps: (noun) plural of pump.
loans: (noun) plural of loan.
spins: (verb) third person singular present tense of spin.
files: (noun) plural of file.
oxide: (noun) a compound of oxygen and another element.
pains: (noun) plural of pain.
photo: (noun, short form) photograph.
rival: (noun/verb) a person or thing competing with another for the same objective or for superiority in the same field; to rival.
flats: (noun) plural of flat.
syrup: (noun) a thick, sweet liquid.
rodeo: (noun) a public spectacle featuring various competitive events.
sands: (noun) plural of sand.
moose: (noun) a large deer.
pints: (noun) plural of pint.
curly: (adjective) having curls.
comic: (adjective/noun) causing laughter; a comic.
cloak: (noun) a loose outer garment.
onion: (noun) a type of vegetable.
clams: (noun) plural of clam.
scrap: (noun/verb) a small piece; to scrap something.
didst: (verb, archaic) second person singular past tense of do.
couch: (noun) a long seat with a back and arms.
codes: (noun) plural of code.
fails: (verb) third person singular present tense of fail.
ounce: (noun) a unit of weight.
lodge: (noun/verb) a small house or cabin; to lodge somewhere.
greet: (verb) to address or welcome someone.
gypsy: (noun) a member of a wandering group of people.
utter: (verb/adjective) to speak or pronounce something; complete or absolute.
paved: (verb) past tense of pave.
zones: (noun) plural of zone.
fours: (noun) plural of four.
alley: (noun) a narrow passageway.
tiles: (noun) plural of tile.
bless: (verb) to make holy or sacred; to ask God to protect someone.
crest: (noun) the top of a hill or wave; a badge or emblem.
elder: (noun/adjective) an older person, especially one who is respected for their age and wisdom; older.
kills: (verb) third person singular present tense of kill.
yeast: (noun) a fungus that is used in baking to make bread rise.
erect: (adjective/verb) upright; to erect something.
bugle: (noun) a brass instrument.
medal: (noun) an award given for achievement.
roles: (noun) plural of role.
hound: (noun) a type of dog.
snail: (noun) a mollusc that has a coiled shell.
alter: (verb) to change something.
ankle: (noun) the joint connecting the foot to the leg.
relay: (noun/verb) a race in which runners take turns; to relay something.
loops: (noun) plural of loop.
zeros: (noun) plural of zero.
bites: (noun) plural of bite.
modes: (noun) plural of mode.
debts: (noun) plural of debt.
realm: (noun) a kingdom; a field of study.
glove: (noun) a covering for the hand.
rayon: (noun) a synthetic fiber.
swims: (verb) third person singular present tense of swim.
poked: (verb) past tense of poke.
stray: (verb/adjective/noun) to wander away; wandering; something stray.
lifts: (verb) third person singular present tense of lift.
maker: (noun) a person who makes something.
lumps: (noun) plural of lump.
graze: (verb/noun) to feed on grass; a graze.
dread: (noun/verb) intense fear; to fear greatly.
barns: (noun) plural of barn.
docks: (noun) plural of dock.
masts: (noun) plural of mast.
pours: (verb) third person singular present tense of pour.
wharf: (noun) a structure on the shore where ships can dock to load and unload goods.
curse: (noun/verb) to utter a word or phrase expressing anger or annoyance; a curse.
plump: (adjective/verb) pleasantly fat; to make something plump.
robes: (noun) plural of robe.
seeks: (verb) third person singular present tense of seek.
cedar: (noun) a type of evergreen tree.
curls: (noun) plural of curl.
jolly: (adjective/adverb) cheerful and good-humored.
myths: (noun) plural of myth.
cages: (noun) plural of cage.
gloom: (noun) partial or total darkness.
locks: (noun) plural of lock.
pedal: (noun/verb) a foot-operated lever; to pedal.
beets: (noun) plural of beet.
crows: (noun) plural of crow.
anode: (noun) the positive electrode of an electrolytic cell.
slash: (verb/noun) to cut with a sweeping stroke; a sweeping stroke.
creep: (verb/noun) to move slowly and carefully.
rowed: (verb) past tense of row.
chips: (noun) plural of chip.
fists: (noun) plural of fist.
wines: (noun) plural of wine.
cares: (verb) third person singular present tense of care.
valve: (noun) a device that regulates the passage of fluids or gases.
newer: (adjective) more new.
motel: (noun) a roadside hotel.
ivory: (noun/adjective) a hard, creamy-white substance; ivory-colored.
necks: (noun) plural of neck.
clamp: (noun/verb) a device for holding or fastening things tightly together.
barge: (noun) a large, flat-bottomed boat.
blues: (noun) a type of music; sadness.
alien: (adjective/noun) belonging to another country; an alien.
frown: (noun/verb) to wrinkle one's brow.
strap: (noun/verb) a strip of material used for fastening or support; to strap something.
crews: (noun) plural of crew.
shack: (noun) a small, crudely built hut or cabin.
gonna: (verb, informal) going to.
saves: (verb) third person singular present tense of save.
stump: (noun/verb) the part of a tree left in the ground after the rest has been cut down; to stump someone.
ferry: (noun/verb) a boat or ship for carrying passengers and goods across a body of water; to ferry someone.
idols: (noun) plural of idol.
cooks: (noun) plural of cook.
juicy: (adjective) full of juice.
glare: (noun/verb) a harsh, bright light; to glare.
carts: (noun) plural of cart.
alloy: (noun) a metal made by combining two or more metallic elements.
bulbs: (noun) plural of bulb.
lawns: (noun) plural of lawn.
lasts: (verb) third person singular present tense of last.
fuels: (noun) plural of fuel.
oddly: (adverb) strangely.
crane: (noun) a large, tall bird; a machine.
filed: (verb) past tense of file.
weird: (adjective) strange or odd.
shawl: (noun) a piece of fabric worn over the shoulders or head.
slips: (noun) plural of slip.
troop: (noun/verb) a group of soldiers; to troop.
bolts: (noun) plural of bolt.
suite: (noun) a set of rooms.
sleek: (adjective) smooth and glossy.
quilt: (noun) a bed covering.
tramp: (noun/verb) a homeless person; to trample.
blaze: (noun/verb) a large, uncontrolled fire; to blaze.
atlas: (noun) a book of maps; also an anatomical term.
odors: (noun) plural of odor.
scrub: (noun/verb) low-lying vegetation; to scrub.
crabs: (noun) plural of crab.
probe: (noun/verb) an investigation; to investigate something.
logic: (noun) rational thinking.
adobe: (noun) a type of brick.
exile: (noun/verb) the state of being banished from one's native country; to exile someone.
rebel: (noun/verb) a person who rebels.
grind: (verb/noun) to reduce something to powder or small pieces; a grinding motion.
sting: (noun/verb) a sharp, sudden pain; to sting someone.
spine: (noun) the series of vertebrae extending from the skull to the small of the back, forming the main support of the body; a sharp point.
cling: (verb) to hold on tightly to someone or something.
desks: (noun) plural of desk.
grove: (noun) a small group of trees.
leaps: (noun) plural of leap.
prose: (noun) written or spoken language in its ordinary form, without metrical structure.
lofty: (adjective) of imposing height.
agony: (noun) intense physical or mental suffering.
snare: (noun/verb) a trap; to trap.
tusks: (noun) plural of tusk; long, pointed teeth of some animals.
bulls: (noun) plural of bull.
moods: (noun) plural of mood.
humid: (adjective) containing a high amount of water vapor.
finer: (adjective) of better quality.
dimly: (adverb) faintly; vaguely.
plank: (noun) a long, flat, thick piece of wood.
china: (noun) porcelain tableware; China (the country).
pines: (noun) plural of pine.
guilt: (noun) the fact or state of having committed a specified or implied offense or crime.
sacks: (noun) plural of sack.
brace: (noun/verb) a support; to brace something.
quote: (noun/verb) a passage or expression; to quote something.
lathe: (noun) a machine for shaping wood or metal.
gaily: (adverb) in a cheerful and lively manner.
fonts: (noun) plural of font.
scalp: (noun) the skin covering the top of the head.
adopt: (verb) to take something as one's own.
foggy: (adjective) misty or hazy.
ferns: (noun) plural of fern.
grams: (noun) plural of gram.
clump: (noun/verb) a dense group or cluster of things; to clump together.
perch: (noun/verb) a bird's resting place; to perch.
tumor: (noun) a swelling of a part of the body, generally without inflammation, caused by an abnormal growth of tissue.
teens: (noun) plural of teen.
crank: (noun/verb) a handle for turning a machine; to crank something.
fable: (noun) a short story, typically with animals as characters, conveying a moral.
hedge: (noun/verb) a fence or boundary; to hedge.
genes: (noun) plural of gene.
sober: (adjective/verb) not drunk; to sober up.
boast: (noun/verb) a proud statement; to boast.
tract: (noun) an area of land; a pamphlet.
cigar: (noun) a roll of tobacco leaves.
unite: (verb) to join or combine.
owing: (verb) present participle of owe.
thigh: (noun) the part of the leg between the hip and the knee.
haiku: (noun) a Japanese poem.
swish: (noun/verb) a swishing sound; to swish something.
dikes: (noun) plural of dike.
wedge: (noun/verb) a piece of wood or metal tapering to a thin edge; to wedge something.
booth: (noun) a small enclosure or stall.
eased: (verb) past tense of ease.
frail: (adjective) weak and delicate.
cough: (noun/verb) to expel air from the lungs.
tombs: (noun) plural of tomb.
darts: (noun) plural of dart.
forts: (noun) plural of fort.
choir: (noun) a group of singers.
pouch: (noun) a small bag or sack.
pinch: (verb/noun) to squeeze something firmly between the fingers; a pinching action.
hairy: (adjective) covered in hair.
buyer: (noun) a person who buys something.
torch: (noun) a handheld device that produces light.
vigor: (noun) physical strength and energy.
waltz: (noun/verb) a dance.
heats: (verb) third person singular present tense of heat.
herbs: (noun) plural of herb.
users: (noun) plural of user.
flint: (noun) a hard, grey or black kind of stone that produces sparks when struck.
click: (noun/verb) a short, sharp sound; to click.
madam: (noun) a polite form of address for a woman.
bleak: (adjective) bare and desolate.
blunt: (adjective/verb) having a dull edge or point; to blunt something.
aided: (verb) past tense of aid.
lacks: (verb) third person singular present tense of lack.
masks: (noun) plural of mask.
waded: (verb) past tense of wade.
risks: (noun) plural of risk.
nurse: (noun/verb) a person trained to care for the sick or infirm; to nurse someone.
chaos: (noun) complete disorder and confusion.
sewed: (verb) past tense of sew.
cured: (verb) past tense of cure.
ample: (adjective) enough or more than enough; plentiful.
lease: (noun/verb) a contract granting use or occupation of property during a specified period.
steak: (noun) a slice of meat.
sinks: (verb) third person singular present tense of sink.
merit: (noun) the quality of being good or worthy.
bluff: (noun/verb/adjective) a steep cliff or bank; to bluff someone.
bathe: (verb) to wash or soak oneself.
gleam: (noun/verb) a flash of light; to gleam.
bonus: (noun) an amount of money added to a person's wages.
colts: (noun) plural of colt.
shear: (verb) to cut the wool off (a sheep).
gland: (noun) an organ that secretes substances into the bloodstream or into a body cavity or onto the surface of the skin.
silky: (adjective) smooth and soft.
skate: (verb/noun) to glide on ice skates.
birch: (noun) a type of tree.
anvil: (noun) a heavy iron block on which metal is shaped.
sleds: (noun) plural of sled.
groan: (verb/noun) to make a deep, prolonged sound expressing pain or unhappiness.
maids: (noun) plural of maid.
meets: (verb) third person singular present tense of meet.
speck: (noun) a very small spot or mark.
hymns: (noun) plural of hymn.
hints: (noun) plural of hint.
drown: (verb) to die under water.
bosom: (noun) a woman's chest.
slick: (adjective/verb) smooth and slippery; to slick something.
quest: (noun) a long or arduous search for something.
coils: (noun) plural of coil.
spied: (verb) past tense of spy.
snows: (verb) third person singular present tense of snow.
stead: (noun) a place.
snack: (noun) a small amount of food eaten between meals.
plows: (noun) plural of plow.
blond: (adjective/noun) light-yellow or golden-colored hair.
tamed: (verb) past tense of tame.
thorn: (noun) a sharp-pointed woody projection.
waits: (verb) third person singular present tense of wait.
glued: (verb) past tense of glue.
banjo: (noun) a stringed instrument.
tease: (verb/noun) to provoke or irritate; teasing.
arena: (noun) a place where sports or entertainments are held.
bulky: (adjective) large and unwieldy.
carve: (verb) to cut or shape something.
stunt: (noun/verb) a daring feat.
warms: (verb) third person singular present tense of warm.
shady: (adjective) sheltered from direct sunlight.
razor: (noun) a sharp instrument for shaving.
folly: (noun) foolishness; a costly structure.
leafy: (adjective) full of leaves.
notch: (noun/verb) an indentation or indentation; to notch something.
fools: (noun) plural of fool.
otter: (noun) a semi-aquatic mammal.
pears: (noun) plural of pear.
flush: (verb/noun/adjective) to redden; a reddening; level.
genus: (noun) a principal taxonomic category that ranks above species and below family, and is denoted by a capitalized Latin name, e.g., Homo sapiens.
ached: (verb) past tense of ache.
fives: (noun) plural of five.
flaps: (noun) plural of flap.
spout: (noun/verb) a tube or pipe for conveying liquid; to spout something.
smote: (verb, archaic) struck or hit forcefully.
fumes: (noun) plural of fume.
adapt: (verb) to adjust or modify.
cuffs: (noun) plural of cuff.
tasty: (adjective) delicious.
stoop: (verb/noun) to bend down; a stooping posture.
clips: (noun) plural of clip.
disks: (noun) plural of disk.
sniff: (verb/noun) to draw air audibly up the nose; a sniffing sound.
lanes: (noun) plural of lane.
brisk: (adjective/adverb) quick and energetic; briskly.
imply: (verb) to strongly suggest the truth or existence of something not expressly stated.
demon: (noun) an evil supernatural being.
super: (adjective/adverb/noun) excellent; superlatively; a superhero.
furry: (adjective) covered in fur.
raged: (verb) past tense of rage.
growl: (verb/noun) to make a low, guttural sound.
texts: (noun) plural of text.
hardy: (adjective) robust; strong.
stung: (verb) past tense of sting.
typed: (verb) past tense of type.
hates: (verb) third person singular present tense of hate.
wiser: (adjective) more wise.
timid: (adjective) shy or bashful.
serum: (noun) a liquid containing antibodies.
beaks: (noun) plural of beak.
rotor: (noun) a rotating part of a machine.
casts: (verb) third person singular present tense of cast; (noun) plural of cast.
bathe: (verb) to wash or soak oneself.
glide: (verb/noun) to move smoothly and effortlessly; a gliding movement.
plots: (noun) plural of plot.
trait: (noun) a distinguishing quality or characteristic.
resin: (noun) a sticky substance that exudes from certain trees.
slums: (noun) plural of slum.
lyric: (adjective/noun) expressing deep personal emotion; a lyric poem.
puffs: (noun) plural of puff.
decks: (noun) plural of deck.
brood: (noun/verb) a family of offspring; to brood.
mourn: (verb) to feel or express great sadness.
aloft: (adverb) high up in the air.
abuse: (noun/verb) improper use or treatment; to abuse.
whirl: (noun/verb) a spinning motion; to whirl.
edged: (verb) past tense of edge.
ovary: (noun) an organ in the female reproductive system that produces eggs.
quack: (noun/verb) the sound of a duck; to quack.
heaps: (noun) plural of heap.
slang: (noun) informal language.
await: (verb) to wait for.
civic: (adjective) relating to a city or town.
saint: (noun) a person who is exceptionally holy.
bevel: (noun/verb) an angled surface; to bevel.
sonar: (noun) a system for detecting objects under water.
aunts: (noun) plural of aunt.
packs: (noun) plural of pack.
froze: (verb) past tense of freeze.
tonic: (noun/adjective) a medicinal drink; invigorating.
corps: (noun) a body of troops.
swarm: (noun/verb) a large number of insects; to swarm.
frank: (adjective/adverb/noun) honest; frankly; a frankfurter.
repay: (verb) to pay back money.
gaunt: (adjective) very thin and bony.
wired: (adjective/verb) connected with wire; wired up.
niece: (noun) the daughter of one's brother or sister.
cello: (noun) a large stringed instrument.
needy: (adjective) very poor.
chuck: (verb/noun) to throw something; a chuck roast.
stony: (adjective) consisting of or covered with stones.
media: (noun) plural of medium; means of communication.
surge: (noun/verb) a sudden powerful forward or upward movement; to surge.
hurts: (verb) third person singular present tense of hurt.
repel: (verb) to drive or force something back.
husky: (adjective) having a deep, rough voice; a husky dog.
dated: (adjective/verb) old-fashioned; to date someone.
hunts: (verb) third person singular present tense of hunt.
mists: (noun) plural of mist.
exert: (verb) to apply force or pressure.
dries: (verb) third person singular present tense of dry.
mates: (noun) plural of mate.
sworn: (verb) past participle of swear.
baker: (noun) a person who bakes bread.
spice: (noun) an aromatic vegetable substance used to flavor food.
oasis: (noun) a fertile spot in a desert.
boils: (verb) third person singular present tense of boil.
spurs: (noun) plural of spur.
doves: (noun) plural of dove.
sneak: (verb/noun) to move stealthily; a sneaky person.
paces: (noun) plural of pace.
colon: (noun) a punctuation mark.
siege: (noun) a military operation where an army surrounds a place.
strum: (verb) to play a stringed instrument by plucking the strings.
drier: (adjective/noun) more dry; a drier.
cacao: (noun) the raw material from which cocoa is made.
humus: (noun) dark organic matter in soil.
bales: (noun) plural of bale.
piped: (verb) past tense of pipe.
nasty: (adjective) highly unpleasant.
rinse: (verb/noun) to wash something with water.
boxer: (noun) a person who boxes; a type of dog.
shrub: (noun) a woody plant that is smaller than a tree.
amuse: (verb) to entertain someone.
tacks: (noun) plural of tack.
cited: (verb) past tense of cite.
slung: (verb) past tense of sling.
delta: (noun) a triangular area of land.
laden: (adjective/verb) heavily loaded.
larva: (noun) the immature, wingless form of an insect.
rents: (noun) plural of rent.
yells: (noun) plural of yell.
spool: (noun) a reel for winding thread.
spill: (verb/noun) to cause or allow liquid to flow over the edge of a container.
crush: (verb/noun) to press something forcefully out of shape; a crushing action.
jewel: (noun) a precious stone.
snaps: (noun) plural of snap.
stain: (noun/verb) a discoloration; to stain something.
kicks: (noun) plural of kick.
tying: (verb) present participle of tie.
slits: (noun) plural of slit.
rated: (verb) past tense of rate.
eerie: (adjective) strange and frightening.
smash: (verb/noun) to break forcefully; a smashing action.
plums: (noun) plural of plum.
zebra: (noun) an African mammal with black and white stripes.
earns: (verb) third person singular present tense of earn.
bushy: (adjective) covered in bushes; bushy hair.
scary: (adjective) frightening.
squad: (noun) a small group of people.
tutor: (noun/verb) a private teacher; to tutor.
silks: (noun) plural of silk.
slabs: (noun) plural of slab.
bumps: (noun) plural of bump.
evils: (noun) plural of evil.
fangs: (noun) plural of fang.
snout: (noun) the nose and mouth of an animal, especially a pig or other mammal with a long nose.
peril: (noun) serious and immediate danger.
pivot: (noun/verb) a pin or shaft on which a rotating object turns.
yacht: (noun) a large sailing boat.
lobby: (noun/verb) an entrance hall; to lobby.
jeans: (noun) trousers made from denim.
grins: (noun) plural of grin.
viola: (noun) a stringed instrument.
liner: (noun) a large passenger ship.
comet: (noun) a celestial body moving around the sun.
scars: (noun) plural of scar.
chops: (noun) plural of chop; also, a verb.
raids: (noun) plural of raid.
eater: (noun) a person who eats.
slate: (noun) a type of rock; a gray stone.
skips: (noun) plural of skip.
soles: (noun) plural of sole.
misty: (adjective) misty; hazy.
urine: (noun) a yellowish liquid excreted from the body.
knobs: (noun) plural of knob.
sleet: (noun) rain mixed with snow.
holly: (noun) a type of tree.
pests: (noun) plural of pest.
forks: (noun) plural of fork.
grill: (noun/verb) a grate for cooking; to grill something.
trays: (noun) plural of tray.
pails: (noun) plural of pail.
borne: (verb) past participle of bear.
tenor: (noun) a high male voice.
wares: (noun) plural of ware; goods.
carol: (noun/verb) a religious song.
woody: (adjective) made of or resembling wood.
canon: (noun) a general law, rule, principle, or criterion by which something is judged.
wakes: (verb) third person singular present tense of wake.
kitty: (noun) a kitten; a pet name for a cat.
miner: (noun) a person who works in a mine.
polls: (noun) plural of poll.
shaky: (adjective) unstable; trembling.
nasal: (adjective) relating to the nose.
scorn: (noun/verb) contempt or derision; to scorn.
chess: (noun) a board game.
taxis: (noun) plural of taxi.
crate: (noun) a large container.
shyly: (adverb) in a shy manner.
tulip: (noun) a type of flower.
forge: (verb/noun) to shape metal by heating and hammering; a forge.
nymph: (noun) a mythical female creature.
budge: (verb) to make or cause to move slightly.
lowly: (adjective/adverb) humble; humbly.
abide: (verb) to accept or act in accordance with.
depot: (noun) a railway station or bus station.
oases: (noun) plural of oasis.
asses: (noun) plural of ass; donkeys.
sheds: (noun) plural of shed.
fudge: (noun/verb) a type of candy; to fudge something.
pills: (noun) plural of pill.
rivet: (noun/verb) a metal pin used to fasten metal plates; to rivet.
thine: (pronoun, archaic) your (possessive).
groom: (noun/verb) a bridegroom; to groom something.
lanky: (adjective) tall and thin.
boost: (noun/verb) an increase; to boost something.
broth: (noun) a thin soup.
heave: (verb/noun) to lift or haul something heavy.
gravy: (noun) a sauce made from meat juices.
beech: (noun) a type of tree.
timed: (verb) past tense of time.
quail: (noun) a type of bird; (verb) to lose courage.
inert: (adjective) having no power to move; inactive.
gears: (noun) plural of gear.
chick: (noun) a young chicken; a young woman.
hinge: (noun/verb) a joint on which a door or lid turns; to hinge something.
trash: (noun/verb) rubbish or waste; to trash something.
clash: (noun/verb) a conflict; to clash.
sighs: (noun) plural of sigh.
renew: (verb) to make something new again.
bough: (noun) a main branch of a tree.
dwarf: (noun/verb) a mythical creature; to dwarf something.
slows: (verb) third person singular present tense of slow.
quill: (noun) a pen made from a bird's feather.
shave: (verb/noun) to remove hair from the skin; a shaving action.
spore: (noun) a reproductive cell of a fungus.
sixes: (noun) plural of six.
chunk: (noun) a thick, solid piece of something.
madly: (adverb) in a mad manner.
paced: (verb) past tense of pace.
braid: (noun/verb) a type of hairstyle; to braid.
fuzzy: (adjective) covered in fuzz; unclear.
motto: (noun) a short statement expressing a principle.
spies: (noun) plural of spy.
slack: (adjective/noun/verb) loose; slackness; to slacken.
mucus: (noun) a slimy substance secreted by mucous membranes.
magma: (noun) molten rock.
awful: (adjective) extremely bad or unpleasant.
discs: (noun) plural of disc.
erase: (verb) to remove something written or printed.
posed: (verb) past tense of pose.
asset: (noun) a useful or valuable thing.
cider: (noun) a drink made from apples.
taper: (noun/verb) a slender candle; to taper.
theft: (noun) the action or crime of stealing.
churn: (verb/noun) to agitate; a churn.
satin: (noun) a glossy silk fabric.
slots: (noun) plural of slot.
taxed: (verb) past tense of tax.
bully: (noun/verb) a person who uses strength or power to harm or intimidate those who are weaker; to bully someone.
sloth: (noun) a slow-moving mammal.
shale: (noun) a type of rock.
tread: (noun/verb) a way of walking; to tread.
raked: (verb) past tense of rake.
curds: (noun) plural of curd.
manor: (noun) a large country house with its surrounding land.
aisle: (noun) a passage between rows of seats.
bulge: (noun/verb) a rounded swelling.
loins: (noun) plural of loin.
stair: (noun) one of a set of steps.
tapes: (noun) plural of tape.
leans: (verb) third person singular present tense of lean.
bunks: (noun) plural of bunk.
squat: (verb/adjective/noun) to crouch down; short and stout.
towed: (verb) past tense of tow.
lance: (noun/verb) a long spear; to lance.
panes: (noun) plural of pane.
sakes: (noun) plural of sake.
heirs: (noun) plural of heir.
caste: (noun) a rigid social hierarchy.
dummy: (noun/adjective) a model or imitation of something; stupid.
pores: (noun) plural of pore.
fauna: (noun) animals of a particular region, habitat, or geological period.
crook: (noun/verb/adjective) a hook; to crook something; dishonest.
poise: (noun/verb) graceful elegance of movement or appearance; to poise something.
epoch: (noun) a period of time in history or a person's life, typically one marked by notable events or particular characteristics.
risky: (adjective) involving or exposing one to the chance of injury or loss.
warns: (verb) third person singular present tense of warn.
fling: (verb/noun) to throw something forcefully; a fling.
berry: (noun) a small, juicy fruit.
grape: (noun) a type of fruit.
flank: (noun/verb) the side of a body or structure; to flank something.
drags: (noun) plural of drag.
squid: (noun) a type of sea creature.
pelts: (noun) plural of pelt.
icing: (noun) a sweet coating for cakes.
irony: (noun) the expression of one's meaning by using language that normally signifies the opposite.
irons: (noun) plural of iron.
barks: (verb) third person singular present tense of bark.
whoop: (noun/verb) a loud cry; to whoop.
choke: (verb/noun) to have difficulty breathing; choking.
diets: (noun) plural of diet.
whips: (noun) plural of whip.
tally: (noun/verb) a record or count; to tally something.
dozed: (verb) past tense of doze.
twine: (noun/verb) a strong string; to twine.
kites: (noun) plural of kite.
bikes: (noun) plural of bike.
ticks: (noun) plural of tick.
riots: (noun) plural of riot.
roars: (noun) plural of roar.
vault: (noun/verb) a secure room for valuables; to vault.
looms: (verb) third person singular present tense of loom.
scold: (verb) to reprimand someone angrily.
blink: (verb/noun) to close and open the eyes quickly; a blinking action.
dandy: (noun/adjective) a man who is excessively concerned with his appearance; stylish.
pupae: (noun) plural of pupa; the resting stage of an insect.
sieve: (noun/verb) a utensil with a mesh bottom used for separating solids from liquids.
spike: (noun/verb) a sharp pointed piece of metal; to spike something.
ducts: (noun) plural of duct.
lends: (verb) third person singular present tense of lend.
pizza: (noun) a type of food.
brink: (noun) the edge of something.
widen: (verb) to make or become wider.
plumb: (verb/noun/adjective) to ascertain the verticality of something; a plumb bob; exactly vertical.
pagan: (noun/adjective) a person holding religious beliefs other than those of the main world religions; pagan.
feats: (noun) plural of feat.
bison: (noun) a large, shaggy-haired wild ox.
soggy: (adjective) wet and soft.
scoop: (noun/verb) a tool for lifting or transferring something; to scoop.
argon: (noun) a chemical element.
nudge: (verb/noun) to gently push; a nudge.
skiff: (noun) a small, light boat.
amber: (noun/adjective) a yellowish-brown fossil resin; amber-colored.
sexes: (noun) plural of sex; genders.
rouse: (verb) to awaken someone.
salts: (noun) plural of salt.
hitch: (verb/noun) to fasten; a hitch.
exalt: (verb) to praise highly.
leash: (noun/verb) a strap for restraining a dog; to leash a dog.
dined: (verb) past tense of dine.
chute: (noun) a sloping channel or trough.
snort: (verb/noun) to force air through the nostrils; a snorting sound.
gusts: (noun) plural of gust.
melon: (noun) a type of fruit.
cheat: (verb/noun) to deceive; a cheat.
reefs: (noun) plural of reef.
llama: (noun) a type of South American mammal.
lasso: (noun/verb) a rope used to catch cattle; to lasso cattle.
debut: (noun) a first public appearance.
quota: (noun) a fixed share or proportion.
oaths: (noun) plural of oath.
prone: (adjective) likely to suffer from something.
mixes: (verb) third person singular present tense of mix.
rafts: (noun) plural of raft.
dives: (noun) plural of dive.
stale: (adjective) no longer fresh.
inlet: (noun) a narrow strip of water.
flick: (noun/verb) a quick, sharp movement; to flick something.
pinto: (noun/adjective) a pinto bean; pinto-colored.
brows: (noun) plural of brow.
untie: (verb) to unfasten something.
batch: (noun) a quantity of something produced at one time.
greed: (noun) intense and selfish desire for something.
chore: (noun) a routine task.
stirs: (verb) third person singular present tense of stir.
blush: (verb/noun) to redden; a reddening.
onset: (noun) the beginning of something.
barbs: (noun) plural of barb.
volts: (noun) plural of volt.
beige: (adjective/noun) light grayish-brown.
swoop: (noun/verb) a sudden sweeping movement; to swoop.
paddy: (noun) a rice paddy; a pet name for someone.
laced: (verb) past tense of lace.
shove: (verb/noun) to push something forcefully; a shove.
jerky: (adjective/noun) moving in a jerky manner; dried meat.
poppy: (noun) a type of flower.
leaks: (noun) plural of leak.
fares: (noun) plural of fare.
dodge: (verb/noun) to evade something; an evasive action.
godly: (adjective) resembling or characteristic of God; pious.
squaw: (noun, offensive) a Native American woman.
affix: (verb/noun) to attach something; something attached.
brute: (noun/adjective) a cruel and violent man; brutal.
nicer: (adjective) more nice.
undue: (adjective) unwarranted or excessive.
snarl: (noun/verb) a tangle; to snarl something.
merge: (verb) to combine or blend.
doses: (noun) plural of dose.
showy: (adjective) ostentatious; attracting attention.
daddy: (noun) father.
roost: (noun/verb) a bird's resting place; to roost.
vases: (noun) plural of vase.
swirl: (noun/verb) a spinning movement.
petty: (adjective) of little importance; trivial.
colds: (noun) plural of cold.
curry: (noun/verb) a type of food; to curry favor.
cobra: (noun) a type of venomous snake.
genie: (noun) a supernatural being in folklore.
flare: (noun/verb) a sudden burst of bright light; to flare.
messy: (adjective) untidy or dirty.
cores: (noun) plural of core.
soaks: (verb) third person singular present tense of soak.
ripen: (verb) to become fully developed.
whine: (verb/noun) to complain in a childish way; a whining sound.
amino: (prefix) relating to amino acids.
plaid: (noun/adjective) a pattern of crisscrossing stripes.
spiny: (adjective) having spines or thorns.
mowed: (verb) past tense of mow.
baton: (noun) a short stick or rod.
peers: (noun) plural of peer.
vowed: (verb) past tense of vow.
pious: (adjective) devoutly religious.
swans: (noun) plural of swan.
exits: (noun) plural of exit.
afoot: (adverb) on foot; in progress.
plugs: (noun) plural of plug.
idiom: (noun) a phrase whose meaning is not obvious from the meanings of its individual words.
chili: (noun) a type of pepper; chili con carne.
rites: (noun) plural of rite.
serfs: (noun) plural of serf.
cleft: (noun/adjective/verb) a split or crack; split; to split.
berth: (noun/verb) a ship's mooring place; to berth a ship.
grubs: (noun) plural of grub.
annex: (noun/verb) an addition to a building; to annex.
dizzy: (adjective) feeling unsteady.
hasty: (adjective) excessively quick.
latch: (noun/verb) a fastening for a door or gate; to latch.
wasps: (noun) plural of wasp.
mirth: (noun) amusement or laughter.
baron: (noun) a nobleman.
plead: (verb) to make an earnest appeal or request.
aloof: (adjective/adverb) distant; aloofly.
aging: (verb) present participle of age.
pixel: (noun) a minute area of illumination on a display screen.
bared: (verb) past tense of bare.
mummy: (noun) a preserved body; a mother (informal).
hotly: (adverb) in a hot or intense manner.
auger: (noun) a tool for boring holes.
buddy: (noun) a friend.
chaps: (noun) plural of chap.
badge: (noun) a distinctive symbol.
stark: (adjective) severe or bare in appearance or outline.
fairs: (noun) plural of fair.
gully: (noun) a ditch or channel formed by rainwater.
mumps: (noun) an infectious disease.
emery: (noun) a hard abrasive mineral.
filly: (noun) a young female horse.
ovens: (noun) plural of oven.
drone: (noun/verb) a male bee; to drone.
gauze: (noun) a thin, transparent fabric.
idiot: (noun) a stupid person.
fussy: (adjective) fastidious; easily annoyed.
annoy: (verb) to make someone slightly angry.
shank: (noun) the leg; the part of a tool.
gouge: (noun/verb) a tool for carving wood; to gouge.
bleed: (verb) to lose blood.
elves: (noun) plural of elf; mythical creatures.
roped: (verb) past tense of rope.
unfit: (adjective) not suitable or appropriate.
baggy: (adjective) loose and hanging down.
mower: (noun) a machine for cutting grass.
scant: (adjective/adverb) barely sufficient; scarcely.
grabs: (verb) third person singular present tense of grab.
fleas: (noun) plural of flea.
lousy: (adjective) extremely bad; infested with lice.
album: (noun) a book containing photographs or stamps.
sawed: (verb) past tense of saw.
cooky: (noun) a cookie.
murky: (adjective) dark or obscure.
infer: (verb) to deduce or conclude something.
burly: (adjective) large and strong.
waged: (verb) past tense of wage.
dingy: (adjective) dirty or dull.
brine: (noun) salty water.
kneel: (verb) to bend the knee.
creak: (noun/verb) a grating sound; to creak.
vanes: (noun) plural of vane.
smoky: (adjective) filled with smoke.
spurt: (noun/verb) a sudden burst; to spurt.
combs: (noun) plural of comb.
easel: (noun) a frame for displaying or painting pictures.
laces: (noun) plural of lace.
humps: (noun) plural of hump.
rumor: (noun) a piece of information that is not certain.
aroma: (noun) a pleasant smell.
horde: (noun) a large crowd of people.
swiss: (adjective/noun) relating to Switzerland; Swiss cheese.
leapt: (verb) past tense of leap.
opium: (noun) a drug obtained from the opium poppy.
slime: (noun) a viscous, sticky substance.
afire: (adverb) on fire.
pansy: (noun) a type of flower.
mares: (noun) plural of mare.
soaps: (noun) plural of soap.
husks: (noun) plural of husk.
snips: (noun) plural of snip; small pieces.
hazel: (noun/adjective) a type of tree; hazel-colored.
lined: (verb) past tense of line.
cafes: (noun) plural of cafe.
naive: (adjective) showing a lack of experience or judgment.
wraps: (noun) plural of wrap.
sized: (verb) past tense of size.
piers: (noun) plural of pier.
beset: (verb) to attack or surround someone.
agile: (adjective) able to move quickly and easily.
tongs: (noun) plural of tong.
steed: (noun) a horse (poetic).
fraud: (noun) a deliberate deception.
booty: (noun) stolen goods; buttocks (informal).
valor: (noun) courage.
downy: (adjective) covered in soft down.
witty: (adjective) clever or amusing.
mossy: (adjective) covered in moss.
psalm: (noun) a sacred song or hymn.
scuba: (noun) self-contained underwater breathing apparatus.
tours: (noun) plural of tour.
polka: (noun) a type of dance.
milky: (adjective) like milk.
gaudy: (adjective) extravagantly bright or showy.
shrug: (verb/noun) to raise the shoulders; a shrugging motion.
tufts: (noun) plural of tuft.
wilds: (noun) plural of wild; wild places.
laser: (noun) a device that produces a powerful beam of light.
truss: (noun/verb) a structure for supporting something; to truss.
hares: (noun) plural of hare.
creed: (noun) a system of religious belief.
lilac: (noun/adjective) a type of flower; lilac-colored.
siren: (noun) a device that makes a loud wailing sound; a mythical creature.
tarry: (verb) to delay or linger.
bribe: (noun/verb) a payment made to someone in order to influence their actions; to bribe someone.
swine: (noun) pigs.
muted: (adjective/verb) softened; to mute.
flips: (noun) plural of flip.
cures: (noun) plural of cure.
sinew: (noun) a tendon.
boxed: (verb) past tense of box.
hoops: (noun) plural of hoop.
gasps: (noun) plural of gasp.
hoods: (noun) plural of hood.
niche: (noun) a suitable position or role.
yucca: (noun) a type of plant.
glows: (verb) third person singular present tense of glow.
sewer: (noun) a drain or channel for carrying off wastewater.
whack: (noun/verb) a hard blow; to whack.
fuses: (noun) plural of fuse.
gowns: (noun) plural of gown.
droop: (verb/noun) to bend or hang down; a drooping action.
bucks: (noun) plural of buck.
pangs: (noun) plural of pang.
mails: (verb) third person singular present tense of mail; (noun) plural of mail.
whisk: (noun/verb) a whisk broom; to whisk.
haven: (noun) a safe place or refuge.
clasp: (noun/verb) a device for holding or fastening things together; to clasp.
sling: (noun/verb) a device for supporting or carrying something; to sling something.
stint: (noun/verb) a period of time spent doing something; to stint.
urges: (noun) plural of urge.
champ: (noun/verb) a champion; to champ at the bit.
piety: (noun) religious devotion.
chirp: (noun/verb) a short, high-pitched sound; to chirp.
pleat: (noun/verb) a double or multiple fold in a garment; to pleat.
posse: (noun) a group of people, typically one assembled for a particular purpose.
sunup: (noun) sunrise.
menus: (noun) plural of menu.
howls: (noun) plural of howl.
quake: (noun/verb) an earthquake; to quake.
knack: (noun) a special skill or talent.
plaza: (noun) a public square or open area.
fiend: (noun) an evil spirit; a wicked person.
caked: (verb) past tense of cake.
bangs: (noun) plural of bang.
erupt: (verb) to break out with force.
poker: (noun) a tool for poking a fire; a card game.
olden: (adjective) of or relating to former times.
cramp: (noun/verb) a painful involuntary contraction of a muscle; to cramp.
voter: (noun) a person who votes.
poses: (noun) plural of pose.
manly: (adjective) having qualities traditionally associated with men.
slump: (noun/verb) a sudden drop in prices; to slump.
fined: (verb) past tense of fine.
grips: (noun) plural of grip.
gaped: (verb) past tense of gape.
purge: (verb/noun) to cleanse; a purging action.
hiked: (verb) past tense of hike.
maize: (noun) corn.
fluff: (noun/verb) soft, light material; to fluff something.
strut: (noun/verb) a supporting bar; to strut.
sloop: (noun) a type of sailing vessel.
prowl: (verb/noun) to move stealthily; a prowling action.
roach: (noun) a type of insect.
cocks: (noun) plural of cock.
bland: (adjective) lacking strong features or characteristics; insipid.
dials: (noun) plural of dial.
plume: (noun/verb) a feather; a plume of smoke.
slaps: (noun) plural of slap.
soups: (noun) plural of soup.
dully: (adverb) in a dull manner.
wills: (noun) plural of will.
foams: (noun) plural of foam.
solos: (noun) plural of solo.
skier: (noun) a person who skis.
eaves: (noun) the overhanging lower edge of a roof.
totem: (noun) a natural object or animal believed by a particular group of people to have spiritual significance.
fused: (verb) past tense of fuse.
latex: (noun) a milky fluid.
veils: (noun) plural of veil.
mused: (verb) past tense of muse.
mains: (noun) plural of main.
myrrh: (noun) an aromatic resin.
racks: (noun) plural of rack.
galls: (noun) plural of gall.
gnats: (noun) plural of gnat; small flies.
bouts: (noun) plural of bout.
sisal: (noun) a type of fiber.
shuts: (verb) third person singular present tense of shut.
hoses: (noun) plural of hose.
dryly: (adverb) in a dry manner.
hover: (verb/noun) to remain in one place in the air; a hovering action.
gloss: (noun/verb) shine or luster; to gloss over something.
seeps: (verb) third person singular present tense of seep.
denim: (noun) a type of strong cotton fabric.
putty: (noun) a soft paste.
guppy: (noun) a small, colorful fish.
leaky: (adjective) leaking.
dusky: (adjective) dark or dimly lit.
filth: (noun) dirt or grime.
oboes: (noun) plural of oboe.
spans: (verb) third person singular present tense of span; (noun) plural of span.
fowls: (noun) plural of fowl.
adorn: (verb) to decorate.
glaze: (noun/verb) a shiny coating; to glaze.
haunt: (verb/noun) to visit frequently; a place frequently visited.
dares: (noun) plural of dare.
obeys: (verb) third person singular present tense of obey.
bakes: (verb) third person singular present tense of bake.
abyss: (noun) a very deep chasm or gulf.
smelt: (verb) past tense of smell; (noun) a type of fish.
gangs: (noun) plural of gang.
aches: (noun) plural of ache.
trawl: (noun/verb) a fishing net; to trawl.
claps: (noun) plural of clap.
undid: (verb) past tense of undo.
spicy: (adjective) having a strong taste or flavour.
hoist: (verb/noun) to raise or lift; a hoist.
fades: (verb) third person singular present tense of fade.
vicar: (noun) a priest.
acorn: (noun) the nut of an oak tree.
pussy: (noun, informal) a cat; (vulgar) vagina.
gruff: (adjective) rough-mannered.
musta: (verb, informal) must have.
tarts: (noun) plural of tart.
snuff: (noun/verb) powdered tobacco; to snuff something out.
hunch: (noun/verb) a feeling or guess; to hunch.
truce: (noun) a temporary cessation of hostilities.
tweed: (noun) a type of fabric.
dryer: (noun) a machine for drying clothes.
loser: (noun) a person who loses.
sheaf: (noun) a bundle of things, typically stalks of grain.
moles: (noun) plural of mole.
lapse: (noun/verb) a temporary failure of concentration; to lapse.
tawny: (adjective) light brown.
vexed: (adjective/verb) annoyed; to vex.
autos: (noun) plural of auto.
wager: (noun/verb) a bet; to bet.
domes: (noun) plural of dome.
sheen: (noun) a soft, bright luster.
clang: (noun/verb) a loud ringing sound; to clang.
spade: (noun) a tool for digging.
sowed: (verb) past tense of sow.
broil: (verb) to cook over direct heat.
slyly: (adverb) in a sly manner.
studs: (noun) plural of stud.
grunt: (noun/verb) a low, guttural sound; to grunt.
donor: (noun) a person who gives something.
slugs: (noun) plural of slug.
aspen: (noun) a type of tree.
homer: (noun) a home run; a given name.
croak: (verb/noun) to make a harsh, low sound; a croaking sound.
tithe: (noun) a tenth of one's produce or earnings.
halts: (noun) plural of halt; also a verb.
avert: (verb) to prevent something.
havoc: (noun) great destruction or devastation.
hogan: (noun) a dwelling of the Navajo people.
glint: (noun/verb) a flash of light; to glint.
ruddy: (adjective) having a reddish color.
jeeps: (noun) plural of jeep.
flaky: (adjective) easily crumbled; flaky skin.
ladle: (noun/verb) a large spoon for serving liquids; to ladle.
taunt: (verb/noun) to provoke; a taunting remark.
snore: (verb/noun) to make a snoring sound.
fines: (noun) plural of fine.
props: (noun) plural of prop.
prune: (noun/verb) a dried plum; to prune.
pesos: (noun) plural of peso.
radii: (noun) plural of radius.
pokes: (verb) third person singular present tense of poke.
tiled: (verb) past tense of tile.
daisy: (noun) a type of flower.
heron: (noun) a type of wading bird.
villa: (noun) a large country house.
farce: (noun) a comical play.
binds: (verb) third person singular present tense of bind.
cites: (verb) third person singular present tense of cite.
fixes: (verb) third person singular present tense of fix.
jerks: (noun) plural of jerk.
livid: (adjective) extremely angry.
waked: (verb) past tense of wake.
inked: (verb) past tense of ink.
booms: (verb) third person singular present tense of boom.
chews: (verb) third person singular present tense of chew.
licks: (verb) third person singular present tense of lick.
hyena: (noun) a type of mammal.
scoff: (verb/noun) to mock; scornful laughter.
lusty: (adjective) strong and healthy.
sonic: (adjective) relating to sound.
smith: (noun) a person who makes or repairs metal objects.
usher: (noun/verb) a person who shows people to their seats; to usher.
tucks: (verb) third person singular present tense of tuck.
vigil: (noun) a period of keeping awake.
molts: (verb) third person singular present tense of molt.
sects: (noun) plural of sect.
spars: (noun) plural of spar.
dumps: (verb) third person singular present tense of dump; (noun) plural of dump.
scaly: (adjective) covered in scales.
wisps: (noun) plural of wisp.
sores: (noun) plural of sore.
mince: (verb/noun) to chop finely; minced meat.
panda: (noun) a type of bear.
flier: (noun) a flyer; a leaflet.
axles: (noun) plural of axle.
plied: (verb) past tense of ply; to work at something.
booby: (noun) a stupid person; a type of bird.
patio: (noun) an outdoor area.
rabbi: (noun) a Jewish teacher or leader.
petal: (noun) one of the segments of the corolla of a flower.
polyp: (noun) a type of aquatic animal.
tints: (noun) plural of tint.
grate: (noun/verb) a framework of metal bars; to grate something.
troll: (noun/verb) a mythical creature; to troll.
tolls: (noun) plural of toll.
relic: (noun) an object surviving from an earlier time.
phony: (adjective/noun) fraudulent; a phony person.
bleat: (noun/verb) the cry of a sheep or goat; to bleat.
flaws: (noun) plural of flaw.
flake: (noun/verb) a small, flat piece; to flake.
snags: (noun) plural of snag.
aptly: (adverb) appropriately.
drawl: (noun/verb) slow speech.
ulcer: (noun) a sore on the skin or mucous membrane.
soapy: (adjective) covered in soap.
bossy: (adjective) fond of giving orders.
monks: (noun) plural of monk.
crags: (noun) plural of crag.
caged: (verb) past tense of cage.
twang: (noun/verb) a sharp, ringing sound; to twang.
diner: (noun) a small restaurant.
taped: (verb) past tense of tape.
cadet: (noun) a trainee in a military academy.
grids: (noun) plural of grid.
spawn: (noun/verb) eggs of fish or amphibians; to spawn.
guile: (noun) slyness and cunning.
noose: (noun) a loop of rope.
mores: (noun) plural of more; customs.
girth: (noun) the distance around something.
slimy: (adjective) covered in slime.
aides: (noun) plural of aide.
spasm: (noun) a sudden involuntary contraction of muscles.
burrs: (noun) plural of burr.
alibi: (noun) a claim or piece of evidence that one was elsewhere when an act, typically a criminal one, is alleged to have taken place.
lymph: (noun) a colorless fluid containing white blood cells.
saucy: (adjective) impertinent; cheeky.
muggy: (adjective) warm and humid.
liter: (noun) a unit of liquid measure.
joked: (verb) past tense of joke.
goofy: (adjective) silly or foolish.
exams: (noun) plural of exam.
enact: (verb) to make something law.
stork: (noun) a large wading bird.
lured: (verb) past tense of lure.
toxic: (adjective) poisonous.
omens: (noun) plural of omen.
nears: (verb) third person singular present tense of near.
covet: (verb) to yearn to possess something.
wrung: (verb) past tense of wring.
forum: (noun) a place where people can discuss issues.
venom: (noun) poison.
moody: (adjective) prone to changes in mood.
alder: (noun) a type of tree.
sassy: (adjective) bold; impertinent.
flair: (noun) a natural talent or aptitude.
guild: (noun) an association of craftsmen or merchants.
prays: (verb) third person singular present tense of pray.
wrens: (noun) plural of wren.
hauls: (noun) plural of haul.
stave: (noun/verb) a vertical wooden strip; to stave something.
tilts: (noun) plural of tilt.
pecks: (noun) plural of peck.
stomp: (verb/noun) to stamp one's foot; a stomping action.
gales: (noun) plural of gale.
tempt: (verb) to entice or allure someone.
capes: (noun) plural of cape.
mesas: (noun) plural of mesa.
omits: (verb) third person singular present tense of omit.
tepee: (noun) a tent.
harry: (verb) to harass or annoy.
wring: (verb) to twist or squeeze.
evoke: (verb) to bring or recall to the conscious mind.
limes: (noun) plural of lime.
cluck: (verb/noun) to make a clucking sound.
lunge: (noun/verb) a sudden forward movement.
highs: (noun) plural of high.
canes: (noun) plural of cane.
giddy: (adjective) feeling or appearing merry or lighthearted; frivolous.
lithe: (adjective) thin and supple.
verge: (noun/verb) the edge or border of something; to verge on.
khaki: (adjective/noun) a dull brownish-yellow color; khaki clothing.
queue: (noun/verb) a line of people or vehicles; to queue.
loath: (adjective) unwilling; reluctant.
foyer: (noun) an entrance hall.
outdo: (verb) to surpass someone.
fared: (verb) past tense of fare.
deter: (verb) to discourage or prevent someone from doing something.
crumb: (noun) a small piece of bread or cake.
astir: (adjective/adverb) busy; in motion.
spire: (noun) a tall, slender pointed structure.
jumpy: (adjective) nervous and irritable.
extol: (verb) to praise enthusiastically.
buoys: (noun) plural of buoy.
stubs: (noun) plural of stub.
lucid: (adjective) expressed clearly; easy to understand.
thong: (noun) a narrow strip of material.
afore: (adverb, archaic) before.
whiff: (noun) a slight smell.
maxim: (noun) a general truth or principle.
hulls: (noun) plural of hull.
clogs: (noun) plural of clog.
slats: (noun) plural of slat; thin strips of wood.
jiffy: (noun) a very short time.
arbor: (noun) a shaded area; a shelter.
cinch: (noun/verb) something easily done; to cinch something.
igloo: (noun) a dwelling made of snow.
goody: (noun) something good or pleasant; a goody bag.
gazes: (noun) plural of gaze.
dowel: (noun) a wooden pin.
calms: (noun) plural of calm.
bitch: (noun, vulgar) a spiteful woman; a female dog.
scowl: (verb/noun) to wrinkle one's brow in displeasure.
gulps: (noun) plural of gulp.
coded: (verb) past tense of code.
waver: (verb/noun) to hesitate; wavering.
mason: (noun) a person who builds with stone.
lobes: (noun) plural of lobe.
ebony: (noun/adjective) a hard, dark wood; ebony-colored.
flail: (verb/noun) to wave wildly; a flail.
isles: (noun) plural of isle.
clods: (noun) plural of clod; lumps of earth.
dazed: (verb) past tense of daze.
adept: (adjective/noun) highly skilled; an adept.
oozed: (verb) past tense of ooze.
sedan: (noun) a type of car.
clays: (noun) plural of clay.
warts: (noun) plural of wart.
ketch: (noun) a type of sailing ship.
skunk: (noun) a type of mammal.
manes: (noun) plural of mane.
adore: (verb) to love or worship.
sneer: (verb/noun) to smile scornfully; a sneering expression.
mango: (noun) a type of fruit.
fiord: (noun) a long, narrow inlet of the sea between high cliffs.
flora: (noun) plants of a region or period.
roomy: (adjective) spacious.
minks: (noun) plural of mink.
thaws: (verb) third person singular present tense of thaw.
watts: (noun) plural of watt.
freer: (adjective) more free.
exult: (verb) to express great joy.
plush: (adjective/noun) luxurious; plush material.
paled: (verb) past tense of pale.
twain: (noun, archaic) two.
clink: (noun/verb) a light ringing sound; to clink.
scamp: (noun/verb) a mischievous child; to scamper.
pawed: (verb) past tense of paw.
grope: (verb) to feel about blindly or uncertainly.
bravo: (interjection) well done!
gable: (noun) a triangular portion of a wall.
stink: (noun/verb) a strong, unpleasant smell; to stink.
sever: (verb) to cut something off.
waned: (verb) past tense of wane.
rarer: (adjective) more rare.
regal: (adjective) fit for a king.
wards: (noun) plural of ward.
fawns: (noun) plural of fawn.
babes: (noun) plural of babe.
unify: (verb) to unite or bring together.
amend: (verb) to change or improve something.
oaken: (adjective) made of oak.
glade: (noun) a clearing in a forest.
visor: (noun) a projecting part of a helmet or cap.
hefty: (adjective) large and heavy.
nines: (noun) plural of nine.
throb: (verb/noun) to pulsate rhythmically; a throbbing sensation.
pecan: (noun) a type of nut.
butts: (noun) plural of butt.
pence: (noun) plural of penny.
sills: (noun) plural of sill.
jails: (noun) plural of jail.
flyer: (noun) a person who flies aircraft.
saber: (noun) a type of sword.
nomad: (noun) a member of a people who travel from place to place to find fresh pasture for their animals and have no permanent home.
miter: (noun/verb) a type of joint; to miter.
beeps: (noun) plural of beep.
domed: (adjective) having a dome.
gulfs: (noun) plural of gulf.
curbs: (noun) plural of curb.
heath: (noun) a type of shrubland.
moors: (noun) plural of moor.
aorta: (noun) the main artery of the body.
larks: (noun) plural of lark.
tangy: (adjective) having a sharp, strong taste.
wryly: (adverb) in a wry manner.
cheep: (verb/noun) to make a cheeping sound.
rages: (noun) plural of rage.
evade: (verb) to escape or avoid.
lures: (noun) plural of lure.
freak: (noun/adjective/verb) something unusual; a freak of nature; to freak out.
vogue: (noun) the prevailing fashion or style.
tunic: (noun) a loose-fitting garment.
slams: (noun) plural of slam.
knits: (verb) third person singular present tense of knit.
dumpy: (adjective) short and stout.
mania: (noun) mental illness.
spits: (noun) plural of spit.
firth: (noun) a long, narrow inlet of the sea.
hikes: (noun) plural of hike.
trots: (noun) plural of trot.
nosed: (verb) past tense of nose.
clank: (noun/verb) a loud metallic sound; to clank.
dogma: (noun) a principle or belief.
bloat: (verb/noun) to swell; bloating.
balsa: (noun) a lightweight wood.
graft: (noun/verb) a bribe; to graft.
middy: (noun) a midshipman.
stile: (noun) a set of steps.
keyed: (verb) past tense of key; also an adjective.
finch: (noun) a type of bird.
sperm: (noun) the fluid containing spermatozoa.
chaff: (noun) the husks of grain separated from the seed after threshing.
wiles: (noun) plural of wile; tricks or stratagems.
amigo: (noun) friend (Spanish).
copra: (noun) the dried flesh of coconuts.
amiss: (adjective/adverb) wrong; wrongly.
eying: (verb) present participle of eye.
twirl: (verb/noun) to rotate rapidly; a twirling motion.
lurch: (verb/noun) to move suddenly and unsteadily; a lurch.
popes: (noun) plural of pope.
chins: (noun) plural of chin.
smock: (noun) a loose-fitting outer garment.
tines: (noun) plural of tine.
guise: (noun) an external form, appearance, or manner of presentation.
grits: (noun) coarsely ground grain.
junks: (noun) plural of junk.
shoal: (noun/verb) a large number of fish; to become shallow.
cache: (noun/verb) a hidden store of valuables; to cache.
tapir: (noun) a large mammal.
atoll: (noun) a ring-shaped reef, island, or chain of islands formed of coral.
deity: (noun) a god or goddess.
toils: (verb) third person singular present tense of toil; (noun) plural of toil.
spree: (noun) a short period of excessive indulgence.
mocks: (verb) third person singular present tense of mock.
scans: (verb) third person singular present tense of scan; (noun) plural of scan.
shorn: (verb) past participle of shear.
revel: (verb/noun) to enjoy oneself unrestrainedly; revelry.
raven: (noun) a type of bird.
hoary: (adjective) very old.
reels: (noun) plural of reel.
scuff: (verb/noun) to scrape or graze; a scuff.
mimic: (verb/noun) to imitate; a mimic.
weedy: (adjective) overgrown with weeds.
corny: (adjective) sentimental and old-fashioned.
truer: (adjective) more true.
rouge: (noun/verb) a red cosmetic; to rouge.
ember: (noun) a glowing piece of coal or wood.
floes: (noun) plural of floe; sheets of floating ice.
torso: (noun) the human body excluding the head and limbs.
wipes: (noun) plural of wipe.
edict: (noun) an official order or proclamation issued by a person in authority.
sulky: (adjective) bad-tempered and sulky.
recur: (verb) to occur again.
groin: (noun) the area of the body between the abdomen and thigh.
baste: (verb) to moisten meat while cooking.
kinks: (noun) plural of kink.
surer: (adjective) more sure.
piggy: (adjective/noun) like a pig; a piggy bank.
moldy: (adjective) covered with mold.
franc: (noun) a former French monetary unit.
liars: (noun) plural of liar.
inept: (adjective) lacking skill or ability.
gusty: (adjective) windy.
facet: (noun) a particular aspect or feature of something.
jetty: (noun) a structure extending from the shore into the water.
equip: (verb) to supply with the necessary items for a particular purpose.
leper: (noun) a person affected by leprosy.
slink: (verb) to move stealthily or furtively.
soars: (verb) third person singular present tense of soar.
cater: (verb) to provide food and services.
dowry: (noun) property or money brought by a bride to her husband on their marriage.
sided: (verb) past tense of side.
yearn: (verb) to have an intense longing for something.
decoy: (noun/verb) a lure; to decoy.
taboo: (noun/adjective) a social custom prohibiting or restricting certain actions.
ovals: (noun) plural of oval.
heals: (verb) third person singular present tense of heal.
pleas: (noun) plural of plea.
beret: (noun) a soft, round hat.
spilt: (verb) past tense of spill.
gayly: (adverb) in a gay or cheerful manner.
rover: (noun) a wanderer; a type of vehicle.
endow: (verb) to provide with a quality, ability, or asset.
pygmy: (noun/adjective) a pygmy person; small.
carat: (noun) a unit of weight for precious stones.
abbey: (noun) a monastery.
vents: (noun) plural of vent.
waken: (verb) to wake up.
chimp: (noun) a chimpanzee.
fumed: (verb) past tense of fume.
sodas: (noun) plural of soda.
vinyl: (noun) a synthetic plastic.
clout: (noun/verb) influence or power; to clout someone.
wades: (verb) third person singular present tense of wade.
mites: (noun) plural of mite.
smirk: (noun/verb) a smug smile; to smirk.
bores: (verb) third person singular present tense of bore.
bunny: (noun) a rabbit.
surly: (adjective) bad-tempered and unfriendly.
frock: (noun) a dress.
foray: (noun) a sudden attack or raid.
purer: (adjective) more pure.
milks: (verb) third person singular present tense of milk.
query: (noun/verb) a question; to question.
mired: (verb) past tense of mire.
blare: (verb/noun) to make a loud, harsh sound; a loud sound.
froth: (noun) a mass of small bubbles.
gruel: (noun) a thin watery porridge.
navel: (noun) the belly button.
paler: (adjective) more pale.
puffy: (adjective) swollen.
casks: (noun) plural of cask.
grime: (noun) dirt ingrained on a surface.
derby: (noun) a type of hat; a horse race.
mamma: (noun) mother.
gavel: (noun) a hammer used by a judge.
teddy: (noun) a teddy bear.
vomit: (verb/noun) to eject stomach contents; vomited matter.
moans: (noun) plural of moan.
allot: (verb) to give or assign something to someone.
defer: (verb) to postpone something.
wield: (verb) to hold and use a weapon or tool.
viper: (noun) a venomous snake.
louse: (noun) a small parasitic insect.
erred: (verb) past tense of err; to make a mistake.
hewed: (verb) past tense of hew.
abhor: (verb) to regard with disgust and hatred.
wrest: (verb) to pull or force something from someone's grasp.
waxen: (adjective) made of or resembling wax.
adage: (noun) a traditional saying.
ardor: (noun) great enthusiasm or passion.
stabs: (noun) plural of stab.
pored: (verb) past tense of pore.
rondo: (noun) a type of musical form.
loped: (verb) past tense of lope.
fishy: (adjective) suspicious.
bible: (noun) the Christian scriptures.
hires: (noun) plural of hire.
foals: (noun) plural of foal.
feuds: (noun) plural of feud.
jambs: (noun) plural of jamb.
thuds: (noun) plural of thud.
jeers: (noun) plural of jeer; taunts.
knead: (verb) to work dough with the hands.
quirk: (noun) a peculiar habit.
rugby: (noun) a type of sport.
expel: (verb) to force someone to leave a place.
greys: (noun) plural of grey.
rigor: (noun) strictness or severity.
ester: (noun) an organic compound.
lyres: (noun) plural of lyre.
aback: (adverb) by surprise.
glues: (verb) third person singular present tense of glue; (noun) plural of glue.
lotus: (noun) a type of flower.
lurid: (adjective) sensational or shocking.
rungs: (noun) plural of rung.
hutch: (noun) a cage for rabbits.
thyme: (noun) a type of herb.
valet: (noun) a manservant.
tommy: (noun) a given name.
yokes: (noun) plural of yoke.
epics: (noun) plural of epic.
trill: (noun/verb) a rapid, melodious succession of notes.
pikes: (noun) plural of pike.
ozone: (noun) a gas found in the atmosphere.
caper: (noun/verb) a playful leap; to caper.
chime: (noun/verb) a harmonious sound; to chime.
frees: (verb) third person singular present tense of free.
famed: (verb) past tense of fame.
leech: (noun/verb) a bloodsucking worm; to leech.
smite: (verb) to strike forcefully.
neigh: (verb/noun) to make a neighing sound.
erode: (verb) to wear away gradually.
robed: (verb) past tense of robe.
hoard: (noun/verb) a hidden store of valuables; to hoard.
salve: (noun) an ointment.
conic: (adjective) cone-shaped.
gawky: (adjective) awkward and clumsy.
craze: (noun/verb) a temporary fashion or enthusiasm; to craze.
jacks: (noun) plural of jack.
gloat: (verb) to express pleasure in one's own success or another's misfortune.
mushy: (adjective) soft and pulpy.
rumps: (noun) plural of rump.
fetus: (noun) an unborn offspring.
wince: (verb/noun) to grimace; a wincing expression.
pinks: (noun) plural of pink.
shalt: (verb, archaic) you shall.
toots: (noun) plural of toot; sounds.
glens: (noun) plural of glen.
cooed: (verb) past tense of coo; to murmur affectionately.
rusts: (verb) third person singular present tense of rust; (noun) plural of rust.
stews: (noun) plural of stew.
shred: (noun/verb) a small piece; to shred.
parka: (noun) a warm, hooded jacket.
chugs: (verb) third person singular present tense of chug.
winks: (noun) plural of wink.
clots: (noun) plural of clot.
shrew: (noun) a scolding woman; a type of mammal.
booed: (verb) past tense of boo.
filmy: (adjective) like film; thin.
juror: (noun) a member of a jury.
dents: (noun) plural of dent.
gummy: (adjective) sticky; gummy bears.
grays: (noun) plural of gray.
hooky: (noun/adjective) truancy; playing hooky.
butte: (noun) an isolated hill with steep sides.
dogie: (noun) a motherless calf.
poled: (verb) past tense of pole.
reams: (noun) plural of ream; large quantities.
fifes: (noun) plural of fife.
spank: (verb/noun) to slap; a spanking action.
gayer: (adjective) more gay.
tepid: (adjective) lukewarm.
spook: (noun/verb) a ghost; to frighten someone.
taint: (noun/verb) a trace of something bad; to taint something.
flirt: (noun/verb) a playful romantic act; to flirt.
rogue: (noun/adjective) a dishonest or unprincipled person; roguish.
spiky: (adjective) having spikes.
opals: (noun) plural of opal.
miser: (noun) a person who hoards wealth.
cocky: (adjective) arrogant and self-confident.
coyly: (adverb) in a coy manner.
balmy: (adjective) pleasantly warm.
slosh: (verb/noun) to splash; a sloshing sound.
brawl: (noun/verb) a noisy fight.
aphid: (noun) a small insect.
faked: (verb) past tense of fake.
hydra: (noun) a mythical creature.
brags: (verb) third person singular present tense of brag.
chide: (verb) to scold mildly.
yanks: (noun) plural of yank.
allay: (verb) to diminish or relieve.
video: (noun) a recording of moving images.
altos: (noun) plural of alto.
eases: (verb) third person singular present tense of ease.
meted: (verb) past tense of mete; to measure.
chasm: (noun) a deep crack or opening in the ground.
longs: (verb) third person singular present tense of long.
excel: (verb) to be superior.
taffy: (noun) a type of candy.
impel: (verb) to drive or urge someone to do something.
savor: (verb/noun) to enjoy something fully; enjoyment.
koala: (noun) a type of marsupial.
quays: (noun) plural of quay.
dawns: (verb) third person singular present tense of dawn.
proxy: (noun) an agent acting on behalf of someone else.
clove: (noun) a spice.
duets: (noun) plural of duet.
dregs: (noun) the sediment of a liquid.
tardy: (adjective) late.
briar: (noun) a thorny bush.
grimy: (adjective) covered in grime.
ultra: (adjective/prefix) extreme; ultra-violet.
meaty: (adjective) full of meat.
halve: (verb) to divide into two equal parts.
wails: (noun) plural of wail.
suede: (noun) a type of leather.
mauve: (adjective/noun) a pale purple color.
envoy: (noun) a diplomatic representative.
arson: (noun) the crime of setting fire to property.
coves: (noun) plural of cove.
gooey: (adjective) sticky or glutinous.
brews: (verb) third person singular present tense of brew; (noun) plural of brew.
sofas: (noun) plural of sofa.
chums: (noun) plural of chum.
amaze: (verb) to surprise someone greatly.
zooms: (verb) third person singular present tense of zoom; (noun) plural of zoom.
abbot: (noun) the head of a monastery.
halos: (noun) plural of halo.
scour: (verb) to clean something thoroughly.
suing: (verb) present participle of sue.
cribs: (noun) plural of crib.
sagas: (noun) plural of saga.
enema: (noun) a procedure to clear the bowels.
wordy: (adjective) using or containing too many words.
harps: (noun) plural of harp.
coupe: (noun) a type of car.
molar: (noun/adjective) a grinding tooth; molar.
flops: (noun) plural of flop.
weeps: (verb) third person singular present tense of weep.
mints: (noun) plural of mint.
ashen: (adjective) ash-colored; pale.
felts: (noun) plural of felt.
askew: (adverb/adjective) not straight or level.
munch: (verb) to eat something with a crunching sound.
mewed: (verb) past tense of mew.
divan: (noun) a long couch.
vices: (noun) plural of vice.
jumbo: (adjective/noun) very large; a jumbo jet.
blobs: (noun) plural of blob.
blots: (noun) plural of blot.
spunk: (noun, informal) courage; semen (vulgar).
acrid: (adjective) having a sharp, bitter taste or smell.
topaz: (noun) a precious gemstone.
cubed: (verb) past tense of cube.
clans: (noun) plural of clan.
flees: (verb) third person singular present tense of flee.
slurs: (noun) plural of slur.
gnaws: (verb) third person singular present tense of gnaw.
welds: (verb) third person singular present tense of weld.
fords: (noun) plural of ford.
emits: (verb) third person singular present tense of emit.
agate: (noun) a type of gemstone.
pumas: (noun) plural of puma.
mends: (verb) third person singular present tense of mend.
darks: (noun) plural of dark.
dukes: (noun) plural of duke.
plies: (verb) third person singular present tense of ply.
canny: (adjective) shrewd; clever.
hoots: (noun) plural of hoot.
oozes: (verb) third person singular present tense of ooze.
lamed: (verb) past tense of lame.
fouls: (noun) plural of foul.
clefs: (noun) plural of clef; musical symbols.
nicks: (noun) plural of nick.
mated: (verb) past tense of mate.
skims: (verb) third person singular present tense of skim.
brunt: (noun) the main force or impact of something.
tuber: (noun) a swollen underground stem.
tinge: (noun/verb) a faint trace of color; to tinge.
fates: (noun) plural of fate.
ditty: (noun) a simple song.
thins: (verb) third person singular present tense of thin.
frets: (verb) third person singular present tense of fret; (noun) plural of fret.
eider: (noun) a type of duck.
bayou: (noun) a marshy inlet or outlet of a lake or river.
mulch: (noun/verb) material used to protect the base of plants; to mulch.
fasts: (noun) plural of fast.
amass: (verb) to gather together or accumulate.
damps: (noun) plural of damp.
morns: (noun) plural of morn.
friar: (noun) a member of a religious order.
palsy: (noun) paralysis.
vista: (noun) a pleasing view.
croon: (verb/noun) to hum or sing softly; a crooning sound.
conch: (noun) a large sea snail.
udder: (noun) the mammary glands of a cow.
tacos: (noun) plural of taco; a type of food.
skits: (noun) plural of skit; short plays.
mikes: (noun) plural of mike.
quits: (noun) plural of quit.
preen: (verb) to tidy one's appearance.
aster: (noun) a type of flower.
adder: (noun) a type of snake.
elegy: (noun) a mournful poem.
pulpy: (adjective) soft and pulpy.
scows: (noun) plural of scow; flat-bottomed boats.
baled: (verb) past tense of bale.
hovel: (noun) a small, squalid dwelling.
lavas: (noun) plural of lava.
crave: (verb) to long for something intensely.
optic: (adjective/noun) relating to sight; optics.
welts: (noun) plural of welt.
busts: (noun) plural of bust.
knave: (noun) a dishonest man.
razed: (verb) past tense of raze; to destroy.
shins: (noun) plural of shin.
totes: (verb) third person singular present tense of tote; (noun) plural of tote.
scoot: (verb/noun) to move quickly; a scooting action.
dears: (noun) plural of dear.
crock: (noun) a broken pot; an old person.
mutes: (noun) plural of mute; also a verb.
trims: (noun) plural of trim; also a verb.
skein: (noun) a length of yarn.
doted: (verb) past tense of dote; to love excessively.
shuns: (verb) third person singular present tense of shun.
veers: (verb) third person singular present tense of veer.
fakes: (verb) third person singular present tense of fake; (noun) plural of fake.
yoked: (verb) past tense of yoke.
wooed: (verb) past tense of woo.
hacks: (noun) plural of hack.
sprig: (noun) a small branch or twig.
wands: (noun) plural of wand.
lulls: (noun) plural of lull; also a verb.
seers: (noun) plural of seer.
snobs: (noun) plural of snob.
nooks: (noun) plural of nook.
pined: (verb) past tense of pine.
perky: (adjective) cheerful and lively.
mooed: (verb) past tense of moo.
frill: (noun) a strip of pleated or gathered fabric.
dines: (verb) third person singular present tense of dine.
booze: (noun/verb) alcoholic drink; to drink alcohol excessively.
tripe: (noun) the stomach of a cow or other ruminant.
prong: (noun) a pointed projection.
drips: (noun) plural of drip.
odder: (adjective) more odd.
levee: (noun) an embankment to prevent flooding.
antic: (adjective/noun) playful; an antic.
sidle: (verb) to move sideways.
pithy: (adjective) concise and forcefully expressive.
corks: (noun) plural of cork.
yelps: (noun) plural of yelp.
joker: (noun) a person who makes jokes.
fleck: (noun/verb) a small spot or mark; to fleck.
buffs: (noun) plural of buff.
scram: (verb, informal) to leave quickly.
tiers: (noun) plural of tier.
bogey: (noun) a bogy; a ghost; a score in golf.
doled: (verb) past tense of dole.
irate: (adjective) feeling or expressing great anger.
vales: (noun) plural of vale.
coped: (verb) past tense of cope.
hails: (verb) third person singular present tense of hail; (noun) plural of hail.
elude: (verb) to evade someone or something.
bulks: (noun) plural of bulk.
aired: (verb) past tense of air.
vying: (verb) present participle of vie.
stags: (noun) plural of stag.
strew: (verb) to scatter things untidily over a surface.
cocci: (noun) plural of coccus; bacteria.
pacts: (noun) plural of pact.
scabs: (noun) plural of scab.
silos: (noun) plural of silo.
dusts: (verb) third person singular present tense of dust; (noun) plural of dust
yodel: (verb/noun) to sing in a yodeling style; a yodeling sound.
terse: (adjective) sparing of words; abrupt.
jaded: (adjective) tired, bored, or lacking enthusiasm.
baser: (adjective) more base.
jibes: (noun) plural of jibe; taunts.
foils: (verb) third person singular present tense of foil; (noun) plural of foil.
sways: (verb) third person singular present tense of sway; (noun) plural of sway.
forgo: (verb) to do without.
slays: (verb) third person singular present tense of slay.
preys: (verb) third person singular present tense of prey.
treks: (noun) plural of trek.
quell: (verb) to suppress or extinguish something.
peeks: (noun) plural of peek.
assay: (noun/verb) an analysis; to assay.
lurks: (verb) third person singular present tense of lurk.
eject: (verb) to expel or force out.
boars: (noun) plural of boar.
trite: (adjective) lacking originality; cliché.
belch: (verb/noun) to eructate; a belch.
gnash: (verb) to grind or strike one's teeth together.
wanes: (verb) third person singular present tense of wane.
lutes: (noun) plural of lute.
whims: (noun) plural of whim.
dosed: (verb) past tense of dose.
chewy: (adjective) tough and requiring much chewing.
snipe: (noun/verb) a type of bird; to snipe.
umbra: (noun) a shadow.
teems: (verb) third person singular present tense of teem; to be full of.
dozes: (verb) third person singular present tense of doze; (noun) plural of doze.
kelps: (noun) plural of kelp.
upped: (verb) past tense of up.
brawn: (noun) muscular strength.
doped: (verb) past tense of dope.
shush: (verb/interjection) to silence; hush.
rinds: (noun) plural of rind.
slush: (noun) partially melted snow.
moron: (noun) a stupid person.
voile: (noun) a sheer fabric.
woken: (verb) past participle of wake.
fjord: (noun) a long, narrow inlet of the sea between high cliffs.
sheik: (noun) a male leader of an Arab tribe.
jests: (noun) plural of jest.
kayak: (noun) a small canoe.
slews: (verb) third person singular present tense of slew; (noun) plural of slew.
toted: (verb) past tense of tote.
saner: (adjective) more sane.
drape: (verb/noun) to hang loosely; a draped cloth.
patty: (noun) a small, flat cake of minced meat.
raves: (verb) third person singular present tense of rave; (noun) plural of rave.
sulfa: (noun) sulfa drug.
grist: (noun) grain to be ground.
skied: (verb) past tense of ski.
vixen: (noun) a female fox; a shrewish woman.
civet: (noun) a type of mammal.
vouch: (verb) to vouch for someone or something.
tiara: (noun) a jeweled crown.
homey: (adjective) comfortable and cozy.
moped: (verb) past tense of mope; (noun) a type of motor vehicle.
runts: (noun) plural of runt; small animals.
serge: (noun) a type of fabric.
kinky: (adjective) having unusual or unconventional sexual preferences.
rills: (noun) plural of rill; small streams.
corns: (noun) plural of corn.
brats: (noun) plural of brat.
pries: (verb) third person singular present tense of pry.
amble: (verb/noun) to walk leisurely; an ambling gait.
fries: (noun) plural of fry; fried potatoes.
loons: (noun) plural of loon.
tsars: (noun) plural of tsar.
datum: (noun) a piece of information.
musky: (adjective) having a musky smell.
pigmy: (noun) a pygmy person.
gnome: (noun) a mythical creature.
ravel: (verb/noun) to untangle; a raveling.
ovule: (noun) a small body that contains the female reproductive cell of a seed plant.
icily: (adverb) in an icy manner.
liken: (verb) to compare something to something else.
lemur: (noun) a type of primate.
frays: (noun) plural of fray.
silts: (noun) plural of silt.
sifts: (verb) third person singular present tense of sift.
plods: (verb) third person singular present tense of plod.
ramps: (noun) plural of ramp.
tress: (noun) a woman's long hair.
earls: (noun) plural of earl.
dudes: (noun) plural of dude.
waive: (verb) to refrain from enforcing.
karat: (noun) a unit of fineness for gold.
jolts: (noun) plural of jolt.
peons: (noun) plural of peon; laborers.
beers: (noun) plural of beer.
horny: (adjective) sexually excited; having horns.
pales: (verb) third person singular present tense of pale.
wreak: (verb) to inflict something unwelcome or unpleasant.
lairs: (noun) plural of lair.
lynch: (verb) to kill someone illegally.
stank: (verb) past tense of stink.
swoon: (verb/noun) to faint; a swoon.
idler: (noun) a lazy person.
abort: (verb) to stop or discontinue something.
blitz: (noun/verb) a sudden, intensive military attack; to blitz.
ensue: (verb) to follow as a result.
atone: (verb) to make amends for a wrongdoing.
bingo: (noun) a game.
roves: (verb) third person singular present tense of rove.
kilts: (noun) plural of kilt.
scald: (verb/noun) to burn with hot liquid or steam; a scald.
adios: (interjection) goodbye (Spanish).
cynic: (noun) a person who believes that people are motivated purely by self-interest.
dulls: (verb) third person singular present tense of dull.
memos: (noun) plural of memo.
elfin: (adjective) delicate and charming.
dales: (noun) plural of dale.
peels: (noun) plural of peel.
peals: (noun) plural of peal.
bares: (verb) third person singular present tense of bare.
sinus: (noun) a cavity within a bone.
crone: (noun) an old woman.
sable: (noun/adjective) a type of fur; dark-brown or black.
hinds: (noun) plural of hind.
shirk: (verb) to avoid or neglect a duty or responsibility.
enrol: (verb, British spelling) to enroll.
wilts: (verb) third person singular present tense of wilt.
roams: (verb) third person singular present tense of roam.
duped: (verb) past tense of dupe.
cysts: (noun) plural of cyst.
mitts: (noun) plural of mitt.
safes: (noun) plural of safe.
spats: (noun) plural of spat.
coops: (noun) plural of coop.
filet: (noun) a fillet of fish or meat.
knell: (noun/verb) the sound of a bell; to knell.
refit: (verb) to repair or refurnish.
covey: (noun) a small flock of birds.
punks: (noun) plural of punk.
kilns: (noun) plural of kiln.
fitly: (adverb) appropriately.
abate: (verb) to reduce or lessen.
talcs: (noun) plural of talc.
heeds: (verb) third person singular present tense of heed.
duels: (noun) plural of duel.
wanly: (adverb) in a wan manner.
ruffs: (noun) plural of ruff.
gauss: (noun) a unit of magnetic flux density.
lapel: (noun) the part of a coat that folds back on the chest.
jaunt: (noun) a short journey.
whelp: (noun/verb) a young dog; to give birth to puppies.
cleat: (noun) a spike.
gauzy: (adjective) light and transparent.
dirge: (noun) a mournful song or hymn.
edits: (noun) plural of edit.
wormy: (adjective) full of worms.
moats: (noun) plural of moat.
smear: (verb/noun) to spread something over a surface; a smear.
prods: (noun) plural of prod.
bowel: (noun) the intestine.
frisk: (verb/noun) to search someone; a frisking action.
vests: (noun) plural of vest.
bayed: (verb) past tense of bay; to bark.
rasp: (verb/noun) to make a harsh sound; a harsh sound.
tames: (verb) third person singular present tense of tame.
delve: (verb) to make a thorough investigation.
embed: (verb) to fix something firmly in a surrounding mass.
befit: (verb) to be suitable for.
wafer: (noun) a thin, crisp biscuit.
ceded: (verb) past tense of cede.
novae: (noun) plural of nova.
feign: (verb) to pretend to be affected by something.
spews: (verb) third person singular present tense of spew.
larch: (noun) a type of tree.
huffs: (noun) plural of huff.
doles: (noun) plural of dole.
mamas: (noun) plural of mama.
hulks: (noun) plural of hulk.
pried: (verb) past tense of pry.
brims: (noun) plural of brim.
irked: (verb) past tense of irk; to annoy.
aspic: (noun) a savory jelly.
swipe: (noun/verb) a sweeping blow; to swipe.
mealy: (adjective) containing or resembling meal.
skimp: (verb) to be stingy.
bluer: (adjective) more blue.
slake: (verb) to satisfy or relieve.
dowdy: (adjective) untidy or shabby.
penis: (noun) the male genital organ.
brays: (noun) plural of bray.
pupas: (noun) plural of pupa.
egret: (noun) a type of bird.
flunk: (verb/noun) to fail; a failure.
phlox: (noun) a type of flower.
gripe: (noun/verb) a complaint; to gripe.
peony: (noun) a type of flower.
douse: (verb) to plunge into water.
blurs: (noun) plural of blur.
darns: (noun) plural of darn.
slunk: (verb) past tense of slink.
lefts: (noun) plural of left.
chats: (noun) plural of chat.
inane: (adjective) silly or empty.
vials: (noun) plural of vial.
stilt: (noun) a long post for supporting something.
rinks: (noun) plural of rink.
woofs: (noun) plural of woof; barking sounds.
wowed: (verb) past tense of wow.
bongs: (noun) plural of bong.
frond: (noun) a leaf of a fern or palm.
ingot: (noun) a block of metal.
evict: (verb) to expel someone from a property.
singe: (verb/noun) to burn slightly; a singe.
shyer: (adjective) more shy.
flied: (verb) past tense of fly.
slops: (noun) plural of slop.
dolts: (noun) plural of dolt; stupid people.
drool: (verb/noun) to let saliva flow from one's mouth; drool.
dells: (noun) plural of dell.
whelk: (noun) a type of sea snail.
hippy: (noun/adjective) a hippie; hippie-like.
feted: (verb) past tense of fete.
ether: (noun) a colorless, volatile, highly flammable liquid.
cocos: (noun) plural of coco.
hives: (noun) plural of hive.
jibed: (verb) past tense of jibe.
mazes: (noun) plural of maze.
trios: (noun) plural of trio.
sirup: (noun) syrup.
squab: (noun) a young pigeon.
laths: (noun) plural of lath.
leers: (noun) plural of leer.
pasta: (noun) a type of food.
rifts: (noun) plural of rift.
lopes: (noun) plural of lope.
alias: (noun/adverb) another name; otherwise known as.
whirs: (verb) third person singular present tense of whir; (noun) plural of whir.
diced: (verb) past tense of dice.
slags: (noun) plural of slag.
lodes: (noun) plural of lode.
foxed: (verb) past tense of fox; puzzled or confused.
idled: (verb) past tense of idle.
prows: (noun) plural of prow.
plait: (noun/verb) a braid; to braid.
malts: (noun) plural of malt.
chafe: (verb/noun) to rub against something; chafing.
cower: (verb) to crouch down in fear.
toyed: (verb) past tense of toy.
chefs: (noun) plural of chef.
keels: (noun) plural of keel.
sties: (noun) plural of sty; pigpens.
racer: (noun) a person who races.
etude: (noun) a musical study.
sucks: (verb) third person singular present tense of suck.
sulks: (verb) third person singular present tense of sulk.
micas: (noun) plural of mica.
czars: (noun) plural of czar.
copse: (noun) a small group of trees.
ailed: (verb) past tense of ail; to suffer.
abler: (adjective) more able.
golds: (noun) plural of gold.
croup: (noun) a respiratory infection.
snaky: (adjective) like a snake.
visas: (noun) plural of visa.
palls: (noun) plural of pall.
mopes: (verb) third person singular present tense of mope; (noun) plural of mope.
boned: (verb) past tense of bone.
wispy: (adjective) thin and wispy.
raved: (verb) past tense of rave.
swaps: (noun) plural of swap.
junky: (adjective/noun) relating to junk; a junkie.
doily: (noun) a small, ornamental mat.
pawns: (noun) plural of pawn.
tamer: (noun/adjective) a person who tames animals; more tame.
poach: (verb) to cook (an egg) in boiling water.
baits: (noun) plural of bait.
damns: (verb) third person singular present tense of damn; (noun) plural of damn.
gumbo: (noun) a type of soup.
daunt: (verb) to intimidate.
prank: (noun) a mischievous act.
hunks: (noun) plural of hunk.
buxom: (adjective) pleasantly plump.
heres: (noun, archaic) hairs.
honks: (noun) plural of honk.
stows: (verb) third person singular present tense of stow.
unbar: (verb) to unfasten.
idles: (verb) third person singular present tense of idle.
routs: (noun) plural of rout; also a verb.
sages: (noun) plural of sage.
goads: (noun) plural of goad.
remit: (verb) to send money.
copes: (noun) plural of cope.
deign: (verb) to condescend.
culls: (verb) third person singular present tense of cull; (noun) plural of cull.
girds: (verb) third person singular present tense of gird.
haves: (noun) plural of have.
lucks: (noun) plural of luck.
stunk: (verb) past tense of stink.
dodos: (noun) plural of dodo.
shams: (noun) plural of sham.
snubs: (noun) plural of snub.
icons: (noun) plural of icon.
usurp: (verb) to take something illegally.
dooms: (noun) plural of doom.
hells: (noun) plural of hell.
soled: (verb) past tense of sole.
comas: (noun) plural of coma.
paves: (verb) third person singular present tense of pave.
maths: (noun, British spelling) mathematics.
perks: (noun) plural of perk; advantages.
limps: (verb) third person singular present tense of limp; (noun) plural of limp.
wombs: (noun) plural of womb.
blurb: (noun) a short description of a book or other product.
daubs: (noun) plural of daub; also a verb.
cokes: (noun) plural of coke.
sours: (verb) third person singular present tense of sour; (noun) plural of sour.
stuns: (verb) third person singular present tense of stun.
cased: (verb) past tense of case.
musts: (noun) plural of must.
coeds: (noun) plural of coed.
cowed: (verb) past tense of cow.
aping: (verb) present participle of ape.
zoned: (verb) past tense of zone.
rummy: (adjective/noun) strange; rummy.
fetes: (noun) plural of fete.
skulk: (verb) to move stealthily.
quaff: (verb) to drink heartily.
rajah: (noun) a king or prince (Indian).
deans: (noun) plural of dean.
reaps: (verb) third person singular present tense of reap.
galas: (noun) plural of gala.
tills: (verb) third person singular present tense of till; (noun) plural of till.
roved: (verb) past tense of rove.
kudos: (noun) praise or honor.
toned: (verb) past tense of tone.
pared: (verb) past tense of pare.
scull: (noun/verb) an oar; to scull.
vexes: (verb) third person singular present tense of vex.
punts: (noun) plural of punt.
snoop: (verb/noun) to pry into someone's affairs; a snoop.
bails: (verb) third person singular present tense of bail; (noun) plural of bail.
dames: (noun) plural of dame.
hazes: (noun) plural of haze.
lores: (noun) plural of lore.
marts: (noun) plural of mart.
voids: (noun) plural of void.
ameba: (noun) an amoeba.
rakes: (noun) plural of rake.
adzes: (noun) plural of adze.
harms: (verb) third person singular present tense of harm; (noun) plural of harm.
rears: (verb) third person singular present tense of rear; (noun) plural of rear.
satyr: (noun) a mythological creature.
swill: (verb/noun) to drink greedily; swill.
hexes: (noun) plural of hex; curses.
colic: (noun) a severe abdominal pain.
leeks: (noun) plural of leek; a type of vegetable.
hurls: (verb) third person singular present tense of hurl.
yowls: (noun) plural of yowl; cries.
ivies: (noun) plural of ivy.
plops: (verb) third person singular present tense of plop; (noun) plural of plop.
musks: (noun) plural of musk.
papaw: (noun) a type of fruit; father (informal).
jells: (verb) third person singular present tense of jell.
bused: (verb) past tense of bus.
cruet: (noun) a small container for oil or vinegar.
bided: (verb) past tense of bide.
filch: (verb) to steal.
zests: (noun) plural of zest.
rooks: (noun) plural of rook.
laxly: (adverb) in a lax manner.
rends: (verb) third person singular present tense of rend.
loams: (noun) plural of loam.
basks: (verb) third person singular present tense of bask.
sires: (noun) plural of sire.
carps: (verb) third person singular present tense of carp; (noun) plural of carp.
pokey: (adjective) slow; pokey.
flits: (verb) third person singular present tense of flit.
muses: (verb) third person singular present tense of muse; (noun) plural of muse.
bawls: (verb) third person singular present tense of bawl.
shuck: (verb) to remove the husk from something.
viler: (adjective) more vile.
lisps: (noun) plural of lisp.
peeps: (noun) plural of peep.
sorer: (adjective) more sore.
lolls: (verb) third person singular present tense of loll.
prude: (noun/adjective) a person who is excessively concerned with propriety or modesty; prudish.
diked: (verb) past tense of dike.
floss: (noun/verb) a type of thread; to floss.
flogs: (verb) third person singular present tense of flog.
scums: (noun) plural of scum.
dopes: (noun) plural of dope.
bogie: (noun) a bogy; a ghost; an undercarriage.
pinky: (adjective/noun) pinkish; a pinky finger.
leafs: (verb) third person singular present tense of leaf.
tubas: (noun) plural of tuba.
scads: (noun) a large number.
lowed: (verb) past tense of low; to moo.
yeses: (noun) plural of yes.
biked: (verb) past tense of bike.
qualm: (noun) an uneasy feeling of doubt, worry, or fear.
evens: (noun) plural of even.
caned: (verb) past tense of cane.
gawks: (verb) third person singular present tense of gawk.
whits: (noun) plural of whit.
wooly: (adjective) woolly; covered in wool.
gluts: (noun) plural of glut.
romps: (verb) third person singular present tense of romp; (noun) plural of romp.
bests: (verb) third person singular present tense of best; (noun) plural of best.
dunce: (noun) a stupid person.
crony: (noun) a close friend or companion.
joist: (noun) a horizontal timber or steel beam supporting a floor or ceiling.
tunas: (noun) plural of tuna.
boner: (noun, slang) an erection.
malls: (noun) plural of mall.
parch: (verb) to make or become dry.
avers: (verb) third person singular present tense of aver.
crams: (verb) third person singular present tense of cram.
pares: (verb) third person singular present tense of pare.
dally: (verb) to waste time.
bigot: (noun) a person who is intolerant towards those holding different opinions.
kales: (noun) plural of kale.
flays: (verb) third person singular present tense of flay.
leach: (verb) to dissolve and remove.
gushy: (adjective) excessively sentimental.
pooch: (noun, informal) a dog.
huger: (adjective) more huge.
slyer: (adjective) more sly.
golfs: (verb) third person singular present tense of golf.
mires: (verb) third person singular present tense of mire; (noun) plural of mire.
flues: (noun) plural of flue.
loaf: (noun/verb) a loaf of bread; to loaf.
arced: (verb) past tense of arc.
acnes: (noun) plural of acne.
neons: (noun) plural of neon.
fiefs: (noun) plural of fief.
dints: (noun) plural of dint.
dazes: (noun) plural of daze.
pouts: (verb) third person singular present tense of pout; (noun) plural of pout.
cored: (verb) past tense of core.
yules: (noun) plural of yule.
lilts: (verb) third person singular present tense of lilt; (noun) plural of lilt.
beefs: (noun) plural of beef.
mutts: (noun) plural of mutt; mixed-breed dogs.
fells: (noun) plural of fell.
cowls: (noun) plural of cowl.
spuds: (noun, informal) potatoes.
lames: (verb) third person singular present tense of lame.
jawed: (verb) past tense of jaw.
dupes: (noun) plural of dupe.
deads: (noun) plural of dead.
bylaw: (noun) a rule made by a local authority.
noons: (noun) plural of noon.
nifty: (adjective) excellent; stylish.
clued: (verb) past tense of clue.
vireo: (noun) a type of bird.
gapes: (verb) third person singular present tense of gape.
metes: (verb) third person singular present tense of mete.
cuter: (adjective) more cute.
maims: (verb) third person singular present tense of maim.
droll: (adjective/noun) amusingly odd or unconventional; a droll person.
cupid: (noun) the Roman god of love.
mauls: (verb) third person singular present tense of maul.
sedge: (noun) a type of grass.
papas: (noun) plural of papa.
wheys: (noun) plural of whey.
eking: (verb) present participle of eke; to make something last longer.
loots: (verb) third person singular present tense of loot; (noun) plural of loot.
hilts: (noun) plural of hilt.
meows: (verb) third person singular present tense of mew; (noun) plural of mew.
beaux: (noun) plural of beau.
dices: (verb) third person singular present tense of dice.
peppy: (adjective) energetic and lively.
riper: (adjective) more ripe.
fogey: (noun) an old-fashioned person.
gists: (noun) plural of gist.
yogas: (noun) plural of yoga.
gilts: (noun) plural of gilt.
skews: (verb) third person singular present tense of skew; (noun) plural of skew.
cedes: (verb) third person singular present tense of cede.
zeals: (noun) plural of zeal.
alums: (noun) plural of alum.
okays: (noun) plural of okay.
elope: (verb) to run away secretly to get married.
grump: (noun/verb) a bad-tempered person; to grump.
wafts: (verb) third person singular present tense of waft; (noun) plural of waft.
soots: (noun) plural of soot.
blimp: (noun) a large, non-rigid airship.
hefts: (noun) plural of heft.
mulls: (verb) third person singular present tense of mull.
hosed: (verb) past tense of hose.
cress: (noun) a type of herb.
doffs: (verb) third person singular present tense of doff.
ruder: (adjective) more rude.
pixie: (noun) a fairy.
waifs: (noun) plural of waif; neglected children.
ousts: (verb) third person singular present tense of oust.
pucks: (noun) plural of puck.
biers: (noun) plural of bier.
gulch: (noun) a deep ravine.
suets: (noun) plural of suet; fat.
hobos: (noun) plural of hobo.
lints: (noun) plural of lint.
brans: (noun) plural of bran.
teals: (noun) plural of teal.
garbs: (noun) plural of garb.
pewee: (noun) a type of bird.
helms: (noun) plural of helm.
turfs: (noun) plural of turf.
quips: (noun) plural of quip; witty remarks.
wends: (verb) third person singular present tense of wend.
banes: (noun) plural of bane.
napes: (noun) plural of nape.
icier: (adjective) more icy.
swats: (noun) plural of swat.
bagel: (noun) a type of bread roll.
hexed: (verb) past tense of hex.
ogres: (noun) plural of ogre.
goner: (noun, informal) a person who is doomed.
gild: (verb) to cover with gold.
pyres: (noun) plural of pyre.
lards: (verb) third person singular present tense of lard; (noun) plural of lard.
bides: (verb) third person singular present tense of bide.
paged: (verb) past tense of page.
talon: (noun) a claw of a bird of prey.
flout: (verb) to openly disregard.
medic: (noun) a doctor or medical practitioner.
veals: (noun) plural of veal.
putts: (noun) plural of putt.
dirks: (noun) plural of dirk.
dotes: (verb) third person singular present tense of dote.
tippy: (adjective) easily tipped over.
blurt: (verb/noun) to utter abruptly; an abrupt utterance.
piths: (noun) plural of pith.
acing: (verb) present participle of ace.
barer: (adjective) more bare.
whets: (verb) third person singular present tense of whet.
gaits: (noun) plural of gait.
wools: (noun) plural of wool.
dunks: (verb) third person singular present tense of dunk.
heros: (noun) plural of hero.
swabs: (noun) plural of swab.
dirts: (verb) third person singular present tense of dirt; (noun) plural of dirt.
jutes: (noun) plural of jute.
hemps: (noun) plural of hemp.
surfs: (verb) third person singular present tense of surf.
okapi: (noun) a type of mammal.
chows: (noun) plural of chow.
shoos: (verb) third person singular present tense of shoo.
dusks: (noun) plural of dusk.
parry: (verb/noun) to ward off; a parrying action.
decal: (noun) a design transferred to a surface.
furls: (verb) third person singular present tense of furl.
cilia: (noun) plural of cilium; hairlike projections.
sears: (verb) third person singular present tense of sear; (noun) plural of sear.
novae: (noun) plural of nova.
murks: (verb) third person singular present tense of murk; (noun) plural of murk.
warps: (verb) third person singular present tense of warp; (noun) plural of warp.
slues: (verb) third person singular present tense of slew.
lamer: (adjective) more lame.
saris: (noun) plural of sari.
weans: (noun) plural of wean.
purrs: (verb) third person singular present tense of purr; (noun) plural of purr.
dills: (noun) plural of dill.
togas: (noun) plural of toga.
newts: (noun) plural of newt.
meany: (noun, informal) a mean person.
bunts: (verb) third person singular present tense of bunt; (noun) plural of bunt.
razes: (verb) third person singular present tense of raze.
goons: (noun) plural of goon; thugs.
wicks: (noun) plural of wick.
ruses: (noun) plural of ruse.
vends: (verb) third person singular present tense of vend.
geode: (noun) a rock containing crystals.
drake: (noun) a male duck.
judos: (noun) plural of judo.
lofts: (verb) third person singular present tense of loft; (noun) plural of loft.
pulps: (verb) third person singular present tense of pulp; (noun) plural of pulp.
lauds: (verb) third person singular present tense of laud; (noun) plural of laud.
mucks: (verb) third person singular present tense of muck; (noun) plural of muck.
vises: (noun) plural of vise.
mocha: (noun) a type of coffee.
oiled: (verb) past tense of oil.
roman: (adjective/noun) relating to Rome; a Roman.
ethyl: (noun) a chemical compound.
gotta: (verb, informal) got to.
fugue: (noun) a type of musical composition.
smack: (noun/verb) a slap; to smack.
gourd: (noun) a type of fruit.
bumpy: (adjective) having bumps.
radix: (noun) a root; a base.
fatty: (adjective) containing much fat.
borax: (noun) a type of mineral.
cubit: (noun) an ancient unit of length.
cacti: (noun) plural of cactus.
gamma: (noun) the third letter of the Greek alphabet; gamma rays.
focal: (adjective) relating to a focus.
avail: (verb) to be of use or value to.
papal: (adjective) relating to the Pope.
golly: (interjection) an exclamation of surprise.
elite: (noun/adjective) a select group; elite.
versa: (adverb) vice versa.
billy: (noun) a given name; a billy goat.
adieu: (interjection) farewell (French).
annum: (noun) year (Latin).
howdy: (interjection) hello.
rhino: (noun, short form) rhinoceros.
norms: (noun) plural of norm.
bobby: (noun, informal) a policeman.
axiom: (noun) a statement or proposition that is regarded as being established, accepted, or self-evidently true.
setup: (noun/verb) an arrangement; to set something up.
yolks: (noun) plural of yolk.
terns: (noun) plural of tern.
mixer: (noun) a machine for mixing.
genre: (noun) a category of artistic composition.
knoll: (noun) a small, rounded hill.
abode: (noun) a dwelling.
junta: (noun) a military or political group that rules a country after seizing power.
gorge: (noun/verb) a deep ravine; to eat greedily.
combo: (noun, informal) a combination.
alpha: (noun/adjective) the first letter of the Greek alphabet; alpha particle.
overt: (adjective) done or shown openly; plainly or readily apparent, not secret or hidden.
kinda: (adverb, informal) kind of.
spelt: (verb) past tense of spell; (noun) a type of wheat.
prick: (noun/verb) a sharp point; to prick.
nobly: (adverb) in a noble manner.
ephod: (noun) a priestly garment (Biblical).
audio: (adjective/noun) relating to sound; an audio recording.
modal: (adjective/noun) relating to a mode; a modal verb.
veldt: (noun) a grassy plain (South Africa).
warty: (adjective) covered in warts.
fluke: (noun) a stroke of luck; a type of worm.
bonny: (adjective) attractive; pretty.
bream: (noun) a type of fish.
rosin: (noun) a resin used by string players.
bolls: (noun) plural of boll.
doers: (noun) plural of doer.
downs: (noun) plural of down; low-lying land.
beady: (adjective) small and shiny.
motif: (noun) a recurring theme.
humph: (interjection) expressing disdain.
fella: (noun, informal) a man.
mould: (noun/verb, British spelling) mold.
crepe: (noun) a type of thin pancake.
kerns: (noun) plural of kern.
aloha: (interjection) hello (Hawaiian).
glyph: (noun) a symbol or character.
azure: (adjective/noun) bright blue; azure sky.
riser: (noun) a vertical part of a step.
blest: (adjective, archaic) blessed.
locus: (noun) a particular position or place.
lumpy: (adjective) full of lumps.
beryl: (noun) a precious gemstone.
wanna: (verb, informal) want to.
brier: (noun) a thorny bush.
tuner: (noun) a device for tuning instruments.
rowdy: (adjective/noun) noisy and disorderly; a rowdy person.
mural: (noun) a painting on a wall.
timer: (noun) a device for measuring time.
canst: (verb, archaic) can.
krill: (noun) a small crustacean.
quoth: (verb, archaic) said.
lemme: (verb, informal) let me.
triad: (noun) a group of three.
tenon: (noun) a projecting piece of wood.
amply: (adverb) sufficiently; abundantly.
deeps: (noun) plural of deep; deep places.
padre: (noun) a priest (Spanish).
leant: (verb) past tense of lean.
pacer: (noun) a person or animal that paces; a type of car.
octal: (adjective) relating to the number eight.
dolly: (noun) a small cart; a doll.
trans: (prefix) across; beyond.
sumac: (noun) a type of tree.
foamy: (adjective) covered in foam.
lolly: (noun, informal) a lollipop.
giver: (noun) a person who gives.
quipu: (noun) a system of knotted cords used by the Inca.
codex: (noun) a manuscript book.
manna: (noun) a food provided miraculously.
unwed: (adjective) not married.
vodka: (noun) an alcoholic drink.
ferny: (adjective) resembling ferns.
salon: (noun) a social gathering; a beauty salon.
duple: (adjective) doubled; having two parts.
boron: (noun) a chemical element.
revue: (noun) a variety show.
crier: (noun) a person who cries out.
alack: (interjection) alas.
inter: (verb) to bury.
dilly: (noun) a dill pickle; something excellent (informal).
whist: (noun/verb) a game; to whistle.
cults: (noun) plural of cult.
spake: (verb, archaic) spoke.
reset: (verb) to set again.
loess: (noun) a type of soil.
decor: (noun, abbreviation) decoration.
mover: (noun) a person who moves things.
verve: (noun) enthusiasm.
ethic: (noun) a moral principle.
gamut: (noun) a complete range.
lingo: (noun) special vocabulary.
dunno: (verb, informal) don't know.
align: (verb) to adjust something to be straight.
sissy: (noun/adjective, informal) a timid boy; weak.
incur: (verb) to become subject to something.
reedy: (adjective) reed-like.
avant: (prefix) before; ahead of.
piper: (noun) a person who plays the pipe.
waxer: (noun) a person who waxes.
calyx: (noun) the cup of a flower.
basil: (noun) a type of herb.
coons: (noun) plural of coon.
seine: (noun) a type of fishing net.
piney: (adjective) relating to pines.
lemma: (noun) a starting point.
trams: (noun) plural of tram.
winch: (noun/verb) a machine for hauling.
whirr: (noun/verb) a whirring sound.
saith: (verb, archaic) says.
ionic: (adjective) relating to ions.
heady: (adjective) intoxicating; strong.
harem: (noun) a part of a Muslim household reserved for women.
tummy: (noun, informal) the stomach.
sally: (noun/verb) a sortie; to sally forth.
shied: (verb) past tense of shy.
dross: (noun) waste or refuse.
farad: (noun) a unit of electrical capacitance.
saver: (noun) a person who saves.
tilde: (noun) a diacritical mark (~).
jingo: (noun) extreme patriotism.
bower: (noun) a shady place.
serif: (noun) a small stroke at the end of a letter.
facto: (noun, abbreviation) facto.
belle: (noun) a beautiful woman.
inset: (noun/verb) something inserted; to inset.
bogus: (adjective) false or counterfeit.
caved: (verb) past tense of cave.
forte: (noun) a person's strong point.
sooty: (adjective) covered in soot.
bongo: (noun) a type of drum.
toves: (noun) plural of tove; mythical creatures.
credo: (noun) a statement of belief.
basal: (adjective) relating to a base.
yella: (adjective, informal) yellow.
aglow: (adjective) shining brightly.
glean: (verb) to gather something slowly.
gusto: (noun) vigor and enjoyment.
hymen: (noun) a membrane.
ethos: (noun) the characteristic spirit of a culture, time, or community as manifested in its beliefs and aspirations.
terra: (noun) earth (Latin).
brash: (adjective) self-assertive.
scrip: (noun) a temporary certificate.
swash: (verb/noun) to splash; a swashing action.
aleph: (noun) the first letter of the Hebrew alphabet.
tinny: (adjective) thin and metallic-sounding.
itchy: (adjective) causing an itch.
wanta: (verb, informal) want to.
trice: (noun) a very short time.
jowls: (noun) plural of jowl; flesh under the chin.
gongs: (noun) plural of gong.
garde: (noun) a guard (French).
boric: (adjective) relating to boron.
twill: (noun) a type of fabric.
sower: (noun) a person who sows seeds.
henry: (noun) a unit of inductance; a given name.
awash: (adjective/adverb) flooded; awash with.
libel: (noun/verb) a false statement that damages someone's reputation.
spurn: (verb) to reject or scorn.
sabre: (noun) a type of sword.
rebut: (verb) to contradict or refute.
penal: (adjective) relating to punishment.
obese: (adjective) grossly fat.
sonny: (noun) a son (informal).
quirt: (noun) a riding whip.
mebbe: (adverb, informal) maybe.
tacit: (adjective) understood without being stated.
greek: (adjective/noun) relating to Greece; a Greek person.
xenon: (noun) a chemical element.
hullo: (interjection) hello.
pique: (noun/verb) a feeling of irritation; to pique someone's interest.
roger: (noun/verb/interjection) a term used in communications; to understand; okay.
negro: (noun, offensive) a Black person.
hadst: (verb, archaic) had.
gecko: (noun) a type of lizard.
beget: (verb) to be the father of.
uncut: (adjective) not cut.
aloes: (noun) plural of aloe.
louis: (noun) a given name.
quint: (noun) a quintet.
clunk: (noun/verb) a dull, heavy sound; to clunk.
raped: (verb) past tense of rape.
salvo: (noun) a simultaneous discharge of guns.
diode: (noun) a semiconductor device.
matey: (adjective, informal) friendly.
hertz: (noun) a unit of frequency.
xylem: (noun) a type of plant tissue.
kiosk: (noun) a small temporary structure.
apace: (adverb) quickly.
cawed: (verb) past tense of caw.
peter: (noun) a given name.
wench: (noun, archaic) a girl or young woman.
cohos: (noun) plural of coho; a type of salmon.
sorta: (adverb, informal) sort of.
gamba: (noun) a type of violin.
bytes: (noun) plural of byte.
tango: (noun) a type of dance.
nutty: (adjective) crazy; containing nuts.
axial: (adjective) relating to an axis.
aleck: (noun) a smart aleck.
natal: (adjective) relating to birth.
clomp: (verb/noun) to walk heavily; a clomping sound.
gored: (verb) past tense of gore.
siree: (interjection, informal) yes indeed.
bandy: (verb/adjective) to discuss something; bent.
gunny: (adjective/noun) made of burlap; gunny sacks.
runic: (adjective) relating to runes.
whizz: (noun/verb) a whizzing sound; to whizz.
rupee: (noun) a monetary unit.
fated: (adjective) destined to happen.
wiper: (noun) a device for wiping something.
bards: (noun) plural of bard.
briny: (adjective) salty.
staid: (adjective) sedate; serious.
hocks: (noun) plural of hock.
ochre: (noun/adjective) a yellowish-brown or reddish-yellow pigment; ochre-colored.
yummy: (adjective, informal) delicious.
gents: (noun) plural of gent.
soupy: (adjective) like soup.
roper: (noun) a person who ropes cattle.
swath: (noun) a swathe; a strip of land.
cameo: (noun) a small carving.
edger: (noun) a person or thing that edges.
spate: (noun) a sudden outpouring.
gimme: (verb, informal) give me.
ebbed: (verb) past tense of ebb.
breve: (noun) a musical note.
theta: (noun) the eighth letter of the Greek alphabet.
deems: (verb) third person singular present tense of deem.
dykes: (noun) plural of dyke.
servo: (noun) a servomechanism.
telly: (noun, informal) television.
tabby: (noun/adjective) a cat; tabby-colored.
tares: (noun) plural of tare; weeds.
blocs: (noun) plural of bloc.
welch: (verb) to fail to keep a promise.
ghoul: (noun) an evil spirit.
vitae: (noun, plural of vita) life (Latin).
cumin: (noun) a spice.
dinky: (adjective) small and insignificant.
bronc: (noun, informal) a bronco; a wild horse.
tabor: (noun) a small drum.
teeny: (adjective, informal) tiny.
comer: (noun) a person who comes.
borer: (noun) a person or thing that bores.
sired: (verb) past tense of sire.
privy: (adjective/noun) private; a privy.
mammy: (noun, offensive) a Black woman.
deary: (noun, informal) dear.
gyros: (noun) plural of gyro.
sprit: (noun) a spar.
conga: (noun) a type of dance.
quire: (noun) a set of twenty-four sheets of paper; a choir (archaic).
thugs: (noun) plural of thug.
furor: (noun) an outburst of public anger.
bloke: (noun, informal) a man.
runes: (noun) plural of rune; ancient symbols.
bawdy: (adjective) indecent; obscene.
cadre: (noun) a core group of trained personnel.
toxin: (noun) a poison.
annul: (verb) to declare something invalid.
egged: (verb) past tense of egg.
anion: (noun) a negatively charged ion.
nodes: (noun) plural of node.
picky: (adjective) fussy.
stein: (noun) a beer mug.
jello: (noun) a type of gelatin dessert.
audit: (noun/verb) an examination of accounts; to audit.
echos: (noun) plural of echo.
fagot: (noun, offensive) a bundle of sticks; a homosexual man.
letup: (noun) a pause or cessation.
eyrie: (noun) an eagle's nest.
fount: (noun) a source or origin.
caped: (verb) past tense of cape.
axons: (noun) plural of axon.
amuck: (adverb) in a frenzied or uncontrolled manner.
banal: (adjective) lacking originality; cliché.
riled: (verb) past tense of rile; to annoy.
petit: (adjective, French) small.
umber: (noun/adjective) a dark brown color.
miler: (noun) a person who runs miles; a type of vehicle.
fibre: (noun, British spelling) fiber.
agave: (noun) a type of plant.
bated: (adjective) with bated breath; anxiously.
bilge: (noun) the lowest part of a ship's hull.
vitro: (prefix) in glass (Latin).
feint: (noun/verb) a deceptive movement; to feint.
pudgy: (adjective) chubby.
mater: (noun) mother (Latin).
manic: (adjective) relating to mania.
umped: (verb) past tense of ump; to umpire.
pesky: (adjective) annoying.
strep: (noun, abbreviation) streptococcus.
slurp: (verb/noun) to drink noisily; a slurping sound.
pylon: (noun) a tall supporting structure.
puree: (noun) a smooth, thick mixture.
caret: (noun) a punctuation mark (^) used to show where something should be inserted.
temps: (noun) plural of temp.
newel: (noun) a central post in a staircase.
yawns: (noun) plural of yawn.
seedy: (adjective) run-down; disreputable.
treed: (verb) past tense of tree; cornered.
coups: (noun) plural of coup.
rangy: (adjective) tall and thin.
brads: (noun) plural of brad.
mangy: (adjective) infested with mange; shabby.
loner: (noun) a person who prefers to be alone.
circa: (adverb) approximately.
tibia: (noun) a bone in the leg.
afoul: (adverb) into difficulty or trouble.
mommy: (noun) mother (informal).
titer: (noun) a measure of concentration.
carne: (noun) meat (Spanish).
kooky: (adjective, informal) crazy.
motes: (noun) plural of mote.
amity: (noun) friendship.
suave: (adjective) smoothly agreeable or polite.
hippo: (noun, short form) hippopotamus.
curvy: (adjective) having curves.
samba: (noun) a type of dance.
newsy: (adjective) full of news.
anise: (noun) a type of herb.
imams: (noun) plural of imam.
tulle: (noun) a type of fine net.
aways: (adverb) away; always.
liven: (verb) to make or become lively.
hallo: (interjection) hello.
wales: (noun) plural of wale; ridges.
opted: (verb) past tense of opt.
canto: (noun) a section of a long poem.
idyll: (noun) an idyllic scene.
bodes: (verb) third person singular present tense of bode.
curio: (noun) a rare or unusual item.
wrack: (noun) seaweed; destruction.
hiker: (noun) a person who hikes.
chive: (noun) a type of herb.
yokel: (noun) a rustic person.
dotty: (adjective) eccentric; silly.
demur: (verb/noun) to object; an objection.
cusps: (noun) plural of cusp.
specs: (noun, informal) spectacles.
quads: (noun) plural of quad.
laity: (noun) ordinary people.
toner: (noun) a solution for cleaning or treating.
decry: (verb) to express strong disapproval of.
writs: (noun) plural of writ.
saute: (verb) to fry quickly in butter or oil.
clack: (noun/verb) a clicking sound; to clack.
aught: (noun/adverb) anything; naught.
logos: (noun) plural of logo.
tipsy: (adjective) slightly drunk.
natty: (adjective) smartly dressed.
ducal: (adjective) relating to a duke.
bidet: (noun) a toilet fixture.
bulgy: (adjective) bulging.
metre: (noun, British spelling) meter.
lusts: (noun) plural of lust.
unary: (adjective) relating to one.
goeth: (verb, archaic) goes.
baler: (noun) a machine for making bales.
sited: (verb) past tense of site.
shies: (verb) third person singular present tense of shy.
hasps: (noun) plural of hasp; fasteners.
brung: (verb, informal) brought.
holed: (verb) past tense of hole.
swank: (noun/verb/adjective) ostentatious display; to swank; stylish.
looky: (adjective, informal) curious.
melee: (noun) a noisy fight.
huffy: (adjective) easily offended.
loamy: (adjective) like loam.
pimps: (noun) plural of pimp.
titan: (noun) a giant; a person of great power.
binge: (noun/verb) a period of excessive indulgence; to binge.
shunt: (verb/noun) to move or turn aside; a shunt.
femur: (noun) the thigh bone.
libra: (noun) a constellation; the seventh sign of the zodiac.
seder: (noun) a Jewish ritual meal.
honed: (verb) past tense of hone.
annas: (noun) plural of anna; a coin.
coypu: (noun) a type of rodent.
shims: (noun) plural of shim; thin pieces of material.
zowie: (interjection) wow.
jihad: (noun) a holy war.
savvy: (adjective/noun) shrewd; knowledge.
nadir: (noun) the lowest point.
basso: (noun) a low male voice.
monic: (adjective) relating to a name.
maned: (adjective) having a mane.
mousy: (adjective) mouse-colored; timid.
omega: (noun) the last letter of the Greek alphabet.
laver: (noun) a basin.
prima: (adjective) first; primary (Italian).
picas: (noun) plural of pica.
folio: (noun) a large book.
mecca: (noun) a place regarded as a center for a particular activity or pursuit.
reals: (noun) plural of real.
troth: (noun, archaic) truth; loyalty.
testy: (adjective) irritable.
balky: (adjective) stubborn.
crimp: (verb/noun) to wrinkle or curl; a crimp.
chink: (noun/verb) a crack or narrow opening; to chink.
abets: (verb) third person singular present tense of abet.
splat: (noun/verb) a splash; to splat.
abaci: (noun) plural of abacus.
vaunt: (verb) to boast about.
cutie: (noun, informal) a cute person.
pasty: (adjective/noun) covered in paste; a pasty.
moray: (noun) a type of eel.
levis: (noun) Levi Strauss & Co. jeans.
ratty: (adjective) shabby; dilapidated.
islet: (noun) a small island.
joust: (noun/verb) a mock battle; to joust.
motet: (noun) a choral composition.
viral: (adjective) relating to viruses.
nukes: (noun, informal) nuclear weapons.
grads: (noun) plural of grad.
comfy: (adjective, informal) comfortable.
voila: (interjection) there it is! (French).
woozy: (adjective) dizzy.
blued: (verb) past tense of blue.
whomp: (verb/noun) to hit hard; a hard hit.
sward: (noun) a stretch of smooth, short grass.
metro: (noun, short form) metropolitan; a subway.
skeet: (noun) a type of clay pigeon shooting.
chine: (noun) the spine; the back.
aerie: (noun) an eagle's nest.
bowie: (noun) a bowie knife.
tubby: (adjective) plump; chubby.
emirs: (noun) plural of emir.
coati: (noun) a type of mammal.
unzip: (verb) to open a zipper.
slobs: (noun) plural of slob; messy people.
trike: (noun) a tricycle.
funky: (adjective) stylish and unusual.
ducat: (noun) a former European coin.
dewey: (adjective) covered in dew.
skoal: (interjection) a toast (Scandinavian).
wadis: (noun) plural of wadi.
oomph: (noun, informal) energy or vitality.
taker: (noun) a person who takes.
minim: (noun) a small unit.
getup: (noun, informal) attire.
stoic: (adjective/noun) indifferent to pleasure or pain; a stoic person.
synod: (noun) a church council.
runty: (adjective) stunted in growth.
flyby: (noun) a brief view.
braze: (verb) to join metals using an alloy.
inlay: (noun/verb) an ornamental design; to inlay.
venue: (noun) a place where an event is held.
louts: (noun) plural of lout; clumsy or ill-mannered people.
peaty: (adjective) relating to peat.
orlon: (noun) a synthetic fiber.
humpy: (adjective) having humps.
radon: (noun) a chemical element.
beaut: (noun, informal) beauty.
raspy: (adjective) harsh-sounding.
unfed: (adjective) not fed.
crick: (noun) a crick in the neck; a painful spasm.
nappy: (adjective) fluffy; a nappy (diaper).
vizor: (noun) visor.
yipes: (interjection) an exclamation of surprise or fear.
rebus: (noun) a puzzle.
kiwis: (noun) plural of kiwi; a type of bird; a fruit.
vetch: (noun) a type of plant.
squib: (noun) a small firework.
sitar: (noun) a type of stringed instrument.
kiddo: (noun, informal) child.
dyers: (noun) plural of dyer.
cotta: (noun) a type of cheese.
matzo: (noun) unleavened bread.
lager: (noun) a type of beer.
zebus: (noun) plural of zebu; a type of cattle.
crass: (adjective) lacking sensitivity.
dacha: (noun) a country house (Russian).
kneed: (verb) past tense of knead.
dicta: (noun) plural of dictum; pronouncements.
fakir: (noun) a Muslim or Hindu ascetic.
knurl: (noun/verb) a grooved pattern; to knurl.
runny: (adjective) liquid; runny nose.
unpin: (verb) to unfasten something with a pin.
julep: (noun) a sweet drink.
globs: (noun) plural of glob.
nudes: (noun) plural of nude.
sushi: (noun) a type of food.
tacky: (adjective) sticky; cheap.
stoke: (verb) to stir a fire; to fuel.
kaput: (adjective, informal) broken; finished.
butch: (adjective/noun) masculine; a butch woman.
hulas: (noun) plural of hula; dances.
croft: (noun) a small farm.
achoo: (interjection) expressing a sneeze.
genii: (noun) plural of genie.
nodal: (adjective) relating to a node.
outgo: (noun) expenditure.
spiel: (noun/verb) a long speech; to spiel.
viols: (noun) plural of viol; stringed instruments.
fetid: (adjective) smelling extremely unpleasant.
cagey: (adjective, informal) unwilling to give information.
fudgy: (adjective) like fudge.
epoxy: (noun) a type of resin.
leggy: (adjective) having long legs.
hanky: (noun, informal) a handkerchief.
lapis: (noun) lapis lazuli; a gemstone.
felon: (noun) a person who has committed a felony.
beefy: (adjective) large and strong.
coots: (noun) plural of coot; a type of bird.
melba: (noun) a type of peach.
caddy: (noun) a small container; a golf caddy.
segue: (noun/verb) a transition; to segue.
betel: (noun) a type of palm tree.
frizz: (noun/verb) to curl hair; curled hair.
drear: (adjective) dull and depressing.
kooks: (noun) plural of kook; eccentric people.
turbo: (noun/adjective) relating to a turbocharger.
hoagy: (noun, informal) a hoagie; a submarine sandwich.
moult: (verb, British spelling) to molt.
helix: (noun) a spiral.
zonal: (adjective) relating to a zone.
arias: (noun) plural of aria.
nosey: (adjective, informal) nosy; inquisitive.
paean: (noun) a song of praise or triumph.
lacey: (adjective) like lace.
banns: (noun) plural of ban; announcements of a wedding.
swain: (noun, archaic) a young man.
fryer: (noun) a person who fries; a machine for frying.
retch: (verb) to make an involuntary effort to vomit.
tenet: (noun) a principle or belief.
gigas: (noun) plural of gigas; units of data.
whiny: (adjective) complaining.
ogled: (verb) past tense of ogle; to stare at someone.
rumen: (noun) the first stomach of a ruminant.
begot: (verb) past tense of beget.
cruse: (noun) a type of container.
abuts: (verb) third person singular present tense of abut.
riven: (verb) past participle of rive; to split.
balks: (noun) plural of balk.
sines: (noun) plural of sine.
sigma: (noun) the eighteenth letter of the Greek alphabet.
abase: (verb) to humble or degrade.
ennui: (noun) listlessness and dissatisfaction.
gores: (verb) third person singular present tense of gore; (noun) plural of gore.
unset: (verb) past tense of unset.
augur: (noun/verb) an omen; to augur.
sated: (adjective) satisfied.
odium: (noun) general or widespread hatred or disgust directed toward someone or something.
latin: (adjective/noun) relating to Latin; the Latin language.
dings: (noun) plural of ding.
moire: (noun) a wavy pattern.
scion: (noun) a descendant.
henna: (noun) a dye.
kraut: (noun, informal) sauerkraut.
dicks: (noun) plural of dick.
lifer: (noun) a person serving a life sentence.
prigs: (noun) plural of prig; self-righteous people.
bebop: (noun) a type of jazz.
gages: (noun) plural of gage.
gazer: (noun) a person who gazes.
fanny: (noun, informal) the buttocks; a given name.
gibes: (noun) plural of gibe.
aural: (adjective) relating to the ear.
tempi: (noun) plural of tempo.
hooch: (noun, informal) alcohol.
rapes: (noun) plural of rape.
snuck: (verb) past tense of sneak.
harts: (noun) plural of hart.
techs: (noun) plural of tech.
emend: (verb) to correct.
ninny: (noun) a silly person.
guava: (noun) a type of fruit.
scarp: (noun) a steep slope.
liege: (noun/adjective) a feudal lord; loyal.
tufty: (adjective) having tufts.
sepia: (noun/adjective) a brownish-red color.
tomes: (noun) plural of tome.
carob: (noun) a type of tree or its pod.
emcee: (noun/verb) a master of ceremonies; to emcee.
prams: (noun) plural of pram; baby carriages.
poser: (noun) a pretentious person; a problem.
verso: (noun) the left-hand page.
hubba: (interjection) an exclamation of excitement.
joule: (noun) a unit of energy.
baize: (noun) a type of fabric.
blips: (noun) plural of blip; brief appearances.
scrim: (noun) a type of fabric.
cubby: (noun/adjective) a small compartment; small.
clave: (noun/verb) a musical interval; to cleave.
winos: (noun) plural of wino; alcoholics.
rearm: (verb) to re-arm.
liens: (noun) plural of lien.
lumen: (noun) a unit of luminous flux.
chump: (noun, informal) a fool.
nanny: (noun) a childminder; a nanny goat.
trump: (noun/verb) a trump card; to trump.
fichu: (noun) a type of scarf.
chomp: (verb) to chew noisily.
homos: (noun, informal) homosexuals.
purty: (adjective, informal) pretty.
maser: (noun) a type of amplifier.
woosh: (noun/verb) a whooshing sound.
patsy: (noun, informal) a gullible person.
shill: (noun/verb) a person who pretends to be a customer; to shill.
rusks: (noun) plural of rusk.
avast: (interjection, nautical) stop.
swami: (noun) a Hindu religious teacher.
boded: (verb) past tense of bode.
ahhhh: (interjection) expressing relief or pleasure.
lobed: (adjective) having lobes.
natch: (adverb, informal) naturally.
shish: (noun) a shish kebab.
tansy: (noun) a type of plant.
snoot: (noun, informal) nose.
payer: (noun) a person who pays.
altho: (conjunction, informal) although.
sappy: (adjective) sentimental; sugary.
laxer: (adjective) more lax.
hubby: (noun, informal) husband.
aegis: (noun) protection; sponsorship.
riles: (verb) third person singular present tense of rile.
ditto: (noun/adverb) the same; likewise.
jazzy: (adjective) jazzy; stylish.
dingo: (noun) a wild dog.
quasi: (adjective/prefix) seeming; quasi-judicial.
septa: (noun) plural of septum.
peaky: (adjective) thin and unhealthy-looking.
lorry: (noun, British spelling) truck.
heerd: (verb) past tense of hear.
bitty: (adjective) small.
payee: (noun) a person to whom money is paid.
seamy: (adjective) unpleasant; sordid.
apses: (noun) plural of apse.
imbue: (verb) to inspire or permeate.
belie: (verb) to contradict.
chary: (adjective) cautiously or suspiciously reluctant to do something.
spoof: (noun/verb) a hoax; to spoof.
phyla: (noun) plural of phylum; major taxonomic categories.
clime: (noun) a region or place.
babel: (noun) a confused noise.
wacky: (adjective, informal) crazy.
sumps: (noun) plural of sump.
skids: (noun) plural of skid.
khans: (noun) plural of khan.
crypt: (noun) an underground burial chamber.
inure: (verb) to accustom to something unpleasant.
nonce: (noun) a single occasion.
outen: (verb, informal) to out.
faire: (noun) a fair (French).
hooey: (noun/interjection, informal) nonsense.
anole: (noun) a type of lizard.
kazoo: (noun) a musical instrument.
calve: (verb) to give birth to a calf.
limbo: (noun) a state of uncertainty.
argot: (noun) special vocabulary.
ducky: (adjective, informal) excellent.
faker: (noun) a deceiver.
vibes: (noun) plural of vibe; feelings.
gassy: (adjective) containing gas.
unlit: (adjective) not lit.
nervy: (adjective) nervously excited.
femme: (noun) a woman (French).
biter: (noun) a person who bites.
fiche: (noun) microfiche.
boors: (noun) plural of boor; rude people.
gaffe: (noun) a social blunder.
saxes: (noun) plural of sax; saxophones.
recap: (verb/noun) to summarize; a summary.
synch: (noun/verb, abbreviation) synchronization; to synchronize.
facie: (noun) face (Latin).
dicey: (adjective, informal) risky.
ouija: (noun) a type of board game.
hewer: (noun) a person who hews.
legit: (adjective, informal) legitimate.
gurus: (noun) plural of guru.
edify: (verb) to instruct or improve someone morally or intellectually.
tweak: (verb/noun) to adjust slightly; a tweak.
caron: (noun) a diacritical mark (ˇ).
typos: (noun) plural of typo; typing errors.
rerun: (noun/verb) a repeat broadcast; to rerun.
polly: (noun) a given name.
surds: (noun) plural of surd; irrational numbers.
hamza: (noun) a glottal stop.
nulls: (noun) plural of null.
hater: (noun) a person who hates.
lefty: (noun/adjective) a left-handed person; left-handed.
mogul: (noun) a powerful person.
mafia: (noun) a criminal organization.
debug: (verb) to remove errors from a program.
pates: (noun) plural of pate.
blabs: (verb) third person singular present tense of blab; (noun) plural of blab.
splay: (verb/noun) to spread out; a spreading out.
talus: (noun) an ankle bone.
porno: (noun, informal) pornography.
moola: (noun, informal) money.
nixed: (verb) past tense of nix; to veto.
kilos: (noun) plural of kilo.
snide: (adjective) sarcastic and contemptuous.
horsy: (adjective) like a horse.
gesso: (noun) a preparation for painting.
jaggy: (adjective) uneven; jagged.
trove: (noun) a valuable collection of objects.
nixes: (verb) third person singular present tense of nix; (noun) plural of nix.
creel: (noun) a basket for carrying fish.
pater: (noun) father (Latin).
iotas: (noun) plural of iota.
cadge: (verb) to beg or sponge.
skyed: (verb) past tense of sky; covered with clouds.
hokum: (noun) nonsense.
furze: (noun) a type of shrub.
ankhs: (noun) plural of ankh; Egyptian crosses.
curie: (noun) a unit of radioactivity.
nutsy: (adjective, informal) crazy.
hilum: (noun) a scar on a seed.
remix: (noun/verb) a new version of a song; to remix.
angst: (noun) anxiety.
burls: (noun) plural of burl; knots in wood.
jimmy: (noun/verb) a crowbar; to jimmy.
veiny: (adjective) full of veins.
tryst: (noun) a secret meeting.
codon: (noun) a sequence of three nucleotides.
befog: (verb) to confuse.
gamed: (verb) past tense of game.
flume: (noun) a chute for conveying water.
axman: (noun) a person who uses an axe.
doozy: (noun, informal) something excellent.
lubes: (noun) plural of lube; lubricants.
rheas: (noun) plural of rhea.
bozos: (noun) plural of bozo; clowns.
butyl: (noun) a chemical compound.
kelly: (noun) a given name.
mynah: (noun) a type of bird.
jocks: (noun) plural of jock.
donut: (noun) a doughnut.
avian: (adjective) relating to birds.
wurst: (noun) sausage (German).
chock: (noun/verb) a wedge; to chock something.
quash: (verb) to suppress or extinguish.
quals: (noun, abbreviation) qualifications.
hayed: (verb) past tense of hay.
bombe: (noun) a bombe; a type of dessert.
cushy: (adjective, informal) comfortable and easy.
spacy: (adjective, informal) strange or eccentric.
puked: (verb) past tense of puke.
leery: (adjective, informal) suspicious.
thews: (noun, plural of thew) muscles.
prink: (verb) to make oneself tidy.
amens: (noun) plural of amen.
tesla: (noun) a unit of magnetic flux density; a brand of car.
intro: (noun, abbreviation) introduction.
fiver: (noun, informal) a five-pound note.
frump: (noun/verb) a dowdy woman; to frump.
capos: (noun) plural of capo.
opine: (verb) to express an opinion.
coder: (noun) a person who codes.
namer: (noun) a person who names.
jowly: (adjective) having jowls.
pukes: (verb) third person singular present tense of puke; (noun) plural of puke.
haled: (verb) past tense of hale.
chard: (noun) a type of vegetable.
duffs: (noun) plural of duff.
bruin: (noun) a brown bear.
reuse: (verb) to use again.
whang: (noun/verb) a heavy blow; to whang.
toons: (noun, informal) cartoons.
frats: (noun) plural of frat; fraternities.
silty: (adjective) containing silt.
telex: (noun) a system for sending messages electronically.
cutup: (noun, informal) a mischievous person.
nisei: (noun) a second-generation Japanese-American.
neato: (adjective, informal) excellent.
decaf: (adjective/noun) decaffeinated; decaf coffee.
softy: (noun/adjective) a weak person; soft.
bimbo: (noun, offensive) a silly or attractive woman.
adlib: (verb/noun) to improvise; improvisation.
loony: (adjective, informal) crazy.
shoed: (verb) past tense of shoe.
agues: (noun) plural of ague; fevers.
peeve: (noun/verb) an annoyance; to peeve.
noway: (adverb, informal) no way.
gamey: (adjective) having a strong taste.
sarge: (noun, informal) sergeant.
reran: (verb) past tense of rerun.
epact: (noun) the number of days between January 1 and the next new moon.
potty: (adjective/noun, informal) crazy; a potty.
coned: (verb) past tense of cone.
upend: (verb) to overturn.
narco: (prefix) relating to narcotics.
ikats: (noun) plural of ikat; fabrics.
whorl: (noun) a spiral arrangement.
jinks: (noun) a prank.
tizzy: (noun, informal) a state of agitation.
weepy: (adjective) tearful.
posit: (verb) to assume as a fact.
marge: (noun) a given name; a margin.
vegan: (noun/adjective) a vegetarian; vegan.
clops: (noun) plural of clop; sounds.
numbs: (verb) third person singular present tense of numb; (noun) plural of numb.
reeks: (verb) third person singular present tense of reek.
rubes: (noun) plural of rube; naive people.
rower: (noun) a person who rows a boat.
biped: (noun/adjective) a two-footed animal; bipedal.
tiffs: (noun) plural of tiff; quarrels.
hocus: (noun/verb) hocus-pocus; to trick.
hammy: (adjective) exaggerated.
bunco: (noun/verb) a swindle; to swindle.
fixit: (noun, informal) a repair job.
tykes: (noun) plural of tyke; children.
chaws: (verb) third person singular present tense of chaw; (noun) plural of chaw.
yucky: (adjective, informal) unpleasant.
hokey: (adjective, informal) contrived or insincere.
resew: (verb) to sew again.
maven: (noun) an expert.
adman: (noun) an advertising executive.
scuzz: (noun, informal) dirt or grime.
slogs: (verb) third person singular present tense of slog; (noun) plural of slog.
souse: (noun/verb) a drunkard; to souse.
nacho: (noun) a nacho chip.
mimed: (verb) past tense of mime.
melds: (verb) third person singular present tense of meld.
boffo: (adjective, informal) excellent.
debit: (noun/verb) a deduction; to debit.
pinup: (noun) a pin-up girl.
vagus: (noun) the vagus nerve.
gulag: (noun) a labor camp.
randy: (adjective, informal) sexually excited.
bosun: (noun, nautical) boatswain.
educe: (verb) to elicit or extract something.
faxes: (noun) plural of fax.
auras: (noun) plural of aura.
pesto: (noun) a type of sauce.
antsy: (adjective, informal) restless.
betas: (noun) plural of beta.
fizzy: (adjective) containing bubbles.
dorky: (adjective, informal) awkward.
snits: (noun) plural of snit; fits of anger.
moxie: (noun, informal) courage.
thane: (noun) a nobleman (Anglo-Saxon).
mylar: (noun) a type of plastic film.
nobby: (adjective, informal) stylish.
gamin: (noun) a young, mischievous child.
gouty: (adjective) suffering from gout.
esses: (noun) plural of s; the letter 's'.
goyim: (noun, Yiddish) non-Jews.
paned: (verb) past tense of pane.
druid: (noun) a priest in ancient Celtic religion.
jades: (noun) plural of jade.
rehab: (noun/verb, abbreviation) rehabilitation; to rehabilitate.
gofer: (noun, informal) an errand runner.
tzars: (noun) plural of tsar.
octet: (noun) a group of eight.
homed: (verb) past tense of home; to home in on.
socko: (adjective, informal) excellent.
dorks: (noun) plural of dork; awkward people.
eared: (adjective) having ears.
anted: (verb) past tense of ante.
elide: (verb) to omit or suppress.
fazes: (verb) third person singular present tense of faze.
oxbow: (noun) a U-shaped bend in a river.
dowse: (verb) to search for water or minerals using a divining rod.
situs: (noun) position or location.
macaw: (noun) a type of parrot.
scone: (noun) a type of quick bread.
drily: (adverb) in a dry manner.
hyper: (adjective/prefix) excessively; hyperactive.
salsa: (noun) a type of dance; a type of sauce.
mooch: (verb/noun) to sponge; a mooch.
gated: (adjective) having gates.
unjam: (verb) to remove an obstruction.
lipid: (noun) a fatty substance.
mitre: (noun, British spelling) miter.
venal: (adjective) corrupt.
knish: (noun) a type of pastry.
ritzy: (adjective, informal) luxurious.
divas: (noun) plural of diva.
torus: (noun) a doughnut-shaped object.
mange: (noun) a skin disease.
dimer: (noun) a molecule consisting of two monomers.
recut: (verb) to cut again.
meson: (noun) a type of subatomic particle.
wined: (verb) past tense of wine.
fends: (verb) third person singular present tense of fend.
phage: (noun) a bacteriophage; a virus.
fiats: (noun) plural of fiat.
caulk: (verb/noun) to seal; caulking.
cavil: (verb) to raise trivial objections.
panty: (noun, informal) a pantyhose; a panty.
roans: (noun) plural of roan.
bilks: (verb) third person singular present tense of bilk.
hones: (verb) third person singular present tense of hone; (noun) plural of hone.
botch: (verb/noun) to spoil something; a botched job.
estop: (verb) to prevent something.
sully: (verb) to soil or stain.
sooth: (noun/verb/adjective) truth; to soothe; soothing.
gelds: (verb) third person singular present tense of geld.
ahold: (noun, informal) a hold.
raper: (noun) a person who rapes.
pager: (noun) a paging device.
fixer: (noun) a person who fixes things.
infix: (noun/verb) something inserted; to infix.
hicks: (noun) plural of hick.
tuxes: (noun) plural of tuxedo.
plebe: (noun) a commoner.
twits: (noun) plural of twit; silly people.
abash: (verb) to embarrass.
twixt: (preposition, archaic) between.
wacko: (noun/adjective, informal) a crazy person; crazy.
primp: (verb) to make oneself tidy.
nabla: (noun) a mathematical symbol.
girts: (noun) plural of girt; measurements.
miffs: (verb) third person singular present tense of miff; (noun) plural of miff.
emote: (verb) to express emotion.
xerox: (verb/noun) to photocopy; a photocopy.
rebid: (verb) to bid again.
shahs: (noun) plural of shah.
rutty: (adjective) full of ruts.
grout: (noun/verb) a type of cement; to grout.
grift: (noun/verb) a swindle; to swindle.
deify: (verb) to regard as a god.
biddy: (noun, informal) a woman; a hen.
kopek: (noun) a former Russian monetary unit.
semis: (noun) plural of semi.
bries: (noun) plural of brie; a type of cheese.
acmes: (noun) plural of acme.
piton: (noun) a metal spike.
hussy: (noun) a brazen woman.
torts: (noun) plural of tort.
disco: (noun) disco music; a discotheque.
whore: (noun, vulgar) a prostitute.
boozy: (adjective) drunk.
gibed: (verb) past tense of gibe.
vamps: (noun) plural of vamp; parts of shoes.
amour: (noun) love (French).
soppy: (adjective) excessively sentimental.
gonzo: (adjective/noun, informal) unconventional; a gonzo journalist.
durst: (verb, archaic) dared.
wader: (noun) a person who wades; a type of boot.
tutus: (noun) plural of tutu; ballet skirts.
perms: (noun) plural of perm.
catty: (adjective) spiteful; feline.
glitz: (noun) glamour; glitter.
brigs: (noun) plural of brig.
nerds: (noun) plural of nerd.
barmy: (adjective, informal) crazy.
gizmo: (noun, informal) a gadget.
owlet: (noun) a young owl.
sayer: (noun) a person who says.
molls: (noun) plural of moll.
shard: (noun) a broken piece of pottery.
whops: (verb) third person singular present tense of whop; (noun) plural of whop.
comps: (noun) plural of comp.
corer: (noun) a person or thing that cores.
colas: (noun) plural of cola.
matte: (adjective/noun) dull; matte paint.
droid: (noun) a robot (Star Wars).
ploys: (noun) plural of ploy.
vapid: (adjective) dull and uninspired.
cairn: (noun) a mound of stones.
deism: (noun) a belief in God.
mixup: (noun) confusion.
yikes: (interjection) an exclamation of surprise or fear.
prosy: (adjective) dull and tedious.
raker: (noun) a person who rakes.
flubs: (verb) third person singular present tense of flub; (noun) plural of flub.
whish: (noun/verb) a whooshing sound; to whoosh.
reify: (verb) to make something real or concrete.
craps: (noun) plural of crap; also a verb.
shags: (noun) plural of shag; also a verb.
clone: (noun/verb) an identical copy; to clone.
hazed: (verb) past tense of haze.
macho: (adjective/noun) aggressively masculine; a macho man.
recto: (noun) the right-hand page.
refix: (verb) to fix again.
drams: (noun) plural of dram.
biker: (noun) a person who rides a motorcycle.
aquas: (noun) plural of aqua.
porky: (adjective) plump.
doyen: (noun) a senior member of a group.
exude: (verb) to ooze out.
goofs: (noun) plural of goof; mistakes.
divvy: (verb, informal) to divide.
noels: (noun) plural of noel.
jived: (verb) past tense of jive.
hulky: (adjective) bulky; strong.
cager: (noun) a person who cages.
harpy: (noun) a mythical creature.
oldie: (noun, informal) an old song or movie.
vivas: (noun) plural of viva.
admix: (verb) to mix.
codas: (noun) plural of coda.
zilch: (noun, informal) nothing.
deist: (noun) a deist.
orcas: (noun) plural of orca; killer whales.
retro: (adjective/noun) relating to the past; a retro style.
pilaf: (noun) a type of rice dish.
parse: (verb) to analyze something.
rants: (noun) plural of rant.
zingy: (adjective) lively and exciting.
toddy: (noun) an alcoholic drink.
chiff: (noun) a type of fabric.
micro: (prefix) small; microscopic.
veeps: (noun, informal) vice-presidents.
girly: (adjective) like a girl.
nexus: (noun) a connection.
demos: (noun) plural of demo.
bibbs: (noun) plural of bib; bibs.
antes: (noun) plural of ante.
lulus: (noun) plural of lulu.
gnarl: (noun/verb) a knot in wood; to gnarl.
zippy: (adjective, informal) lively.
ivied: (adjective) covered in ivy.
epees: (noun) plural of épée; fencing swords.
wimps: (noun) plural of wimp; weak people.
tromp: (verb/noun) to trample; a trampling action.
grail: (noun) the Holy Grail.
yoyos: (noun) plural of yo-yo.
poufs: (noun) plural of pouf; cushions.
hales: (verb) third person singular present tense of hale; (noun) plural of hale.
roust: (verb) to rouse someone from sleep.
cabal: (noun) a secret political clique.
rawer: (adjective) more raw.
pampa: (noun) a vast, treeless plain.
mosey: (verb, informal) to stroll.
kefir: (noun) a fermented milk drink.
burgs: (noun) plural of burg.
unmet: (adjective) not met.
cuspy: (adjective, informal) cool; stylish.
boobs: (noun, informal) breasts.
boons: (noun) plural of boon.
hypes: (verb) third person singular present tense of hype; (noun) plural of hype.
dynes: (noun) plural of dyne; units of force.
nards: (noun) plural of nard; fragrant plants.
lanai: (noun) a veranda.
yogis: (noun) plural of yogi.
sepal: (noun) a part of a flower.
quark: (noun) a type of elementary particle.
toked: (verb, informal) smoked marijuana.
prate: (verb) to talk excessively.
ayins: (noun) plural of ayin; Hebrew letters.
hawed: (verb) past tense of haw.
swigs: (verb) third person singular present tense of swig; (noun) plural of swig.
vitas: (noun) plural of vita.
toker: (noun, informal) a marijuana smoker.
doper: (noun, informal) a drug user.
bossa: (noun) bossa nova music.
linty: (adjective) covered in lint.
foist: (verb) to impose something unwelcome.
mondo: (adjective, informal) excellent.
stash: (noun/verb) a hidden supply; to stash.
kayos: (verb) third person singular present tense of kayo; to knock out.
twerp: (noun, informal) a silly person.
zesty: (adjective) full of zest.
capon: (noun) a castrated rooster.
wimpy: (adjective, informal) weak.
rewed: (verb) past tense of rew.
fungo: (noun) a fungo bat.
tarot: (noun) a type of cards.
frosh: (noun) a freshman.
kabob: (noun) a kebab.
pinko: (noun, informal) a communist.
redid: (verb) past tense of redo.
mimeo: (noun) a mimeograph.
heist: (noun/verb) a robbery; to rob.
tarps: (noun) plural of tarp; tarpaulins.
lamas: (noun) plural of lama.
sutra: (noun) a Buddhist scripture.
dinar: (noun) a monetary unit.
whams: (noun) plural of wham; bangs.
busty: (adjective) having large breasts.
spays: (verb) third person singular present tense of spay.
mambo: (noun) a type of dance.
nabob: (noun) a wealthy person.
preps: (noun) plural of prep.
odour: (noun, British spelling) odor.
cabby: (noun) a taxi driver.
conks: (noun) plural of conk; also a verb.
sluff: (verb) to shed skin.
dados: (noun) plural of dado; decorative moldings.
houri: (noun) a beautiful woman (Islamic mythology).
swart: (adjective) dark-complexioned.
balms: (noun) plural of balm.
gutsy: (adjective) brave and determined.
faxed: (verb) past tense of fax.
egads: (interjection) an exclamation of surprise.
pushy: (adjective) aggressively assertive.
retry: (verb) to try again.
agora: (noun) a marketplace (ancient Greece).
drubs: (verb) third person singular present tense of drub.
daffy: (adjective, informal) silly.
chits: (noun) plural of chit.
mufti: (noun) civilian clothes.
karma: (noun) the sum of a person's actions in this and previous states of existence.
lotto: (noun) a lottery.
toffs: (noun) plural of toff; wealthy people.
burps: (noun) plural of burp.
deuce: (noun) the number two; a deuce in tennis.
zings: (verb) third person singular present tense of zing; (noun) plural of zing.
kappa: (noun) the tenth letter of the Greek alphabet.
clads: (verb) third person singular present tense of clad.
doggy: (adjective) like a dog.
duper: (noun) a deceiver.
scams: (noun) plural of scam.
ogler: (noun) a person who ogles.
mimes: (noun) plural of mime.
throe: (noun) a violent pang of pain.
zetas: (noun) plural of zeta.
waled: (verb) past tense of wale.
promo: (noun, abbreviation) promotion.
blats: (verb) third person singular present tense of blat; (noun) plural of blat.
muffs: (noun) plural of muff; also a verb.
oinks: (noun) plural of oink.
viand: (noun) an item of food.
coset: (noun) a mathematical term.
finks: (noun) plural of fink.
faddy: (adjective) whimsical; easily changing.
minis: (noun) plural of mini.
snafu: (noun, informal) a mess.
sauna: (noun) a type of bath.
usury: (noun) the practice of lending money at exorbitant interest rates.
muxes: (noun) plural of mux; multiplexers.
craws: (verb) third person singular present tense of craw; (noun) plural of craw.
stats: (noun) plural of stat; statistics.
condo: (noun, short form) condominium.
coxes: (verb) third person singular present tense of cox; (noun) plural of cox.
loopy: (adjective, informal) crazy.
dorms: (noun) plural of dorm.
ascot: (noun) a type of necktie.
dippy: (adjective, informal) silly.
execs: (noun) plural of exec.
dopey: (adjective) sleepy; stupid.
envoi: (noun) a concluding part of a poem or letter.
umpty: (adjective, informal) many.
gismo: (noun, informal) a gadget.
fazed: (verb) past tense of faze.
strop: (noun/verb) a razor strop; to strop.
jives: (noun) plural of jive; also a verb.
slims: (noun) plural of slim.
batik: (noun) a type of fabric.
pings: (noun) plural of ping.
sonly: (adverb) only son.
leggo: (verb, informal) let go.
pekoe: (noun) a type of tea.
prawn: (noun) a type of shrimp.
luaus: (noun) plural of luau; Hawaiian feasts.
campy: (adjective) exaggeratedly theatrical.
oodle: (noun, informal) a large amount.
prexy: (noun, informal) president.
proms: (noun) plural of prom.
touts: (noun) plural of tout.
ogles: (verb) third person singular present tense of ogle.
tweet: (noun/verb) a short message; to tweet.
toady: (noun/verb) a flatterer; toady.
naiad: (noun) a water nymph.
hider: (noun) a person who hides.
nuked: (verb) past tense of nuke.
fatso: (noun, informal) a fat person.
sluts: (noun) plural of slut.
obits: (noun) plural of obit; obituaries.
narcs: (noun, informal) narcotics officers.
tyros: (noun) plural of tyro; beginners.
delis: (noun) plural of deli.
wooer: (noun) a person who woos.
hyped: (verb) past tense of hype.
poset: (noun) a type of drink.
byway: (noun) a side road.
texas: (noun) Texas (the state).
scrod: (noun) a type of fish.
avows: (verb) third person singular present tense of avow.
futon: (noun) a type of mattress.
torte: (noun) a type of cake.
tuple: (noun) a mathematical term.
carom: (noun/verb) a type of billiard shot; to carom.
kebab: (noun) a type of food.
tamps: (verb) third person singular present tense of tamp; (noun) plural of tamp.
jilts: (verb) third person singular present tense of jilt; (noun) plural of jilt.
duals: (noun) plural of dual.
artsy: (adjective, informal) artistic.
repro: (noun, abbreviation) reproduction.
modem: (noun) a device for connecting to the internet.
toped: (verb) past tense of tope.
psych: (verb/noun/interjection) to trick; psychology; an exclamation.
sicko: (noun, informal) a sick person; someone obsessed.
klutz: (noun, informal) a clumsy person.
tarns: (noun) plural of tarn.
coxed: (verb) past tense of cox.
drays: (noun) plural of dray; carts.
cloys: (verb) third person singular present tense of cloy.
anded: (verb) past tense of and.
piker: (noun, informal) a small-time gambler.
aimer: (noun) a person who aims.
suras: (noun) plural of sura.
limos: (noun) plural of limo.
flack: (noun/verb) a publicist; to flack.
hapax: (noun) a word occurring only once.
dutch: (adjective/noun) relating to the Netherlands; a Dutch person.
mucky: (adjective) dirty.
shire: (noun) a county (British).
klieg: (noun) a type of spotlight.
staph: (noun, abbreviation) staphylococcus.
layup: (noun) a type of basketball shot.
tokes: (noun) plural of toke.
axing: (verb) present participle of axe.
toper: (noun) a heavy drinker.
duvet: (noun) a type of quilt.
cowry: (noun) a type of shell.
profs: (noun) plural of prof.
blahs: (noun) plural of blah.
addle: (verb) to confuse.
sudsy: (adjective) covered in suds.
batty: (adjective, informal) crazy.
coifs: (noun) plural of coif; hairstyles.
suety: (adjective) containing suet.
gabby: (adjective, informal) talkative.
hafta: (verb, informal) have to.
pitas: (noun) plural of pita; a type of bread.
gouda: (noun) a type of cheese.
deice: (verb) to remove ice.
taupe: (adjective/noun) a grayish-brown color.
topes: (noun) plural of tope.
duchy: (noun) the territory of a duke.
nitro: (noun, abbreviation) nitroglycerin.
carny: (noun/adjective) a carnival worker; relating to a carnival.
limey: (noun/adjective, informal) a British person; lime-flavored.
orals: (noun) plural of oral.
hirer: (noun) a person who hires.
taxer: (noun) a person who taxes.
roils: (verb) third person singular present tense of roil.
ruble: (noun) a Russian monetary unit.
elate: (verb) to make someone feel happy and proud.
dolor: (noun) pain or suffering.
wryer: (adjective) more wry.
snots: (noun, informal) mucus.
quais: (noun) plural of quai.
coked: (verb) past tense of coke.
gimel: (noun) the third letter of the Hebrew alphabet.
gorse: (noun) a type of prickly shrub.
minas: (noun) plural of mina; units of currency.
goest: (verb, archaic) goes.
agape: (adjective/adverb) open-mouthed; with one's mouth open.
manta: (noun) a type of ray; a blanket.
jings: (interjection, informal) an exclamation.
iliac: (adjective) relating to the ilium.
admen: (noun) plural of adman.
offen: (adverb, archaic) often.
cills: (noun) plural of cill.
offal: (noun) waste parts of a butchered animal.
lotta: (noun, informal) a lot of.
bolas: (noun) a type of weapon.
thwap: (noun/verb) a thudding sound; to thwap.
alway: (adverb, archaic) always.
boggy: (adjective) marshy.
donna: (noun) a woman (Italian).
locos: (noun) plural of loco.
belay: (verb) to secure a rope.
gluey: (adjective) sticky.
bitsy: (adjective, informal) tiny.
mimsy: (adjective, informal) weak and pathetic.
hilar: (adjective) relating to the hilum.
outta: (preposition/adverb, informal) out of.
vroom: (noun/verb) the sound of an engine; to vroom.
fetal: (adjective) relating to a fetus.
raths: (noun) plural of rath.
renal: (adjective) relating to the kidneys.
dyads: (noun) plural of dyad.
crocs: (noun) plural of croc; crocodiles.
vires: (noun, plural of vis) strength (Latin).
culpa: (noun) guilt (Latin).
kivas: (noun) plural of kiva.
feist: (verb) to fight.
teats: (noun) plural of teat; nipples.
thats: (noun) that's.
yawls: (noun) plural of yawl; boats.
whens: (noun) plural of when.
abaca: (noun) a type of fiber.
ohhhh: (interjection) an exclamation.
aphis: (noun) plural of aphid.
fusty: (adjective) musty; stale.
eclat: (noun) dazzling brilliance.
perdu: (adjective, French) lost.
mayst: (verb, archaic) may.
exeat: (noun) permission to leave.
molly: (noun) a given name.
supra: (prefix) above; superior.
wetly: (adverb) in a wet manner.
plasm: (noun) plasma.
buffa: (noun) buffoon.
semen: (noun) the fluid containing spermatozoa.
pukka: (adjective) genuine; excellent.
tagua: (noun) a type of nut.
paras: (noun) plural of para.
stoat: (noun) a type of weasel.
secco: (adjective) dry (Italian).
carte: (noun) menu (French).
haute: (adjective, French) high.
molal: (adjective) relating to molality.
shads: (noun) plural of shad.
forma: (noun) form (Latin).
ovoid: (adjective/noun) egg-shaped; an ovoid.
pions: (noun) plural of pion.
modus: (noun) a method (Latin).
bueno: (adjective, Spanish) good.
rheum: (noun) mucus.
scurf: (noun) dandruff.
parer: (noun) a person who pares.
ephah: (noun) an ancient unit of dry measure.
doest: (verb, archaic) does.
sprue: (noun) a type of mold.
flams: (noun) plural of flam; showy displays.
molto: (adverb, Italian) very; much.
dieth: (verb, archaic) dies.
choos: (verb) archaic spelling of choose.
miked: (verb) past tense of mike.
bronx: (noun) Bronx, a borough of New York City.
goopy: (adjective) sticky and messy.
bally: (adverb, informal) very.
plumy: (adjective) like a plume.
moony: (adjective) moon-like; dreamy.
morts: (noun) plural of mort.
yourn: (pronoun, archaic) yours.
bipod: (noun) a two-legged support.
spume: (noun) foam.
algal: (adjective) relating to algae.
ambit: (noun) the scope or extent of something.
mucho: (adjective, Spanish) much; many.
spued: (verb) past tense of spew.
dozer: (noun) a bulldozer.
harum: (adjective, archaic) troublesome; chaotic.
groat: (noun) an oat.
skint: (adjective, informal) penniless.
laude: (noun) praise (Latin).
thrum: (verb/noun) to vibrate; a humming sound.
pappy: (adjective, informal) soft; pulpy.
oncet: (adverb, archaic) once.
rimed: (verb) past tense of rime.
gigue: (noun) a type of dance.
limed: (verb) past tense of lime.
plein: (adjective, French) full.
redly: (adverb) in a red manner.
humpf: (interjection) expressing displeasure.
lites: (noun) plural of lite.
seest: (verb, archaic) see.
grebe: (noun) a type of bird.
absit: (verb, Latin) let it be far from.
thanx: (noun, informal) thanks.
pshaw: (interjection) expressing contempt.
yawps: (noun) plural of yawp; cries.
plats: (noun) plural of plat.
payed: (verb, archaic) paid.
areal: (adjective) relating to area.
tilth: (noun) the state of cultivated land.
youse: (pronoun, informal) you (plural).
gwine: (verb, dialect) going.
thees: (pronoun, archaic) thee.
watsa: (noun, informal) what's that.
lento: (adverb, Italian) slow.
spitz: (noun) a type of dog.
yawed: (verb) past tense of yaw.
gipsy: (noun) a gypsy; a member of a wandering group of people.
sprat: (noun) a small fish.
cornu: (noun) horn (Latin).
amahs: (noun) plural of amah; a nursemaid.
blowy: (adjective) windy.
wahoo: (interjection/noun) an exclamation of joy; a type of fish.
lubra: (noun, offensive) an Aboriginal woman.
mecum: (adverb, Latin) with me.
whooo: (interjection) an exclamation.
coqui: (noun) a type of frog.
sabra: (noun) a native-born Israeli.
edema: (noun) a swelling.
mrads: (noun) plural of mrad; units of angle.
dicot: (noun) a dicotyledonous plant.
astro: (prefix) relating to stars.
kited: (verb) past tense of kite.
ouzel: (noun) a type of bird.
didos: (noun) plural of dido.
grata: (adjective, Latin) welcome; pleasing.
bonne: (adjective/noun, French) good; a good person.
axmen: (noun) plural of axman.
klunk: (noun/verb) a dull, heavy sound; to klunk.
summa: (noun) summary (Latin).
laves: (verb) third person singular present tense of lave; (noun) plural of lave.
purls: (verb) third person singular present tense of purl; (noun) plural of purl.
yawny: (adjective) causing a yawn.
teary: (adjective) tearful.
masse: (noun) a mass; a stroke (billiards).
largo: (adverb, Italian) slow.
bazar: (noun) a bazaar.
pssst: (interjection) used to attract attention quietly.
sylph: (noun) a mythical creature.
lulab: (noun) lullaby.
toque: (noun) a type of hat.
fugit: (verb, Latin) flees.
plunk: (verb/noun) to drop something; a plunking sound.
ortho: (prefix) straight; correct.
lucre: (noun) money or profit.
cooch: (noun, vulgar) vulva.
whipt: (verb) past tense of whip.
folky: (adjective) folk-like.
tyres: (noun) plural of tyre.
wheee: (interjection) an exclamation of excitement.
corky: (adjective) like cork.
injun: (noun, offensive) a Native American.
solon: (noun) a wise lawmaker.
didot: (noun) a type of typeface.
kerfs: (noun) plural of kerf; cuts.
rayed: (verb) past tense of ray.
wassa: (noun, informal) what's that.
chile: (noun) a chili pepper; a child (dialect).
begat: (verb) past tense of beget.
nippy: (adjective) quick; cold.
litre: (noun, British spelling) liter.
magna: (noun) great; powerful (Latin).
rebox: (verb) to box again.
hydro: (prefix) water; hydrogen.
milch: (adjective) giving milk.
brent: (noun) a type of goose.
gyves: (noun) plural of gyve; shackles.
lazed: (verb) past tense of laze.
feued: (verb) past tense of feud.
mavis: (noun) a song thrush.
inapt: (adjective) inappropriate.
baulk: (verb, British spelling) to balk.
casus: (noun) a case (Latin).
scrum: (noun) a type of rugby formation.
wised: (verb) past tense of wise.
fossa: (noun) a pit or ditch; a bone.
dower: (noun) a widow's inheritance.
kyrie: (noun) a prayer (Greek).
bhoys: (noun, informal) boys.
scuse: (verb, informal) excuse.
feuar: (noun) a tenant farmer.
ohmic: (adjective) relating to ohms.
juste: (adjective, French) just.
ukase: (noun) an official decree (Russian).
beaux: (noun) plural of beau.
tusky: (adjective) having tusks.
orate: (verb) to speak formally.
musta: (verb, informal) must have.
lardy: (adjective) containing lard.
intra: (prefix) within.
quiff: (noun) a type of hairstyle.
epsom: (noun) Epsom salts.
neath: (preposition, archaic) beneath.
ocher: (noun, alternative spelling) ochre.
tared: (verb) past tense of tare.
homme: (noun, French) man.
mezzo: (adjective/noun, Italian) half; mezzo-soprano.
corms: (noun) plural of corm; plant stems.
psoas: (noun) a muscle in the hip.
beaky: (adjective) having a beak.
terry: (adjective/noun) a type of fabric; a given name.
infra: (prefix) below; beneath.
spivs: (noun) plural of spiv; swindlers.
tuans: (noun) plural of tuan.
belli: (noun, plural of bellum) war (Latin).
bergs: (noun) plural of berg.
anima: (noun) soul (Latin).
weirs: (noun) plural of weir.
mahua: (noun) a type of tree.
scops: (noun) plural of scop; bards.
manse: (noun) a large house.
titre: (noun, British spelling) titer.
curia: (noun) a papal court.
kebob: (noun) a kebab.
cycad: (noun) a type of plant.
talky: (adjective) talkative.
fucks: (noun) plural of fuck.
tapis: (noun) carpet (French).
amide: (noun) an organic compound.
dolce: (adjective, Italian) sweet.
sloes: (noun) plural of sloe; berries.
jakes: (noun) plural of jake; toilets.
russe: (noun) Russia (French).
blash: (verb) to bleach.
tutti: (adjective/noun, Italian) all; tutti frutti.
pruta: (noun) a small coin.
panga: (noun) a type of boat; a machete.
blebs: (noun) plural of bleb; blisters.
tench: (noun) a type of fish.
swarf: (noun) metal shavings.
herem: (noun) a harem.
missy: (noun, informal) a girl.
merse: (verb) to immerse.
pawky: (adjective) sly and humorous.
limen: (noun) a threshold.
vivre: (verb, French) to live.
chert: (noun) a type of rock.
unsee: (verb) to unsee.
tiros: (noun) plural of tiro.
brack: (noun) salty water.
foots: (verb) third person singular present tense of foot; (noun) plural of foot.
welsh: (verb) to cheat.
fosse: (noun) a ditch; a pit.
knops: (noun) plural of knop; knobs.
ileum: (noun) part of the small intestine.
noire: (adjective, French) black.
firma: (noun) firm (Latin).
podgy: (adjective) plump.
laird: (noun) a landowner (Scottish).
thunk: (verb/noun) to think; a thudding sound.
shute: (noun) a chute.
rowan: (noun) a type of tree.
shoji: (noun) a type of screen.
poesy: (noun) poetry.
uncap: (verb) to remove a cap.
fames: (noun) plural of fame.
glees: (noun) plural of glee.
costa: (noun) coast (Italian).
turps: (noun, informal) turpentine.
fores: (noun) plural of fore.
solum: (noun) soil (Latin).
imago: (noun) the adult stage of an insect.
byres: (noun) plural of byre; cattle sheds.
fondu: (noun) fondue.
coney: (noun) a rabbit.
polis: (noun) a city (Greek).
dictu: (noun, abbreviation) dictum.
kraal: (noun) a village (South Africa).
sherd: (noun) a broken piece of pottery.
mumbo: (noun, informal) meaningless talk.
wroth: (adjective, archaic) angry.
chars: (verb) third person singular present tense of char; (noun) plural of char.
unbox: (verb) to open a box.
vacuo: (adverb, Latin) in a vacuum.
slued: (verb) past tense of slew.
weest: (adjective, archaic) smallest.
hades: (noun) the underworld (Greek).
wiled: (verb) past tense of wile.
syncs: (verb) third person singular present tense of sync; (noun) plural of sync.
muser: (noun) a person who muses.
excon: (noun, informal) an ex-convict.
hoars: (noun) plural of hoarse.
sibyl: (noun) a prophetess.
passe: (adjective, French) old-fashioned.
joeys: (noun) plural of joey.
lotsa: (noun, informal) a lot of.
lepta: (noun) plural of lepton; subatomic particles.
shays: (noun) plural of shay.
bocks: (noun) plural of bock.
endue: (verb) to endow.
darer: (noun) a person who dares.
nones: (noun) plural of none.
ileus: (noun) a bowel obstruction.
plash: (noun/verb) a splash; to splash.
busby: (noun) a type of hat.
wheal: (noun) a raised mark on the skin.
buffo: (adjective/noun) comic; a buffoon.
yobbo: (noun, informal) a hooligan.
biles: (noun) plural of bile.
poxes: (noun) plural of pox.
rooty: (adjective) full of roots.
licit: (adjective) permitted; lawful.
terce: (noun) a third.
bromo: (noun/prefix) bromide; brominated.
hayey: (adjective) like hay.
dweeb: (noun, informal) a nerd.
imbed: (verb) to embed.
saran: (noun) a type of plastic wrap.
bruit: (verb/noun) to spread news; a rumor.
punky: (adjective) like punk.
softs: (noun) plural of soft.
biffs: (noun) plural of biff; blows.
loppy: (adjective, informal) floppy; clumsy.
agars: (noun) plural of agar.
aquae: (noun, plural of aqua) water (Latin).
livre: (noun) a former French monetary unit.
biome: (noun) a large geographical area.
bunds: (noun) plural of bund.
shews: (noun) plural of shew.
diems: (noun) plural of diem; days.
ginny: (noun) a given name.
degum: (verb) to remove gum.
polos: (noun) plural of polo.
desex: (verb) to castrate or spay.
unman: (verb) to emasculate.
dungy: (adjective) full of dung.
vitam: (noun, abbreviation) vitamin.
wedgy: (adjective, informal) awkward.
glebe: (noun) land belonging to a church.
apers: (noun) plural of aper; primates.
ridgy: (adjective) having ridges.
roids: (noun, informal) steroids.
wifey: (noun, informal) wife.
vapes: (verb) third person singular present tense of vape; (noun) plural of vape.
whoas: (interjection) whoa.
bunko: (noun) a swindle.
yolky: (adjective) containing yolk.
ulnas: (noun) plural of ulna.
reeky: (adjective) foul-smelling.
bodge: (verb/noun) to repair clumsily; a botched job.
brant: (noun) a type of goose.
davit: (noun) a crane-like device.
deque: (noun) a double-ended queue.
liker: (noun) a person who likes.
jenny: (noun) a female donkey.
tacts: (noun) plural of tact.
fulls: (noun) plural of full.
treap: (noun) a tree-based data structure.
ligne: (noun) a line (French).
acked: (verb) past tense of ack; to acknowledge.
refry: (verb) to fry again.
vower: (noun) a person who vows.
aargh: (interjection) an exclamation of frustration or anger.
churl: (noun) a rude person.
momma: (noun) mother (informal).
gaols: (noun) plural of gaol.
whump: (noun/verb) a thumping sound; to whump.
arras: (noun) tapestry.
marls: (noun) plural of marl.
tiler: (noun) a person who tiles.
grogs: (noun) plural of grog; drinks.
memes: (noun) plural of meme.
midis: (noun) plural of midi.
tided: (verb) past tense of tide.
haler: (noun) a person who hauls.
duces: (noun) plural of duce.
twiny: (adjective) like twins.
poste: (noun) post (French).
unrig: (verb) to dismantle.
prise: (verb/noun) to pry; a prying action.
drabs: (noun) plural of drab.
quids: (noun) plural of quid.
facer: (noun) a person's face; a problem.
spier: (noun) a spy.
baric: (adjective) relating to pressure.
geoid: (noun) the shape of the earth.
remap: (verb) to map again.
trier: (noun) a person who tries.
gunks: (noun) plural of gunk; dirt.
steno: (noun, abbreviation) stenographer.
stoma: (noun) a mouth-like opening.
airer: (noun) a person or thing that airs.
ovate: (adjective) egg-shaped.
torah: (noun) the Jewish scriptures.
apian: (adjective) relating to bees.
smuts: (noun) plural of smut; also a verb.
pocks: (noun) plural of pock; marks on the skin.
yurts: (noun) plural of yurt; tents.
exurb: (noun) a residential area beyond a suburb.
defog: (verb) to remove fog.
nuder: (adjective) more nude.
bosky: (adjective) wooded.
nimbi: (noun) plural of nimbus; clouds.
mothy: (adjective) full of moths.
joyed: (verb) past tense of joy.
labia: (noun) plural of labium; lips.
pards: (noun, informal) friends.
jammy: (adjective, informal) lucky.
bigly: (adverb, informal) greatly.
faxer: (noun) a fax machine.
hoppy: (adjective) like hops.
nurbs: (noun) non-uniform rational B-splines.
cotes: (noun) plural of cote.
dishy: (adjective, informal) attractive.
vised: (verb) past tense of vise.
celeb: (noun, informal) celebrity.
pismo: (noun) a type of clam.
casas: (noun) plural of casa.
withs: (noun) plural of with.
dodgy: (adjective, informal) suspicious.
scudi: (noun) plural of scudo; former Italian coins.
mungs: (noun) plural of mung; mung beans.
muons: (noun) plural of muon.
ureas: (noun) plural of urea.
ioctl: (noun) an ioctrl command.
unhip: (adjective, informal) uncool.
krone: (noun) a monetary unit.
sager: (adjective) more sage.
verst: (noun) a Russian unit of length.
expat: (noun, informal) expatriate.
gronk: (noun, informal) a clumsy person.
uvula: (noun) the fleshy extension at the back of the soft palate.
shawm: (noun) a type of wind instrument.
bilgy: (adjective) relating to bilge.
braes: (noun) plural of brae; hillsides.
cento: (noun) a literary composition.
webby: (adjective) web-like.
lippy: (adjective, informal) insolent.
gamic: (adjective) relating to gametes.
lordy: (interjection, informal) Lord.
mazed: (verb) past tense of maze.
tings: (noun) plural of ting.
shoat: (noun) a young pig.
faery: (noun) a fairy.
wirer: (noun) a person who wires.
diazo: (noun/adjective) a diazo compound.
carer: (noun) a person who cares for others.
rater: (noun) a person who rates.
greps: (verb) third person singular present tense of grep; (noun) plural of grep.
rente: (noun) rent (French).
zloty: (noun) a Polish monetary unit.
viers: (noun) plural of vier; four (German).
unapt: (adjective) inappropriate.
poops: (verb) third person singular present tense of poop; (noun) plural of poop.
fecal: (adjective) relating to feces.
kepis: (noun) plural of kepi; military caps.
taxon: (noun) a taxonomic group.
eyers: (noun) plural of eyer; things that eye.
wonts: (noun) plural of wont.
spina: (noun) spine (Latin).
stoae: (noun) plural of stoa; porches.
yenta: (noun) a gossipy woman.
pooey: (adjective, informal) unpleasant.
buret: (noun) a type of laboratory equipment.
japan: (verb) to lacquer; Japan (the country).
bedew: (verb) to cover in dew.
hafts: (noun) plural of haft; handles.
selfs: (noun) plural of self.
oared: (adjective) having oars.
herby: (adjective) like herbs.
pryer: (noun) a person who pries.
oakum: (noun) fibers from old rope.
dinks: (noun) plural of dink; small boats.
titty: (noun, vulgar) breast.
sepoy: (noun) an Indian soldier.
penes: (noun) plural of penis.
fusee: (noun) a type of match.
winey: (adjective) like wine.
gimps: (noun) plural of gimp; limping people.
nihil: (noun) nothing (Latin).
rille: (noun) a groove or channel.
giber: (noun) a person who gibes.
ousel: (noun) a type of bird.
umiak: (noun) a large Eskimo boat.
cuppy: (adjective) like a cup.
hames: (noun) plural of hame; parts of a harness.
shits: (noun) plural of shit.
azine: (noun) a type of chemical compound.
glads: (noun) plural of glad.
tacet: (adverb, musical) silent.
bumph: (noun) nonsense.
coyer: (adjective) more coy.
honky: (noun/adjective, offensive) a white person; honky-tonk.
gamer: (noun) a person who plays games.
gooky: (adjective, informal) sticky.
waspy: (adjective) like a wasp.
sedgy: (adjective) grassy; marshy.
bents: (noun) plural of bent.
varia: (noun, plural of varium) various things (Latin).
djinn: (noun) a genie.
junco: (noun) a type of bird.
pubic: (adjective) relating to the pubis.
wilco: (adverb, informal) will comply.
lazes: (verb) third person singular present tense of laze.
idyls: (noun) plural of idyll.
lupus: (noun) a type of disease.
rives: (verb) third person singular present tense of rive.
snood: (noun) a type of hair net.
schmo: (noun, informal) a fool.
spazz: (noun/verb, informal) a clumsy person; to spazz out.
finis: (noun) the end (Latin).
noter: (noun) a person who notes.
pavan: (noun) a type of dance.
orbed: (adjective) spherical.
bates: (verb) third person singular present tense of bate; (noun) plural of bate.
pipet: (noun) a pipette.
baddy: (noun, informal) a bad person.
goers: (noun) plural of goer.
shako: (noun) a type of military hat.
stets: (noun) plural of stet; instructions to retain something.
sebum: (noun) an oily secretion.
seeth: (verb) to boil; to be angry.
lobar: (adjective) relating to lobes.
raver: (noun) a person who raves.
ajuga: (noun) a type of plant.
riced: (verb) past tense of rice.
velds: (noun) plural of veldt.
dribs: (noun) plural of drib; small amounts.
ville: (noun) a village (French).
dhows: (noun) plural of dhow; sailing vessels.
unsew: (verb) to unpick stitches.
halma: (noun) a type of board game.
krona: (noun) a monetary unit (Icelandic).
limby: (adjective) having limbs.
jiffs: (noun) plural of jiff; short times.
treys: (noun) plural of trey; threes.
bauds: (noun) plural of baud.
pffft: (interjection) expressing dismissal.
mimer: (noun) a person who mimes.
plebs: (noun) plural of plebeian; common people.
caner: (noun) a person who canes.
jiber: (noun) a person who jibes.
cuppa: (noun, informal) a cup of tea.
washy: (adjective) weak; watery.
chuff: (noun/verb) a puff of smoke; to chuff.
unarm: (verb) to disarm.
yukky: (adjective, informal) yucky; unpleasant.
styes: (noun) plural of sty; infected glands of the eyelid.
waker: (noun) a person who wakes.
flaks: (noun) plural of flak.
maces: (noun) plural of mace.
rimes: (noun) plural of rime.
gimpy: (adjective, informal) lame.
guano: (noun) bird or bat droppings.
liras: (noun) plural of lira.
kapok: (noun) a type of fiber.
scuds: (verb) third person singular present tense of scud; (noun) plural of scud.
bwana: (noun) master (Swahili).
oring: (noun) an O-ring.
aider: (noun) a person who aids.
prier: (noun) a person who pries.
klugy: (adjective, informal) clumsy.
monte: (noun) Monte Carlo.
golem: (noun) a mythical creature.
velar: (adjective) relating to the velum.
firer: (noun) a person who fires.
pieta: (noun) a depiction of Mary holding Jesus.
umbel: (noun) a type of flower.
campo: (noun) a field (Spanish).
unpeg: (verb) to unfasten.
fovea: (noun) a pit in the retina.
abeam: (adverb) at right angles.
boson: (noun) a type of subatomic particle.
asker: (noun) a person who asks.
goths: (noun) plural of goth; Goths.
vocab: (noun, abbreviation) vocabulary.
vined: (verb) past tense of vine.
trows: (verb) third person singular present tense of trow; (noun) plural of trow.
tikis: (noun) plural of tiki; Polynesian idols.
loper: (noun) a person who lopes.
indie: (adjective/noun) independent; an indie film.
boffs: (verb) third person singular present tense of boff; (noun) plural of boff.
spang: (adverb/noun) exactly; a spang.
grapy: (adjective) like grapes.
tater: (noun, informal) potato.
ichor: (noun) a fluid associated with wounds (Greek mythology).
kilty: (adjective) wearing a kilt.
lochs: (noun) plural of loch.
supes: (noun, informal) supernumeraries.
degas: (verb) third person singular present tense of degas.
flics: (noun, informal) films.
torsi: (noun) plural of torso.
beths: (noun) plural of beth.
weber: (noun) a unit of magnetic flux.
resaw: (verb) to saw again.
lawny: (adjective) like a lawn.
coven: (noun) a gathering of witches.
mujik: (noun) a peasant (Russian).
relet: (verb) to let again.
therm: (noun) a unit of heat.
heigh: (interjection, archaic) an exclamation.
shnor: (verb) to snore.
trued: (verb) past tense of true.
zayin: (noun) the seventh letter of the Hebrew alphabet.
liest: (verb) second person singular present tense of lie.
barfs: (verb) third person singular present tense of barf; (noun) plural of barf.
bassi: (noun) plural of basso.
qophs: (noun) plural of qoph; Hebrew letters.
roily: (adjective) turbulent; restless.
flabs: (noun) plural of flab; loose flesh.
punny: (adjective) full of puns.
okras: (noun) plural of okra.
hanks: (noun) plural of hank.
dipso: (noun, informal) a drunkard.
nerfs: (noun) plural of nerf; to nerf.
fauns: (noun) plural of faun; mythical creatures.
calla: (noun) a type of flower.
pseud: (noun/adjective, abbreviation) pseudonym; pseudo.
lurer: (noun) a person who lures.
magus: (noun) a wise man (Greek).
obeah: (noun) a type of magic.
atria: (noun) plural of atrium; chambers of the heart.
twink: (noun, informal) a young, attractive man.
palmy: (adjective) prosperous; palm-like.
pocky: (adjective) covered in pocks.
pends: (verb) third person singular present tense of pend; (noun) plural of pend.
recta: (noun) rectum (Latin).
plonk: (verb/noun) to drop something; a plonking sound.
slaws: (noun) plural of slaw; coleslaw.
keens: (verb) third person singular present tense of keen; (noun) plural of keen.
nicad: (noun) a nickel-cadmium battery.
pones: (noun) plural of pone; cornbread.
inker: (noun) a person who inks.
whews: (interjection) expressing relief.
groks: (verb) to understand intuitively.
mosts: (noun) plural of most.
trews: (noun) trousers (Scottish).
ulnar: (adjective) relating to the ulna.
gyppy: (adjective, informal) relating to gypsies.
cocas: (noun) plural of coca.
expos: (noun) plural of expo.
eruct: (verb) to belch.
oiler: (noun) a person who oils; a container for oil.
vacua: (noun) plural of vacuum.
dreck: (noun) rubbish.
dater: (noun) a person who dates.
arums: (noun) plural of arum; plants.
tubal: (adjective) relating to tubes.
voxel: (noun) a unit of volume.
dixit: (verb, Latin) said.
beery: (adjective) like beer.
assai: (adverb, Italian) very; much.
lades: (verb) third person singular present tense of lade.
actin: (noun) a protein.
ghoti: (noun) a spelling puzzle.
buzzy: (adjective) buzzing.
meads: (noun) plural of mead.
grody: (adjective, informal) disgusting.
ribby: (adjective) having ribs.
clews: (noun) plural of clew; clues.
creme: (noun) cream (French).
email: (noun) electronic mail.
pyxie: (noun) a pixie; a fairy.
kulak: (noun) a wealthy peasant (Russian).
bocci: (noun) bocce ball.
rived: (verb) past tense of rive.
duddy: (adjective, informal) plump.
hoper: (noun) a person who hopes.
lapin: (noun) rabbit (French).
wonks: (noun) plural of wonk; experts.
petri: (adjective) relating to Petri dishes.
phial: (noun) a small bottle.
fugal: (adjective) relating to fugues.
holon: (noun) a whole that is part of a larger whole.
boomy: (adjective) having a booming sound.
duomo: (noun) a cathedral (Italian).
musos: (noun) plural of muso; musicians.
shier: (adjective) more shy.
hayer: (noun) a person who hays.
porgy: (noun) a type of fish.
hived: (verb) past tense of hive.
litho: (noun/prefix, abbreviation) lithography; relating to stone.
fisty: (adjective) like a fist.
stagy: (adjective) artificial; theatrical.
luvya: (verb, informal) love you.
maria: (noun) a given name.
smogs: (noun) plural of smog.
asana: (noun) a yoga posture.
yogic: (adjective) relating to yoga.
slomo: (noun, informal) slow motion.
fawny: (adjective) fawn-like; brown.
amine: (noun) an organic compound.
wefts: (noun) plural of weft.
gonad: (noun) an organ that produces gametes.
twirp: (noun, informal) a silly person.
brava: (interjection) bravo (feminine).
plyer: (noun) a tool for bending metal.
fermi: (adjective/noun) relating to Enrico Fermi; a unit of length.
loges: (noun) plural of loge; boxes in a theater.
niter: (noun) potassium nitrate.
revet: (verb) to protect a bank with a retaining wall.
unate: (adjective) having one.
gyved: (verb) past tense of gyve.
totty: (noun, informal) a pretty girl.
zappy: (adjective, informal) lively.
honer: (noun) a person who hones.
giros: (noun) plural of giro.
dicer: (noun) a person who dices.
calks: (verb) third person singular present tense of calk; (noun) plural of calk.
luxes: (noun) plural of lux; units of illumination.
monad: (noun) a single unit.
cruft: (noun, informal) rubbish.
quoin: (noun) a corner stone.
fumer: (noun) a smoker.
amped: (adjective, informal) excited.
shlep: (verb/noun, Yiddish) to carry; a difficult task.
vinca: (noun) a type of plant.
yahoo: (noun) a yahoo; a rough person; a type of search engine.
vulva: (noun) the external female genitalia.
zooey: (adjective, informal) eccentric.
dryad: (noun) a tree nymph.
nix: (noun/verb) nothing; to veto.
moper: (noun) a person who mopes.
iambs: (noun) plural of iamb; metrical feet.
lunes: (noun) plural of lune; crescent shapes.
nudie: (noun, informal) a nude photograph.
limns: (verb) to draw or paint.
weals: (noun) plural of weal.
nohow: (adverb, dialect) in no way.
miaow: (noun/verb) a cat's cry; to mew.
gouts: (noun) plural of gout.
mynas: (noun) plural of myna; birds.
mazer: (noun) a large drinking bowl.
kikes: (noun, offensive) Jewish people.
oxeye: (noun) a type of flower.
stoup: (noun) a vessel for holy water.
jujus: (noun) plural of juju; charms.
debar: (verb) to exclude.
pubes: (noun) pubic hair.
taels: (noun) plural of tael; units of weight.
defun: (verb) to define a function.
rands: (noun) plural of rand.
blear: (verb/noun) to blur; a blurred vision.
paver: (noun) a person who paves.
goosy: (adjective, informal) silly.
sprog: (noun, informal) a child.
oleos: (noun) plural of oleo; margarines.
toffy: (noun) a type of candy.
pawer: (noun) a person who paws.
maced: (verb) past tense of mace.
crits: (noun) plural of crit.
kluge: (noun/verb, informal) a clumsy solution; to kluge.
tubed: (verb) past tense of tube.
sahib: (noun) sir (Indian).
ganef: (noun, Yiddish) a thief.
scats: (verb) third person singular present tense of scat; (noun) plural of scat.
sputa: (noun) sputum.
vaned: (verb) past tense of vane.
acned: (adjective) having acne.
taxol: (noun) a type of drug.
plink: (noun/verb) a light ringing sound; to plink.
oweth: (verb, archaic) owes.
tribs: (noun) tributaries.
resay: (verb) to say again.
boule: (noun) a type of bowling game.
thous: (noun, archaic) thousands.
haply: (adverb, archaic) perhaps.
glans: (noun) the head of the penis.
maxis: (noun) plural of maxi; maxi dresses.
bezel: (noun) a setting for a gemstone.
antis: (noun) plural of anti.
porks: (verb) third person singular present tense of pork; (noun) plural of pork.
quoit: (noun) a quoit; a ring thrown at a stake.
alkyd: (noun) a type of resin.
glary: (adjective) glaring; harsh.
beamy: (adjective) having beams.
hexad: (noun) a group of six.
bonks: (verb) third person singular present tense of bonk; (noun) plural of bonk.
tecum: (adverb, Latin) with you.
kerbs: (noun, British spelling) curbs.
filar: (adjective) relating to threads.
frier: (noun) a person or thing that fries.
redux: (adjective/noun) reduced; a redux.
abuzz: (adjective) buzzing.
fader: (noun) a device for controlling volume.
shoer: (noun) a person who shoes horses.
couth: (adjective, archaic) refined.
trues: (noun) plural of true.
guyed: (verb) past tense of guy; to support.
goony: (adjective, informal) silly.
booky: (adjective) full of books.
fuzes: (noun) plural of fuze.
hurly: (noun) a commotion.
genet: (noun) a type of cat.
hodad: (noun, informal) a person who is uncool.
calix: (noun) calyx.
filer: (noun) a person who files.
pawls: (noun) plural of pawl; locking devices.
iodic: (adjective) relating to iodine.
utero: (prefix) relating to the uterus.
henge: (noun) a prehistoric monument.
unsay: (verb) to retract something.
liers: (noun) plural of lier.
piing: (verb) present participle of pie.
weald: (noun) a wooded area.
sexed: (verb) past tense of sex; also an adjective.
folic: (adjective) relating to folic acid.
poxed: (verb) past tense of pox.
cunts: (noun) plural of cunt.
anile: (adjective) old and feeble.
kiths: (noun) plural of kith; friends.
becks: (noun) plural of beck.
tatty: (adjective, informal) shabby.
plena: (noun) plenary session.
rebar: (noun) reinforcing bars.
abled: (adjective) able.
toyer: (noun) a person who toys.
attar: (noun) a perfume.
teaks: (noun) plural of teak.
aioli: (noun) a type of sauce.
awing: (verb) present participle of awe.
anent: (preposition, archaic) concerning.
feces: (noun) excrement.
redip: (verb) to dip again.
wists: (noun) plural of wist; longings.
prats: (noun) plural of prat; silly people.
mesne: (adjective/noun) intermediate; a mesne lord.
muter: (noun) a device for muting.
smurf: (noun) a mythical creature.
owest: (verb) second person singular present tense of owe.
bahts: (noun) plural of baht.
lossy: (adjective) involving loss.
ftped: (verb) past tense of ftp.
hunky: (adjective, informal) attractive.
hoers: (noun) plural of hoer.
slier: (adjective) more sly.
sicks: (verb) third person singular present tense of sick; (noun) plural of sick.
fatly: (adverb) in a fat manner.
delft: (noun) a type of pottery.
hiver: (noun) a person who hives bees.
himbo: (noun, informal) a stupid man.
pengo: (noun) a former Hungarian monetary unit.
busks: (verb) third person singular present tense of busk; (noun) plural of busk.
loxes: (noun) plural of lox; smoked salmon.
zonks: (verb) third person singular present tense of zonked; (noun) plural of zonked.
ilium: (noun) a bone in the pelvis.
aport: (adverb, nautical) to port.
ikons: (noun) plural of ikon; icons.
mulct: (verb/noun) to fine someone; a fine.
reeve: (noun/verb) a sheriff; to reeve.
civvy: (noun/adjective, informal) civilian clothes; civilian.
canna: (verb, informal) cannot.
barfy: (adjective, informal) causing nausea.
kaiak: (noun) a kayak.
scudo: (noun) a former Italian coin.
knout: (noun) a whip.
gaper: (noun) a person who gapes.
bhang: (noun) a cannabis preparation.
pease: (noun, archaic) peas.
uteri: (noun) plural of uterus.
lases: (verb) third person singular present tense of lase.
paten: (noun) a plate for bread.
rasae: (noun) plural of rasa; emotions (Sanskrit).
axels: (noun) plural of axel.
stoas: (noun) plural of stoa.
ombre: (noun/adjective) a shade of color; shaded.
styli: (noun) plural of stylus.
gunky: (adjective, informal) dirty.
hazer: (noun) a person who hazers.
kenaf: (noun) a type of fiber plant.
ahoys: (interjection, nautical) ahoy.
ammos: (noun) plural of ammo.
weeny: (adjective, informal) tiny.
urger: (noun) a person who urges.
kudzu: (noun) a type of vine.
paren: (noun, abbreviation) parenthesis.
bolos: (noun) plural of bolo; a type of knife.
fetor: (noun) a foul smell.
nitty: (adjective, informal) containing nits.
techy: (adjective, informal) technical.
lieth: (verb, archaic) lies.
somas: (noun) plural of soma.
darky: (noun, offensive) a Black person.
villi: (noun) plural of villus; small projections.
gluon: (noun) a type of elementary particle.
janes: (noun) plural of Jane.
cants: (noun) plural of cant.
farts: (noun) plural of fart.
socle: (noun) a base or pedestal.
jinns: (noun) plural of jinn; genies.
ruing: (verb) present participle of rue.
slily: (adverb) slyly.
ricer: (noun) a rice cooker.
hadda: (verb, informal) had to.
wowee: (interjection, informal) wow.
rices: (verb) third person singular present tense of rice; (noun) plural of rice.
nerts: (interjection, informal) an exclamation.
cauls: (noun) plural of caul; membranes.
swive: (verb) to have sexual intercourse.
lilty: (adjective) lilting; melodious.
micks: (noun) plural of mick.
arity: (noun) the number of arguments.
pasha: (noun) a high-ranking official (Ottoman Empire).
finif: (noun) finish (Latin).
oinky: (adjective) like an oink.
gutty: (adjective) gutsy; determined.
tetra: (prefix) four.
wises: (verb) third person singular present tense of wise; (noun) plural of wise.
wolds: (noun) plural of wold; hills.
balds: (noun) plural of bald.
picot: (noun) a type of edging.
whats: (noun) what's.
shiki: (noun) a season (Japanese).
bungs: (noun) plural of bung; stoppers.
snarf: (verb, informal) to eat quickly.
legos: (noun) plural of Lego; toy bricks.
dungs: (noun) plural of dung.
stogy: (adjective) old-fashioned.
berms: (noun) plural of berm; embankments.
tangs: (noun) plural of tang.
vails: (verb) third person singular present tense of vail; (noun) plural of vail.
roods: (noun) plural of rood.
morel: (noun) a type of mushroom.
sware: (verb, archaic) swore.
elans: (noun) plural of élan.
latus: (noun) a latus rectum; a line.
gules: (noun) red (heraldry).
razer: (noun) a razor.
doxie: (noun) a dachshund.
buena: (adjective, Spanish) good.
overs: (noun) plural of over; also a verb.
gutta: (noun) gutta-percha; a type of resin.
zincs: (noun) plural of zinc.
nates: (noun) buttocks.
kirks: (noun) plural of kirk.
tikes: (noun) plural of tyke.
donee: (noun) a recipient of a gift.
jerry: (noun) a given name.
mohel: (noun) a person who performs circumcisions.
ceder: (noun) a cedar tree.
doges: (noun) plural of doge.
unmap: (verb) to remove a map.
folia: (noun) plural of folium; leaves.
rawly: (adverb) in a raw manner.
snark: (noun/verb) a sarcastic remark; to snark.
topoi: (noun) plural of topos; places; commonplaces.
ceils: (verb) third person singular present tense of ceil; (noun) plural of ceil.
immix: (verb) to mix.
yores: (noun) plural of yore.
diest: (adjective) most die-hard.
bubba: (noun, informal) a man (Southern US).
pomps: (noun) plural of pomp.
forky: (adjective) forked.
turdy: (adjective, informal) dirty.
lawzy: (interjection, informal) Lord.
poohs: (verb) third person singular present tense of pooh; (noun) plural of pooh.
worts: (noun) plural of wort.
gloms: (verb) third person singular present tense of glom; (noun) plural of glom.
beano: (noun, informal) a celebration.
muley: (adjective) lacking horns.
barky: (adjective) like bark.
tunny: (noun) a tuna.
auric: (adjective) relating to gold.
funks: (noun) plural of funk.
gaffs: (noun) plural of gaff; hooks.
cordy: (adjective) like cord.
curdy: (adjective) like curds.
lisle: (noun) a type of cotton.
toric: (adjective) relating to a torus.
soyas: (noun) plural of soya.
reman: (verb) to remain.
mungy: (adjective) like mung beans.
carpy: (adjective) like carp.
apish: (adjective) like an ape.
oaten: (adjective) made of oats.
gappy: (adjective) full of gaps.
aurae: (noun) plural of aura.
bract: (noun) a modified leaf.
rooky: (adjective, informal) inexperienced.
axled: (adjective) having an axle.
burry: (adjective) covered in burrs.
sizer: (noun) a person or thing that sizes.
proem: (noun) an introduction.
turfy: (adjective) like turf.
impro: (noun, abbreviation) improvisation.
mashy: (adjective) pulpy.
miens: (noun) plural of mien.
nonny: (adjective, informal) silly.
olios: (noun) plural of olio; mixtures.
grook: (verb) to understand intuitively.
sates: (verb) third person singular present tense of sate.
agley: (adverb, archaic) amiss; wrong.
corgi: (noun) a type of dog.
dashy: (adjective) stylish; dashing.
doser: (noun) a person who doses.
dildo: (noun) a sex toy.
apsos: (noun) plural of apso; a type of dog.
xored: (verb) past tense of xor.
laker: (noun) a lake dweller.
playa: (noun) a playa lake; a person who plays.
selah: (noun, Biblical) pause.
malty: (adjective) malted; like malt.
dulse: (noun) a type of seaweed.
frigs: (noun, informal) refrigerators.
demit: (verb) to dismiss.
whoso: (pronoun, archaic) whoever.
rials: (noun) plural of rial; monetary units.
sawer: (noun) a person who saws.
spics: (noun) plural of spice.
bedim: (verb) to obscure.
snugs: (verb) third person singular present tense of snug; (noun) plural of snug.
fanin: (noun) fan-in; the number of inputs.
azoic: (adjective) lifeless.
icers: (noun) plural of icer; icing.
suers: (noun) plural of suer.
wizen: (verb) to shrivel.
koine: (noun) a common language.
topos: (noun) plural of topos; locations; commonplaces.
shirr: (verb/noun) to gather fabric; shirred fabric.
rifer: (adjective) more rife.
feral: (adjective) wild; untamed.
laded: (verb) past tense of lade.
lased: (verb) past tense of lase.
turds: (noun, informal) feces.
swede: (noun) a type of turnip; a Swede.
easts: (noun) plural of east.
cozen: (verb) to deceive.
unhit: (adjective) not hit.
pally: (adjective/noun, informal) friendly; a pal.
aitch: (noun, informal) the letter H.
sedum: (noun) a type of plant.
coper: (noun) a copper; a dealer in copper.
ruche: (noun) a type of frill.
geeks: (noun) plural of geek.
swags: (noun) plural of swag; also a verb.
etext: (noun) an electronic text.
algin: (noun) alginic acid.
offed: (verb, informal) killed.
ninja: (noun) a Japanese warrior.
holer: (noun) a person who holes.
doter: (noun) a person who dotes.
toter: (noun) a person who totes.
besot: (verb) to intoxicate.
dicut: (verb) to cut something.
macer: (noun) a person who macerates.
peens: (noun) plural of peen; parts of tools.
pewit: (noun) a type of bird.
redox: (adjective/noun) relating to reduction and oxidation; a redox reaction.
poler: (noun) a person who poles.
yecch: (interjection) expressing disgust.
fluky: (adjective) lucky; fluky.
doeth: (verb, archaic) does.
twats: (noun, vulgar) vulvas.
cruds: (noun) plural of crud; dirt.
bebug: (verb) to debug.
bider: (noun) a person who bides.
stele: (noun) an upright stone slab.
hexer: (noun) a person who hexes.
wests: (noun) plural of west.
gluer: (noun) a person who glues.
pilau: (noun) pilaf.
abaft: (adverb/preposition, nautical) behind.
whelm: (verb) to overwhelm.
lacer: (noun) a person who lacerates.
inode: (noun) a data structure.
tabus: (noun) plural of tabu.
gator: (noun, informal) alligator.
cuing: (verb) present participle of cue.
refly: (verb) to fly again.
luted: (verb) past tense of lute.
cukes: (noun, informal) cucumbers.
bairn: (noun) a child (Scottish).
bight: (noun) a bend in a coastline.
arses: (noun) plural of arse.
crump: (verb/noun) to crumble; a crumbling action.
loggy: (adjective) sluggish.
blini: (noun) a type of pancake.
spoor: (noun) an animal's track.
toyon: (noun) a type of tree.
harks: (verb) third person singular present tense of hark; (noun) plural of hark.
wazoo: (noun, informal) a large amount.
fenny: (adjective) marshy.
naves: (noun) plural of nave.
keyer: (noun) a person who keys.
tufas: (noun) plural of tufa; rocks.
morph: (verb/noun) to change form; metamorphosis.
rajas: (noun) plural of raja.
typal: (adjective) typical.
spiff: (noun/verb) something excellent; to spiff something up.
oxlip: (noun) a type of primrose.
unban: (verb) to lift a ban.
mussy: (adjective) untidy.
finny: (adjective) having fins.
rimer: (noun) a person who rimes.
login: (noun/verb) to log in.
molas: (noun) plural of mola; grinding stones.
cirri: (noun) plural of cirrus; clouds.
huzza: (interjection) hurrah.
agone: (adverb, archaic) ago.
unsex: (verb) to emasculate.
unwon: (adjective) not won.
peats: (noun) plural of peat.
toile: (noun) toilet (French).
zombi: (noun) a zombie.
dewed: (verb) past tense of bedew.
nooky: (noun, informal) sexual intercourse.
alkyl: (noun) an alkyl group.
ixnay: (verb, pig latin) to nix.
dovey: (adjective) like a dove.
holey: (adjective) full of holes.
cuber: (noun) a person or thing that cubes.
amyls: (noun) plural of amyl; chemical compounds.
podia: (noun) plural of podium.
chino: (noun/adjective) chino trousers; chino-colored.
apnea: (noun) temporary cessation of breathing.
prims: (noun) plural of prim.
lycra: (noun) a type of synthetic fiber.
johns: (noun) plural of john; toilets.
primo: (adjective, informal) excellent.
fatwa: (noun) a religious edict.
egger: (noun) a person who eggs.
hempy: (adjective) like hemp.
snook: (noun) a type of fish.
hying: (verb) present participle of hie; to hasten.
fuzed: (verb) past tense of fuze.
barms: (noun) brewer's yeast.
crink: (noun/verb) a wrinkle; to crinkle.
moots: (verb) third person singular present tense of moot; (noun) plural of moot.
yerba: (noun) yerba mate; a type of tea.
rhumb: (noun) a rhumb line; a line of constant compass bearing.
unarc: (verb) to unarchive.
direr: (adjective) more dire.
munge: (verb) to modify or corrupt data.
eland: (noun) a type of antelope.
nares: (noun) plural of naris; nostrils.
wrier: (adjective) more wry.
noddy: (noun) a type of bird; a fool.
atilt: (adverb) tilted.
jukes: (noun) plural of juke; jukeboxes.
ender: (noun) something that ends.
thens: (noun) plural of then.
unfix: (verb) to unfasten.
doggo: (adverb, informal) hidden.
zooks: (interjection, archaic) an exclamation.
diddy: (noun/adjective, informal) a short song; small.
shmoo: (noun) a mythical creature.
brusk: (adjective) abrupt and curt.
prest: (noun/adjective, archaic) ready; priest.
curer: (noun) a person who cures.
pasts: (noun) plural of past.
kelpy: (adjective) like kelp.
abend: (noun, computing) abnormal end.
stela: (noun) an upright stone slab.
biggy: (noun, informal) something big.
laved: (verb) past tense of lave.
baldy: (noun, informal) a bald person.
pubis: (noun) the pubic bone.
gooks: (noun, offensive) Asian people.
wonky: (adjective, informal) shaky; unstable.
stied: (verb) past tense of sty.
hypos: (noun) plural of hypo.
assed: (verb) past tense of ass.
spumy: (adjective) foamy.
osier: (noun) a type of willow.
roble: (noun) oak (Spanish).
rumba: (noun) a type of dance.
biffy: (noun, informal) a toilet.
pupal: (adjective) relating to a pupa.
